epitome: 1. A work in which the contents of a former work are reduced within a smaller space by curtailment and condensation; a brief summary; an abridgement. [An] epitome of the contents of a very large book. Sydney Smith. 2. A compact or condensed representation of anything. An epitome of English fashionable life. Carlyle. A man so various that he seemed to be Not one, but all mankind's epitome. Dryden. Syn. -- Abridgement; compendium; compend; abstract; synopsis; abbreviature. See Abridgment.
stolid: Hopelessly insensible or stupid; not easily aroused or excited; dull; impassive; foolish.
peripatetic: 1. Walking about; itinerant. 2. Of or pertaining to the philosophy taught by Aristotle (who gave his instructions while walking in the Lyceum at Athens), or to his followers. "The true peripatetic school." Howell.  1. One who walks about; a pedestrian; an itinerant. Tatler. 2. A disciple of Aristotle; an Aristotelian.
gambol: A skipping or leaping about in frolic; a hop; a sportive prank. Dryden.  To dance and skip about in sport; to frisk; to skip; to play in frolic, like boys or lambs.
torpid: 1. Having lost motion, or the power of exertion and feeling; numb; benumbed; as, a torpid limb. Without heat all things would be torpid. Ray. 2. Dull; stupid; sluggish; inactive. Sir M. Hale.
preen: A forked tool used by clothiers in dressing cloth.  1. To dress with, or as with, a preen; to trim or dress with the beak, as the feathers; -- said of birds. Derham. 2. To trim up, as trees. [Prov. Eng.] Halliwell.
imperturbable: Incapable of being disturbed or disconcerted; as, imperturbable gravity.
atrophy: A wasting away from want of nourishment; diminution in bulk or slow emaciation of the body or of any part. Milton.  To cause to waste away or become abortive; to starve or weaken.  To waste away; to dwindle.
plastic: 1. Having the power to give form or fashion to a mass of matter; as, the plastic hand of the Creator. Prior. See plastic Nature working to his end. Pope. 2. Capable of being molded, formed, or modeled, as clay or plaster; - - used also figuratively; as, the plastic mind of a child. 3. Pertaining or appropriate to, or characteristic of, molding or modeling; produced by, or appearing as if produced by, molding or modeling; -- said of sculpture and the kindred arts, in distinction from painting and the graphic arts. Medallions . . . fraught with the plastic beauty and grace of the palmy days of Italian art. J. S. Harford. Plastic clay (Geol.), one of the beds of the Eocene period; -- so called because used in making pottery. Lyell. -- Plastic element (Physiol.), one that bears within the germs of a higher form. -- Plastic exudation (Med.), an exudation thrown out upon a wounded surface and constituting the material of repair by which the process of healing is effected. -- Plastic foods. (Physiol.) See the second Note under Food. -- Plastic force. (Physiol.) See under Force. -- Plastic operation, an operation in plastic surgery. -- Plastic surgery, that branch of surgery which is concerned with the repair or restoration of lost, injured, or deformed parts of the body.  a substance composed predominantly of a synthetic organic high polymer capable of being cast or molded; many varieties of plastic are used to produce articles of commerce (after 1900). [MW10 gives origin of word as 1905]
phlegmatic: 1. Watery. [Obs.] "Aqueous and phlegmatic." Sir I. Newton. 2. Abounding in phlegm; as, phlegmatic humors; a phlegmatic constitution. Harvey. 3. Generating or causing phlegm. "Cold and phlegmatic habitations." Sir T. Browne. 4. Not easily excited to action or passion; cold; dull; sluggish; heavy; as, a phlegmatic person. Addison. Phlegmatic temperament (Old Physiol.), lymphatic temperament. See under Lymphatic.
sybarite: A person devoted to luxury and pleasure; a voluptuary.
exacerbate: To render more violent or bitter; to irriate; to exasperate; to imbitter, as passions or disease. Broughman.
reconnoiter: 1. To examine with the eye to make a preliminary examination or survey of; esp., to survey with a view to military or engineering operations. 2. To recognize. [Obs.] Sir H. Walpole.
episodic: Of or pertaining to an episode; adventitious. -- Ep`i*so"dic*al*ly, adv. Such a figure as Jacob Brattle, purely episodical though it be, is an excellent English portrait. H. James.
broach: 1. A spit. [Obs.] He turned a broach that had worn a crown. Bacon. 2. An awl; a bodkin; also, a wooden rod or pin, sharpened at each end, used by thatchers. [Prov. Eng.] Forby. 3. (Mech.) (a) A tool of steel, generally tapering, and of a polygonal form, with from four to eight cutting edges, for smoothing or enlarging holes in metal; sometimes made smooth or without edges, as for burnishing pivot holes in watches; a reamer. The broach for gun barrels is commonly square and without taper. (b) A straight tool with file teeth, made of steel, to be pressed through irregular holes in metal that cannot be dressed by revolving tools; a drift. 4. (Masonry)  A broad chisel for stonecutting. 5. (Arch.)  A spire rising from a tower. [Local, Eng.] 6. A clasp for fastening a garment. See Brooch. 7. A spitlike start, on the head of a young stag. 8. The stick from which candle wicks are suspended for dipping. Knight. 9. The pin in a lock which enters the barrel of the key.  1. To spit; to pierce as with a spit. I'll broach the tadpole on my rapier's point. Shak. 2. To tap; to pierce, as a cask, in order to draw the liquor. Hence: To let out; to shed, as blood. Whereat with blade, with bloody blameful blade, He bravely broached his boiling bloody breast. Shak. 3. To open for the first time, as stores. You shall want neither weapons, victuals, nor aid; I will open the old armories, I will broach my store, and will bring forth my stores. Knolles. 4. To make public; to utter; to publish first; to put forth; to introduce as a topic of conversation. Those very opinions themselves had broached. Swift. 5. To cause to begin or break out. [Obs.] Shak. 6. (Masonry)  To shape roughly, as a block of stone, by chiseling with a coarse tool. [Scot. & North of Eng.] 7. To enlarge or dress (a hole), by using a broach. To broach to (Naut.), to incline suddenly to windward, so as to lay the sails aback, and expose the vessel to the danger of oversetting.
turgid: 1. Distended beyond the natural state by some internal agent or expansive force; swelled; swollen; bloated; inflated; tumid; -- especially applied to an enlarged part of the body; as, a turgid limb; turgid fruit. A bladder . . . held near the fire grew turgid. Boyle. 2. Swelling in style or language; vainly ostentatious; bombastic; pompous; as, a turgid style of speaking. -- Tur"gid*ly, adv. -- Tur"gid*ness, n.
inveterate: 1. Old; long-established. [Obs.] It is an inveterate and received opinion. Bacon. 2. Firmly established by long continuance; obstinate; deep-rooted; of long standing; as, an inveterate disease; an inveterate abuse. Heal the inveterate canker of one wound. Shak. 3. Having habits fixed by long continuance; confirmed; habitual; as, an inveterate idler or smoker. 4. Malignant; virulent; spiteful. H. Brooke.  To fix and settle by long continuance. [Obs.] Bacon.
indifferent: 1. Not mal Dangers are to me indifferent. Shak. Everything in the world is indifferent but sin. Jer. Taylor. His slightest and most indifferent acts . . . were odious in the clergyman's sight. Hawthorne. 2. Neither particularly good, not very bad; of a middle state or quality; passable; mediocre. The staterooms are in indifferent order. Sir W. Scott. 3. Not inclined to one side, party, or choice more than to another; neutral; impartial. Indifferent in his choice to sleep or die. Addison. 4. Feeling no interest, anxiety, or care, respecting anything; unconcerned; inattentive; apathetic; heedless; as, to be indifferent to the welfare of one's family. It was a law of Solon, that any person who, in the civil commotions of the republic, remained neuter, or an indifferent spectator of the contending parties, should be condemned to perpetual banishment. Addison. 5. (Law)  Free from bias or prejudice; impartial; unbiased; disinterested. In choice of committees for ripening business for the counsel, it is better indifferent persons than to make an indifferency by putting in those that are strong on both sides. Bacon. Indifferent tissue (Anat.), the primitive, embryonic, undifferentiated tissue, before conversion into connective, muscular, nervous, or other definite tissue.  To a moderate degree; passably; tolerably. [Obs.] "News indifferent good." Shak.
jocular: 1. Given to jesting; jocose; as, a jocular person. 2. Sportive; merry. "Jocular exploits." Cowper. The style is serious and partly jocular. Dryden.
pungent: 1. Causing a sharp sensation, as of the taste, smell, or feelings; pricking; biting; acrid; as, a pungent spice. Pungent radish biting infant's tongue. Shenstone. The pungent grains of titillating dust. Pope. 2. Sharply painful; penetrating; poignant; severe; caustic; stinging. With pungent pains on every side. Swift. His pungent pen played its part in rousing the nation. J. R. Green. 3. (Bot.)  Prickly-pointed; hard and sharp. Syn. -- Acrid; piercing; sharp; penetrating; acute; keen; acrimonious; biting; stinging.
indigence: The condition of being indigent; want of estate, or means of comfortable subsistence; penury; poverty; as, helpless, indigence. Cowper. Syn. -- Poverty; penury; destitution; want; need; privation; lack. See Poverty.
perspicacious: 1. Having the power of seeing clearly; quick-sighted; sharp of sight. 2. Fig.: Of acute discernment; keen. -- Per`spi*ca"cious*ly, adv. -- Per`spi*ca"cious*ness, n.
sedulous: Diligent in application or pursuit; constant, steady, and persevering in business, or in endeavors to effect an object; steadily industrious; assiduous; as, the sedulous bee. What signifies the sound of words in prayer, without the affection of the heart, and a sedulous application of the proper means that may naturally lead us to such an end L'Estrange. Syn. -- Assiduous; diligent; industrious; laborious; unremitting; untiring; unwearied; persevering. -- Sed"u*lous*ly, adv. -- Sed"u*lous*ness, n.
repartee: A smart, ready, and witty reply. Cupid was as bad as he; Hear but the youngster's repartee. Prior. Syn. -- Retort; reply. See Retort.  To make smart and witty replies. [R.] Prior.
derivative: Obtained by derivation; derived; not radical, original, or fundamental; originating, deduced, or formed from something else; secondary; as, a derivative conveyance; a derivative word. Derivative circulation, a modification of the circulation found in some parts of the body, in which the arteries empty directly into the veins without the interposition of capillaries. Flint. -- De*riv"a*tive*ly, adv. -- De*riv"a*tive*ness, n.  1. That which is derived; anything obtained or deduced from another. 2. (Gram.)  A word formed from another word, by a prefix or suffix, an internal modification, or some other change; a word which takes its origin from a root. 3. (Mus.)  A chord, not fundamental, but obtained from another by inversion; or, vice versa, a ground tone or root implied in its harmonics in an actual chord. 4. (Med.)  An agent which is adapted to produce a derivation (in the medical sense). 5. (Math.)  A derived function; a function obtained from a given function by a certain algebraic process. Note: Except in the mode of derivation the derivative is the same as the differential coefficient. See Differential coefficient, under Differential. 6. (Chem.)  A substance so related to another substance by modification or partial substitution as to be regarded as derived from it; thus, the amido compounds are derivatives of ammonia, and the hydrocarbons are derivatives of methane, benzene, etc.
rescind: 1. To cut off; to abrogate; to annul. The blessed Jesus . . . did sacramentally rescind the impure relics of Adam and the contraction of evil customs. Jer. Taylor. 2. Specifically, to vacate or make void, as an act, by the enacting authority or by superior authority; to repeal; as, to rescind a law, a resolution, or a vote; to rescind a decree or a judgment. Syn. -- To revoke; repeal; abrogate; annul; recall; reverse; vacate; void.
retaliate: To return the like for; to repay or requite by an act of the same kind; to return evil for (evil). [Now seldom used except in a bad sense.] One ambassador sent word to the duke's son that his visit should be retaliated. Sir T. Herbert. It is unlucky to be obliged to retaliate the injuries of authors, whose works are so soon forgotten that we are in danger of appearing the first aggressors. Swift.  To return like for like; specifically, to return evil for evil; as, to retaliate upon an enemy.
saturnine: 1. Born under, or influenced by, the planet Saturn. 2. Heavy; grave; gloomy; dull; -- the opposite of mercurial; as, a saturnine person or temper. Addison. 3. (Old Chem.)  Of or pertaining to lead; characterized by, or resembling, lead, which was formerly called Saturn. [Archaic] Saturnine colic (Med.), lead colic.
meticulous: Timid; fearful. -- Me*tic"u*lous*ly, adv.
exculpate: To clear from alleged fault or guilt; to prove to be guiltless; to relieve of blame; to acquit. He exculpated himself from being the author of the heroic epistle. Mason. I exculpate him further for his writing against me. Milman. Syn. -- To exonerate; absolve; clear; acquit; excuse; vindicate; justify.
pariah: 1. One of an aboriginal people of Southern India, regarded by the four castes of the Hindoos as of very low grade. They are usually the serfs of the Sudra agriculturalists. See Caste. Balfour (Cyc. of India). 2. An outcast; one despised by society. Pariah dog (Zoöl.), a mongrel race of half-wild dogs which act as scavengers in Oriental cities. -- Pariah kite (Zoöl.), a species of kite (Milvus govinda) which acts as a scavenger in India.
coda: A few measures added beyond the natural termination of a composition.
cavil: To raise captious and frivolous objections; to find fault without good reason. You do not well in obstinacy To cavil in the course of this contract. Shak.  To cavil at. [Obs.] Milton.  A captious or frivolous objection. All the cavils of prejudice and unbelief. Shak.  One who cavils. Cavilers at the style of the Scriptures. Boyle.
itinerant: Passing or traveling about a country; going or preaching on a circuit; wandering; not settled; as, an itinerant preacher; an itinerant peddler. The king's own courts were then itinerant, being kept in the king's palace, and removing with his household in those royal progresses which he continually made. Blackstone.  One who travels from place to place, particularly a preacher; one who is unsettled. Glad to turn itinerant, To stroll and teach from town to town. Hudibras.
tirade: A declamatory strain or flight of censure or abuse; a rambling invective; an oration or harangue abounding in censorious and bitter language. Here he delivers a violent tirade against persons who profess to know anything about angels. Quarterly Review.
squander: 1. To scatter; to disperse. [Obs.] Our squandered troops he rallies. Dryden. 2. To spend lavishly or profusely; to spend prodigally or wastefully; to use without economy or judgment; to dissipate; as, to squander an estate. The crime of squandering health is equal to the folly. Rambler. Syn. -- To spend; expend; waste; scatter; dissipate.  1. To spend lavishly; to be wasteful. They often squandered, but they never gave. Savage. 2. To wander at random; to scatter. [R.] The wise man's folly is anatomized Even by squandering glances of the fool. Shak.  The act of squandering; waste.
superannuation: The state of being superannuated, or too old for office or business; the state of being disqualified by old age; decrepitude. The world itself is in a state of superannuation. Cowper. Slyness blinking through the watery eye of superannuation. Coleridge.
garrulous: 1. Talking much, especially about commonplace or trivial things; talkative; loquacious. The most garrulous people on earth. De Quincey. 2. (Zoöl.)  Having a loud, harsh note; noisy; -- said of birds; as, the garrulous roller. Syn. -- Garrulous, Talkative, Loquacious. A garrulous person indulges in long, prosy talk, with frequent repetitions and lengthened details; talkative implies simply a great desire to talk; and loquacious a great flow of words at command. A child is talkative; a lively woman is loquacious; an old man in his dotage is garrulous. -- Gar"ru*lous*ly, adv. -- Gar"ru*lous*ness, n.
limn: 1. To draw or paint; especially, to represent in an artistic way with pencil or brush. Let a painter carelessly limn out a million of faces, and you shall find them all different. Sir T. Browne. 2. To illumine, as books or parchments, with ornamental figures, letters, or borders.
salacious: Having a propensity to venery; lustful; lecherous. Dryden. -- Sa*la"cious*ly, dv. -- Sa*la"cious*ness, n.
vitiate: 1. To make vicious, faulty, or imperfect; to render defective; to injure the substance or qualities of; to impair; to contaminate; to spoil; as, exaggeration vitiates a style of writing; sewer gas vitiates the air. A will vitiated and growth out of love with the truth disposes the understanding to error and delusion. South. Without care it may be used to vitiate our minds. Burke. This undistinguishing complaisance will vitiate the taste of readers. Garth. 2. To cause to fail of effect, either wholly or in part; to make void; to destroy, as the validity or binding force of an instrument or transaction; to annul; as, any undue influence exerted on a jury vitiates their verdict; fraud vitiates a contract.
caustic: 1. Capable of destroying the texture of anything or eating away its substance by chemical action; burning; corrosive; searing. 2. Severe; satirical; sharp; as, a caustic remark. Caustic curve (Optics), a curve to which the ray of light, reflected or refracted by another curve, are tangents, the reflecting or refracting curve and the luminous point being in one plane. -- Caustic lime. See under Lime. -- Caustic potash, Caustic soda (Chem.), the solid hydroxides potash, KOH, and soda, NaOH, or solutions of the same. -- Caustic silver, nitrate of silver, lunar caustic. -- Caustic surface (Optics), a surface to which rays reflected or refracted by another surface are tangents. Caustic curves and surfaces are called catacaustic when formed by reflection, and diacaustic when formed by refraction. Syn. -- Stinging; cutting; pungent; searching.  1. Any substance or means which, applied to animal or other organic tissue, burns, corrodes, or destroys it by chemical action; an escharotic. 2. (Optics)  A caustic curve or caustic surface.
superfluous: More than is wanted or is sufficient; rendered unnecessary by superabundance; unnecessary; useless; excessive; as, a superfluous price. Shak. An authority which makes all further argument or illustration superfluous. E. Everett. Superfluous interval (Mus.), an interval that exceeds a major or perfect interval by a semitone. Syn. -- Unnecessary; useless; exuberant; excessive; redundant; needless. -- Su*per"flu*ous*ly, adv. -- Su*per"flu*ous*ness, n.
vagary: 1. A wandering or strolling. [Obs.] 2. Hence, a wandering of the thoughts; a wild or fanciful freak; a whim; a whimsical purpose. "The vagaries of a child." Spectator. They changed their minds, Flew off, and into strange vagaries fell. Milton.
rent: To rant. [R. & Obs.] Hudibras.  imp. & p. p. of Rend.  1. An opening made by rending; a break or breach made by force; a tear. See what a rent the envious Casca made. Shak. 2. Figuratively, a schim; a rupture of harmony; a separation; as, a rent in the church. Syn. -- Fissure; breach; disrupture; rupture; tear; diaceration; break; fracture.  To tear. See Rend. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. Incone; revenue. See Catel. [Obs.] "Catel had they enough and rent." Chaucer. [Bacchus] a waster was and all his rent In wine and bordel he dispent. Gower. So bought an annual rent or two, And liv'd, just as you see I do. Pope. 2. Pay; reward; share; toll. [Obs.] Death, that taketh of high and low his rent. Chaucer. 3. (Law)  A certain periodical profit, whether in money, provisions, chattels, or labor, issuing out of lands and tenements in payment for the use; commonly, a certain pecuniary sum agreed upon between a tenant and his landlord, paid at fixed intervals by the lessee to the lessor, for the use of land or its appendages; as, rent for a farm, a house, a park, etc. Note: The term rent is also popularly applied to compensation for the use of certain personal chattles, as a piano, a sewing machine, etc. Black rent. See Blackmail, 3. -- Forehand rent, rent which is paid in advance; foregift. -- Rent arrear, rent in arrears; unpaid rent. Blackstone. -- Rent charge (Law), a rent reserved on a conveyance of land in fee simple, or granted out of lands by deed; -- so called because, by a covenant or clause in the deed of conveyance, the land is charged with a distress for the payment of it, Bouvier. -- Rent roll, a list or account of rents or income; a rental. -- Rent seck (Law), a rent reserved by deed, but without any clause of distress; barren rent. A power of distress was made incident to rent seck by Statue 4 George II. c. 28. -- Rent service (Eng. Law), rent reserved out of land held by fealty or other corporeal service; -- so called from such service being incident to it. -- White rent, a quitrent when paid in silver; -- opposed to black rent.  1. To grant the possession and enjoyment of, for a rent; to lease; as, the owwner of an estate or house rents it. 2. To take and hold under an agreement to pay rent; as, the tennant rents an estate of the owner.  To be leased, or let for rent; as, an estate rents for five hundred dollars a year.
prattle: To talk much and idly; to prate; hence, to talk lightly and artlessly, like a child; to utter child's talk.  To utter as prattle; to babble; as, to prattle treason. Addison.  Trifling or childish tattle; empty talk; loquacity on trivial subjects; prate; babble. Mere prattle, without practice. Shak.
malevolent: Wishing evil; disposed to injure others; rejoicing in another's misfortune. Syn. -- Ill-disposed; envious; mischievous; evil-minded; spiteful; malicious; malignant; rancorous.
insouciant: Careless; heedless; indifferent; unconcerned. J. S. Mill.
jejune: 1. Lacking matter; empty; void of substance. 2. Void of interest; barren; meager; dry; as, a jejune narrative. - Je*june"ly, adv. -- Je*june"ness, n. Bacon.
desiccate: To dry up; to deprive or exhaust of moisture; to preserve by drying; as, to desiccate fish or fruit. Bodies desiccated by heat or age. Bacon.  To become dry.
ennui: A feeling of weariness and disgust; dullness and languor of spirits, arising from satiety or want of interest; tedium. T. Gray.
lambaste: To beat severely. [Low] Nares.
zealous: 1. Filled with, or characterized by, zeal; warmly engaged, or ardent, in behalf of an object. He may be zealous in the salvation of souls. Law. 2. Filled with religious zeal. [Obs.] Shak. -- Zeal"ous*ly, adv. -- Zeal"ous*ness, n.
slake: 1. To allay; to quench; to extinguish; as, to slake thirst. "And slake the heavenly fire." Spenser. It could not slake mine ire nor ease my heart. Shak. 2. To mix with water, so that a true chemical combination shall take place; to slack; as, to slake lime.  1. To go out; to become extinct. "His flame did slake." Sir T. Browne. 2. To abate; to become less decided. [R.] Shak. 3. To slacken; to become relaxed. "When the body's strongest sinews slake." [R.] Sir J. Davies. 4. To become mixed with water, so that a true chemical combination takes place; as, the lime slakes. Slake trough, a trough containing water in which a blacksmith cools a forging or tool.
flip: A mixture of beer, spirit, etc., stirred and heated by a hot iron. Flip dog, an iron used, when heated, to warm flip.  To toss or fillip; as, to flip up a cent. As when your little ones Do 'twixt their fingers flip their cherry stones. W. Browne.
spendthrift: One who spends money profusely or improvidently; a prodigal; one who lavishes or wastes his estate. Also used figuratively. A woman who was a generous spendthrift of life. Mrs. R. H. Davis.  Prodigal; extravagant; wasteful.
inveigle: To lead astray as if blind; to persuade to something evil by deceptive arts or flattery; to entice; to insnare; to seduce; to wheedle. Yet have they many baits and guileful spells To inveigle and invite the un unwary sense. Milton.
imbroglio: 1. An intricate, complicated plot, as of a drama or work of fiction. 2. A complicated and embarrassing state of things; a serious misunderstanding. Wrestling to free itself from the baleful imbroglio. Carlyle.
peruse: 1. To observe; to examine with care. [R.] Myself I then perused, and limb by limb Surveyed. Milton. 2. To read through; to read carefully. Shak.
pernicious: Quick; swift (to burn). [R.] Milton.  Having the quality of injuring or killing; destructive; very mischievous; baleful; malicious; wicked. Let this pernicious hour Stand aye accursed in the calendar. Shak. Pernicious to his health. Prescott. Syn. -- Destructive; ruinous; deadly; noxious; injurious; baneful; deleterious; hurtful; mischievous. -- Per*ni"cious*ly, adv., -- Per*ni"cious*ness, n.
calumny: False accusation of a crime or offense, maliciously made or reported, to the injury of another; malicious misrepresentation; slander; detraction. "Infamouse calumnies." Motley. Be thou as chaste as ice, as pure as snow, thou shalt not escape calumny. Shak.
senescence: The state of growing old; decay by time.
nexus: Connection; tie. Man is doubtless one by some subtile nexus ... extending from the new-born infant to the superannuated dotard. De Quincey.
dross: 1. The scum or refuse matter which is thrown off, or falls from, metals in smelting the ore, or in the process of melting; recrement. 2. Rust of metals. [R.] Addison. 3. Waste matter; any worthless matter separated from the better part; leavings; dregs; refuse. All world's glory is but dross unclean. Spenser. At the devil's booth are all things sold, Each ounce of dross coats its ounce of gold. Lowell.
fatuous: 1. Feeble in mind; weak; silly; stupid; foolish; fatuitous. Glanvill. 2. Without reality; illusory, like the ignis fatuus. Thence fatuous fires and meteors take their birth. Danham.
consummate: Carried to the utmost extent or degree; of the highest quality; complete; perfect. "A man of perfect and consummate virtue." Addison. The little band held the post with consummate tenacity. Motley  To bring to completion; to raise to the highest point or degree; to complete; to finish; to perfect; to achieve. To consummate this business happily. Shak.
sordid: 1. Filthy; foul; dirty. [Obs.] A sordid god; down from his hoary chin A length of beard descends, uncombed, unclean. Dryden. 2. Vile; base; gross; mean; as, vulgar, sordid mortals. "To scorn the sordid world." Milton. 3. Meanly avaricious; covetous; niggardly. He may be old, And yet sordid, who refuses gold. Sir J. Denham.
malleable: Capable of being extended or shaped by beating with a hammer, or by the pressure of rollers; -- applied to metals. Malleable iron, iron that is capable of extension or of being shaped under the hammer; decarbonized cast iron. See under Iron. -- Malleable iron castings, articles cast from pig iron and made malleable by heating then for several days in the presence of some substance, as hematite, which deprives the cast iron of some of its carbon.
stupefy: 1. To make stupid; to make dull; to blunt the faculty of perception or understanding in; to deprive of sensibility; to make torpid. The fumes of drink discompose and stupefy the brain. South. 2. To deprive of material mobility. [Obs.] It is not malleable; but yet is not fluent, but stupefied. Bacon.
renege: To deny; to disown. [Obs.] Shak. All Europe high (all sorts of rights reneged) Against the trith and thee unholy leagued. Sylvester.  1. To deny. [Obs.] Shak. 2. (Card Playing)  To revoke. [R.]
sidereal: 1. Relating to the stars; starry; astral; as, sidereal astronomy. 2. (Astron.)  Measuring by the apparent motion of the stars; designated, marked out, or accompanied, by a return to the same position in respect to the stars; as, the sidereal revolution of a planet; a sidereal day. Sidereal clock, day, month, year. See under Clock, Day, etc. -- Sideral time, time as reckoned by sideral days, or, taking the sidereal day as the unit, the time elapsed since a transit of the vernal equinox, reckoned in parts of a sidereal day. This is, strictly, apparent sidereal time, mean sidereal time being reckoned from the transit, not of the true, but of the mean, equinoctial point.
color: 1. A property depending on the relations of light to the eye, by which individual and specific differences in the hues and tints of objects are apprehended in vision; as, gay colors; sad colors, etc. Note: The sensation of color depends upon a peculiar function of the retina or optic nerve, in consequence of which rays of light produce different effects according to the length of their waves or undulations, waves of a certain length producing the sensation of red, shorter waves green, and those still shorter blue, etc. White, or ordinary, light consists of waves of various lengths so blended as to produce no effect of color, and the color of objects depends upon their power to absorb or reflect a greater or less proportion of the rays which fall upon them. 2. Any hue distinguished from white or black. 3. The hue or color characteristic of good health and spirits; ruddy complexion. Give color to my pale cheek. Shak. 4. That which is used to give color; a paint; a pigment; as, oil colors or water colors. 5. That which covers or hides the real character of anything; semblance; excuse; disguise; appearance. They had let down the boat into the sea, under color as though they would have cast anchors out of the foreship. Acts xxvii. 30. That he should die is worthy policy; But yet we want a color for his death. Shak. 6. Shade or variety of character; kind; species. Boys and women are for the most part cattle of this color. Shak. 7. A distinguishing badge, as a flag or similar symbol (usually in the plural); as, the colors or color of a ship or regiment; the colors of a race horse (that is, of the cap and jacket worn by the jockey). In the United States each regiment of infantry and artillery has two colors, one national and one regimental. Farrow. 8. (Law)  An apparent right; as where the defendant in trespass gave to the plaintiff an appearance of title, by stating his title specially, thus removing the cause from the jury to the court. Blackstone. Note: Color is express when it is asverred in the pleading, and implied when it is implied in the pleading. Body color. See under Body. -- Color blindness, total or partial inability to distinguish or recognize colors. See Daltonism. -- Complementary color, one of two colors so related to each other that when blended together they produce white light; -- so called because each color makes up to the other what it lacks to make it white. Artificial or pigment colors, when mixed, produce effects differing from those of the primary colors, in consequence of partial absorption. -- Of color (as persons, races, etc.), not of the white race; -- commonly meaning, esp. in the United States, of negro blood, pure or mixed. -- Primary colors, those developed from the solar beam by the prism, viz., red, orange, yellow, green, blue, indigo, and violet, which are reduced by some authors to three, -- red, green, and violet-blue. These three are sometimes called fundamental colors. -- Subjective or Accidental color, a false or spurious color seen in some instances, owing to the persistence of the luminous impression upon the retina, and a gradual change of its character, as where a wheel perfectly white, and with a circumference regulary subdiveded, is made to revolve rapidly over a dark object, the teeth, of the wheel appear to the eye of different shades of color varying with the rapidity of rotation. See Accidental colors, under Accidental.  1. To change or alter the bue or tint of, by dyeing, staining, painting, etc.; to dye; to tinge; to aint; to stain. The rays, to speak properly, are not colored; in them there is nothing else than a certain power and disposition to stir up a sensation of this or that color. Sir I. Newton. 2. To change or alter, as if by dyeing or painting; to give a false appearance to; usually, to give a specious appearance to; to cause to appear attractive; to make plausible; to palliate or excuse; as, the facts were colored by his prejudices. He colors the falsehood of Æneas by an express command from Jupiter to forsake the queen. Dryden. 3. To hide. [Obs.] That by his fellowship he color might Both his estate and love from skill of any wight. Spenser.  To acquire color; to turn red, especially in the face; to blush.
grouse: ) Any of the numerous species of gallinaceous birds of the family Tetraonidæ, and subfamily Tetraoninæ, inhabiting Europe, Asia, and North America. They have plump bodies, strong, well-feathered legs, and usually mottled plumage. The group includes the ptarmigans (Lagopus), having feathered feet. Note: Among the European species are the red grouse (Lagopus Scoticus) and the hazel grouse (Bonasa betulina). See Capercaidzie, Ptarmigan, and Heath grouse. Among the most important American species are the ruffed grouse, or New England partridge (Bonasa umbellus); the sharp-tailed grouse (Pediocætes phasianellus) of the West; the dusky blue, or pine grouse (Dendragapus obscurus) of the Rocky Mountains; the Canada grouse, or spruce partridge (D. Canadensis). See also Prairie hen, and Sage cock. The Old World sand grouse (Pterocles, etc.) belong to a very different family. See Pterocletes, and Sand grouse.  To seek or shoot grouse.
verisimilitude: The quality or state of being verisimilar; the appearance of truth; probability; likelihood. Verisimilitude and opinion are an easy purchase; but true knowledge is dear and difficult. Glanvill. All that gives verisimilitude to a narrative. Sir. W. Scott.
distention: 1. The act of distending; the act of stretching in breadth or in all directions; the state of being Distended; as, the distention of the lungs. 2. Breadth; extent or space occupied by the thing distended.
imbibe: 1. To drink in; to absorb; to suck or take in; to receive as by drinking; as, a person imbibes drink, or a sponge imbibes moisture. 2. To receive or absorb into the mind and retain; as, to imbibe principles; to imbibe errors. 3. To saturate; to imbue. [Obs.] "Earth, imbibed with . . . acid." Sir I. Newton.
desultory: 1. Leaping or skipping about. [Obs.] I shot at it [a bird], but it was so desultory that I missed my aim. Gilbert White. 2. Jumping, or passing, from one thing or subject to another, without order or rational connection; without logical sequence; disconnected; immethodical; aimless; as, desultory minds. Atterbury. He [Goldsmith] knew nothing accurately; his reading had been desultory. Macaulay. 3. Out of course; by the way; as a digression; not connected with the subject; as, a desultory remark. Syn. -- Rambling; roving; immethodical; discursive; inconstant; unsettled; cursory; slight; hasty; loose.
indolent: 1. Free from toil, pain, or trouble. [Obs.] 2. Indulging in ease; avoiding labor and exertion; habitually idle; lazy; inactive; as, an indolent man. To waste long nights in indolent repose. Pope. 3. (Med.)  Causing little or no pain or annoyance; as, an indolent tumor. Syn. -- Idle; lazy; slothful; sluggish; listless; inactive; inert. See Idle.
redoubtable: Formidable; dread; terrible to foes; as, a redoubtable hero; hence, valiant; -- often in contempt or burlesque. [Written also redoutable.]
rankle: 1. To become, or be, rank; to grow rank or strong; to be inflamed; to fester; -- used literally and figuratively. A malady that burns and rankles inward. Rowe. This would have left a rankling wound in the hearts of the people. Burke. 2. To produce a festering or inflamed effect; to cause a sore; -- used literally and figuratively; as, a splinter rankles in the flesh; the words rankled in his bosom.  To cause to fester; to make sore; to inflame. [R.] Beau. & Fl.
mercurial: 1. Having the qualities fabled to belong to the god Mercury; swift; active; sprightly; fickle; volatile; changeable; as, a mercurial youth; a mercurial temperament. A mercurial man Who fluttered over all things like a fan. Byron. 2. Having the form or image of Mercury; -- applied to ancient guideposts. [Obs.] Chillingworth. 3. Of or pertaining to Mercury as the god of trade; hence, money- making; crafty. The mercurial wand of commerce. J. Q. Adams. 4. Of or pertaining to, or containing, mercury; as, mercurial preparations, barometer. See Mercury, 2. 5. (Med.)  Caused by the use of mercury; as, mercurial sore mouth.  1. A person having mercurial qualities. Bacon. 2. (Med.)  A preparation containing mercury.
quash: Same as Squash.  To abate, annul, overthrow, or make void; as, to quash an indictment. Blackstone.  1. To beat down, or beat in pieces; to dash forcibly; to crush. The whales Against sharp rocks, like reeling vessels, quashed, Though huge as mountains, are in pieces dashed. Waller. 2. To crush; to subdue; to suppress or extinguish summarily and completely; as, to quash a rebellion. Contrition is apt to quash or allay all worldly grief. Barrow.  To be shaken, or dashed about, with noise.
ostentatious: Fond of, or evincing, ostentation; unduly conspicuous; pretentious; boastful. Far from being ostentatious of the good you do. Dryden. The ostentatious professions of many years. Macaulay. -- Os`ten*ta"tious*ly, adv. -- Os`ten*ta"tious*ness, n.
propensity: The quality or state of being propense; natural inclination; disposition to do good or evil; bias; bent; tendency. "A propensity to utter blasphemy." Macaulay. Syn. -- Disposition; bias; inclination; proclivity; proneness; bent; tendency.
meretricious: 1. Of or pertaining to prostitutes; having to do with harlots; lustful; as, meretricious traffic. 2. Resembling the arts of a harlot; alluring by false show; gaudily and deceitfully ornamental; tawdry; as, meretricious dress or ornaments. -- Mer`e*tri"cious*ly, adv. -- Mer`e*tri"cious*ness, n.
libertine: 1. (Rom. Antiq.)  A manumitted slave; a freedman; also, the son of a freedman. 2. (Eccl. Hist.)  One of a sect of Anabaptists, in the fifteenth and early part of the sixteenth century, who rejected many of the customs and decencies of life, and advocated a community of goods and of women. 3. One free from restraint; one who acts according to his impulses and desires; now, specifically, one who gives rein to lust; a rake; a debauchee. Like a puffed and reckless libertine, Himself the primrose path of dalliance treads. Shak. 4. A defamatory name for a freethinker. [Obsoles.]  1. Free from restraint; uncontrolled. [Obs.] You are too much libertine. Beau. & Fl. 2. Dissolute; licentious; profligate; loose in morals; as, libertine principles or manners. Bacon.
amenable: 1. (Old Law)  Easy to be led; governable, as a woman by her husband. [Obs.] Jacob. 2. Liable to be brought to account or punishment; answerable; responsible; accountable; as, amenable to law. Nor is man too diminutive . . . to be amenable to the divine government. I. Taylor. 3. Liable to punishment, a charge, a claim, etc. 4. Willing to yield or submit; responsive; tractable. Sterling . . . always was amenable enough to counsel. Carlyle.
synthesis: 1. Composition, or the putting of two or more things together, as in compounding medicines. 2. (Chem.)  The art or process of making a compound by putting the ingredients together, as contrasted with analysis; thus, water is made by synthesis from hydrogen and oxygen; hence, specifically, the building up of complex compounds by special reactions, whereby their component radicals are so grouped that the resulting substances are identical in every respect with the natural articles when such occur; thus, artificial alcohol, urea, indigo blue, alizarin, etc., are made by synthesis. 3. (Logic)  The combination of separate elements of thought into a whole, as of simple into complex conceptions, species into genera, individual propositions into systems; -- the opposite of Ant: analysis. Analysis and synthesis, though commonly treated as two different methods, are, if properly understood, only the two necessary parts of the same method. Each is the relative and correlative of the other. Sir W. Hamilton.
acrimonious: 1. Acrid; corrosive; as, acrimonious gall. [Archaic] Harvey. 2. Caustic; bitter-tempered' sarcastic; as, acrimonious dispute, language, temper.
prescience: Knowledge of events before they take place; foresight. God's certain prescience of the volitions of moral agents. J. Edwards.
rue: 1. (Bot.)  A perennial suffrutescent plant (Ruta graveolens), having a strong, heavy odor and a bitter taste; herb of grace. It is used in medicine. Then purged with euphrasy and rue The visual nerve, for he had much to see. Milton. They [the exorcists] are to try the devil by holy water, incense, sulphur, rue, which from thence, as we suppose, came to be called herb of grace. Jer. Taylor. 2. Fig.: Bitterness; disappointment; grief; regret. Goat's rue. See under Goat. -- Rue anemone, a pretty springtime flower (Thalictrum anemonides) common in the United States. -- Wall rue, a little fern (Asplenium Ruta-muraria) common on walls in Europe.  1. To lament; to regret extremely; to grieve for or over. Chaucer. I wept to see, and rued it from my heart. Chapmen. Thy will Chose freely what it now so justly rues. Milton. 2. To cause to grieve; to afflict. [Obs.] "God wot, it rueth me." Chaucer. 3. To repent of, and withdraw from, as a bargain; to get released from. [Prov. Eng.]  1. To have compassion. [Obs.] God so wisly [i. e., truly] on my soul rue. Chaucer. Which stirred men's hearts to rue upon them. Ridley. 2. To feel sorrow and regret; to repent. Work by counsel and thou shalt not rue. Chaucer. Old year, we'll dearly rue for you. Tennyson.  Sorrow; repetance. [Obs.] Shak.
dormant: 1. Sleeping; as, a dormant animal; hence, not in action or exercise; quiescent; at rest; in abeyance; not disclosed, asserted, or insisted on; as, dormant passions; dormant claims or titles. It is by lying dormant a long time, or being . . . very rarely exercised, that arbitrary power steals upon a people. Burke. 2. (Her.)  In a sleeping posture; as, a lion dormant; -- distinguished from couchant. Dormant partner (Com.), a partner who takes no share in the active business of a company or partnership, but is entitled to a share of the profits, and subject to a share in losses; -- called also sleeping or silent partner. -- Dormant window (Arch.), a dormer window. See Dormer. -- Table dormant, a stationary table. [Obs.] Chaucer.  A large beam in the roof of a house upon which portions of the other timbers rest or " sleep." Arch. Pub. Soc. -- Called also dormant tree, dorman tree, dormond, and dormer. Halliwell.
diffident: 1. Wanting confidence in others; distrustful. [Archaic] You were always extremely diffident of their success. Melmoth. 2. Wanting confidence in one's self; distrustful of one's own powers; not self-reliant; timid; modest; bashful; characterized by modest reserve. The diffident maidens, Folding their hands in prayer. Longfellow. Syn. -- Distrustful; suspicious; hesitating; doubtful; modest; bashful; lowly; reserved.
cabal: 1. Tradition; occult doctrine. See Cabala [Obs.] Hakewill. 2. A secret. [Obs.] "The measuring of the temple, a cabal found out but lately." B. Jonson. 3. A number of persons united in some close design, usually to promote their private views and interests in church or state by intrigue; a secret association composed of a few designing persons; a junto. Note: It so happend, by a whimsical coincidence, that in 1671 the cabinet consisted of five persons, the initial letters of whose names made up the word cabal; Clifford, Arlington, Buckingham, Ashley, and Lauderdale. Macaulay. 4. The secret artifices or machinations of a few persons united in a close design; in intrigue. By cursed cabals of women. Dryden. Syn. - Junto; intrigue; plot; combination; conspiracy. -- Cabal, Combination, Faction. An association for some purpose considered to be bad is the idea common to these terms. A combination is an organized union of individuals for mutual support, in urging their demands or resisting the claims of others, and may be good or bad according to circumstances; as, a combiniation of workmen or of employers to effect or to prevent a chang in prices. A cabal is a secret association of a few individuals who seek by cunning practices to obtain office and power. A faction is a larger body than a cabal, employed for selfish purposes in agitating the community and working up an excitement with a view to change the existing order of things. "Selfishness, insubordination, and laxity of morals give rise to combinations, which belong particularly to the lower orders of society. Restless, jealous, ambitious, and little minds are ever forming cabals. Factions belong especially to free governments, and are raised by busy and turbulent spirits for selfish porposes". Crabb.  To unite in a small party to promote private views and interests by intrigue; to intrigue; to plot. Caballing still against it with the great. Dryden.
rhetoric: 1. The art of composition; especially, elegant composition in prose. 2. Oratory; the art of speaking with propriety, elegance, and force. Locke. 3. Hence, artificial eloquence; fine language or declamation without conviction or earnest feeling. 4. Fig. : The power of persuasion or attraction; that which allures or charms. Sweet, silent rhetoric of persuading eyes. Daniel.
fracas: An uproar; a noisy quarrel; a disturbance; a brawl.
expiate: 1. To extinguish the guilt of by sufferance of penalty or some equivalent; to make complete satisfaction for; to atone for; to make amends for; to make expiation for; as, to expiate a crime, a guilt, or sin. To expiate his treason, hath naught left. Milton. The Treasurer obliged himself to expiate the injury. Clarendon. 2. To purify with sacred rites. [Obs.] Neither let there be found among you any one that shall expiate his son or daughter, making them to pass through the fire. Deut. xviii. 10 (Douay version)  Terminated. [Obs.] Shak.
execrate: To denounce evil against, or to imprecate evil upon; to curse; to protest against as unholy or detestable; hence, to detest utterly; to abhor; to abominate. "They . . . execrate their lct." Cowper.
iniquity: 1. Absence of, or deviation from, just dealing; want of rectitude or uprightness; gross injustice; unrighteousness; wickedness; as, the iniquity of bribery; the iniquity of an unjust judge. Till the world from his perfection fell Into all filth and foul iniquity. Spenser. 2. An iniquitous act or thing; a deed of injustice o Milton. Your iniquities have separated between you and your God. Is. lix. 2. 3. A character or personification in the old English moralities, or moral dramas, having the name sometimes of one vice and sometimes of another. See Vice. Acts old Iniquity, and in the fit Of miming gets the opinion of a wit. B. Jonson.
benignant: Kind; gracious; favorable. -- Be*nig"nant*ly, adv.
denouement: 1. The unraveling or discovery of a plot; the catastrophe, especially of a drama or a romance. 2. The solution of a mystery; issue; outcome.
sophistry: 1. The art or process of reasoning; logic. [Obs.] 2. The practice of a sophist; fallacious reasoning; reasoning sound in appearance only. The juggle of sophistry consists, for the most part, in usig a word in one sense in the premise, and in another sense in the conclusion. Coleridge. Syn. -- See Fallacy.
heretical: Containing heresy; of the nature of, or characterized by, heresy.
bolster: 1. A long pillow or cushion, used to support the head of a person lying on a bed; -- generally laid under the pillows. And here I'll fling the pillow, there the bolster, This way the coverlet, another way the sheets. Shak. 2. A pad, quilt, or anything used to hinder pressure, support any part of the body, or make a bandage sit easy upon a wounded part; a compress. This arm shall be a bolster for thy head. Gay. 3. Anything arranged to act as a support, as in various forms of mechanism, etc. 4. (Saddlery)  A cushioned or a piece part of a saddle. 5. (Naut.) (a) A cushioned or a piece of soft wood covered with tarred canvas, placed on the trestletrees and against the mast, for the collars of the shrouds to rest on, to prevent chafing. (b) Anything used to prevent chafing. 6. A plate of iron or a mass of wood under the end of a bridge girder, to keep the girder from resting directly on the abutment. 7. A transverse bar above the axle of a wagon, on which the bed or body rests. 8. The crossbeam forming the bearing piece of the body of a railway car; the central and principal cross beam of a car truck. 9. (Mech.)  the perforated plate in a punching machine on which anything rests when being punched. 10. (Cutlery) (a) That part of a knife blade which abuts upon the end of the handle. (b) The metallic end of a pocketknife handle. G. Francis. 11. (Arch.)  The rolls forming the ends or sides of the Ionic capital. G. Francis. 12. (Mil.)  A block of wood on the carriage of a siege gun, upon which the breech of the gun rests when arranged for transportation. Note: [See Illust. of Gun carriage.] Bolster work (Arch.), members which are bellied or curved outward like cushions, as in friezes of certain classical styles.  1. To support with a bolster or pillow. S. Sharp. 2. To support, hold up, or maintain with difficulty or unusual effort; -- often with up. To bolster baseness. Drayton. Shoddy inventions designed to bolster up a factitious pride. Compton Reade.
contrite: 1. Thoroughly bruised or broken. [Obs.] 2. Broken down with grief and penitence; deeply sorrowful for sin because it is displeasing to God; humbly and thoroughly penitent. A contrite heart, O God, thou wilt not despise. Ps. li. 17. Be penitent, and for thy fault contrite. Milton. Syn. -- Penitent; repentant; humble; sorrowful.  A contrite person. Hooker.  In a contrite manner.
pragmatic: 1. Of or pertaining to business or to affairs; of the nature of business; practical; material; businesslike in habit or manner. The next day . . . I began to be very pragmatical. Evelyn. We can not always be contemplative, diligent, or pragmatical, abroad; but have need of some delightful intermissions. Milton. Low, pragmatical, earthly views of the gospel. Hare. 2. Busy; specifically, busy in an objectionable way; officious; fussy and positive; meddlesome. "Pragmatical officers of justice." Sir W. Scott. The fellow grew so pragmatical that he took upon him the government of my whole family. Arbuthnot. 3. Philosophical; dealing with causes, reasons, and effects, rather than with details and circumstances; -- said of literature. "Pragmatic history." Sir W. Hamilton. "Pragmatic poetry." M. Arnold. Pragmatic sanction, a solemn ordinance or decree issued by the head or legislature of a state upon weighty matters; -- a term derived from the Byzantine empire. In European history, two decrees under this name are particularly celebrated. One of these, issued by Charles VII. of France, A. D. 1438, was the foundation of the liberties of the Gallican church; the other, issued by Charles VI. of Germany, A. D. 1724, settled his hereditary dominions on his eldest daughter, the Archduchess Maria Theresa.  1. One skilled in affairs. My attorney and solicitor too; a fine pragmatic. B. Jonson. 2. A solemn public ordinance or decree. A royal pragmatic was accordingly passed. Prescott.
toady: 1. A mean flatterer; a toadeater; a sycophant. Before I had been standing at the window five minutes, they somehow conveyed to me that they were all toadies and humbugs. Dickens. 2. A coarse, rustic woman. [R.] Sir W. Scott.  To fawn upon with mean sycophancy.
lumber: 1. A pawnbroker's shop, or room for storing articles put in pawn; hence, a pledge, or pawn. [Obs.] They put all the little plate they had in the lumber, which is pawning it, till the ships came. Lady Murray. 2. Old or refuse household stuff; things cumbrous, or bulky and useless, or of small value. 3. Timber sawed or split into the form of beams, joists, boards, planks, staves, hoops, etc.; esp., that which is smaller than heavy timber. [U.S.] Lumber kiln, a room in which timber or lumber is dried by artificial heat. [U.S.] -- Lumber room, a room in which unused furniture or other lumber is kept. [U.S.] -- Lumber wagon, a heavy rough wagon, without springs, used for general farmwork, etc.  1. To heap together in disorder. " Stuff lumbered together." Rymer. 2. To fill or encumber with lumber; as, to lumber up a room.  1. To move heavily, as if burdened. 2. Etym: [Cf. dial. Sw. lomra to resound.]  To make a sound as if moving heavily or clumsily; to rumble. Cowper. 3. To cut logs in the forest, or prepare timber for market. [U.S.]
parsimonious: Exhibiting parsimony; sparing in expenditure of money; frugal to excess; penurious; niggardly; stingy. -- Par`si*mo"ni*ous*ly, adv. -- Par`si*mo"ni*ous*ness, n. A prodigal king is nearer a tyrant than a parsimonious. Bacon. Extraordinary funds for one campaign may spare us the expense of many years; whereas a long, parsimonious war will drain us of more men and money. Addison. Syn. -- Covetous; niggardly; miserly; penurious; close; saving; mean; stingy; frugal. See Avaricious.
accolade: 1. A ceremony formerly used in conferring knighthood, consisting am embrace, and a slight blow on the shoulders with the flat blade of a sword. 2. (Mus.)  A brace used to join two or more staves.
rancorous: Full of rancor; evincing, or caused by, rancor; deeply malignant; implacably spiteful or malicious; intensely virulent. So flamed his eyes with rage and rancorous ire. Spenser.
remonstrate: To point out; to show clearly; to make plain or manifest; hence, to prove; to demonstrate. [Obs.] Jer. Taylor. I will remonstrate to you the third door. B. Jonson.  To present and urge reasons in opposition to an act, measure, or any course of proceedings; to expostulate; as, to remonstrate with a person regarding his habits; to remonstrate against proposed taxation. It is proper business of a divine to state cases of conscience, and to remonstrate against any growing corruptions in practice, and especially in principles. Waterland. Syn. -- Expostulate, Remonstrate. These words are commonly interchangeable, the principal difference being that expostulate is now used especially to signify remonstrance by a superior or by one in authority. A son remonstrates against the harshness of a father; a father expostulates with his son on his waywardness. Subjects remonstrate with their rulers; sovereigns expostulate with the parliament or the people.
mendicant: Practicing beggary; begging; living on alms; as, mendicant friars. Mendicant orders (R. C. Ch.), certain monastic orders which are forbidden to acquire landed property and are required to be supported by alms, esp. the Franciscans, the Dominicans, the Carmelites, and the Augustinians.  A beggar; esp., one who makes a business of begging; specifically, a begging friar.
empirical: 1. Pertaining to, or founded upon, experiment or experience; depending upon the observation of phenomena; versed in experiments. In philosophical language, the term empirical means simply what belongs to or is the product of experience or observation. Sir W. Hamilton. The village carpenter . . . lays out his work by empirical rules learnt in his apprenticeship. H. Spencer. 2. Depending upon experience or observation alone, without due regard to science and theory; -- said especially of medical practice, remedies, etc.; wanting in science and deep insight; as, empiric skill, remedies. Empirical formula. (Chem.) See under Formula. Syn. -- See Transcendental.
schism: Division or separation; specifically (Eccl.), permanent division or separation in the Christian church; breach of unity among people of the same religious faith; the offense of seeking to produce division in a church without justifiable cause. Set bounds to our passions by reason, to our errors by truth, and to our schisms by charity. Eikon Basilike. Greek schism (Eccl.), the separation of the Greek and Roman churches. -- Great schism, or Western schism (Eccl.) a schism in the church in the latter part of the 14th century, on account of rival claimants to the papal throne. -- Schism act (Law), an act of the English Parliament requiring all teachers to conform to the Established Church, -- passed in 1714, repealed in 1719.
reverent: 1. Disposed to revere; impressed with reverence; submissive; humble; respectful; as, reverent disciples. "They . . . prostrate fell before him reverent." Milton. 2. Expressing reverence, veneration, devotion, or submission; as, reverent words; reverent behavior. Joye.
dissemble: 1. To hide under a false semblance or seeming; to feign (something) not to be what it really is; to put an untrue appearance upon; to disguise; to mask. Dissemble all your griefs and discontents. Shak. Perhaps it was right to dissemble your love, But -- why did you kick me down stairs J. P. Kemble. 2. To put on the semblance of; to make pretense of; to simulate; to feign. He soon dissembled a sleep. Tatler. Syn. -- To conceal; disguise; cloak; cover; equivocate. See Conceal.  To conceal the real fact, motives, He that hateth dissembleth with his lips. Prov. xxvi. 24. He [an enemy] dissembles when he assumes an air of friendship. C. J. Smith.
dynamo: A dynamo-electric machine.
apostate: 1. One who has forsaken the faith, principles, or party, to which he before adhered; esp., one who has forsaken his religion for another; a pervert; a renegade. 2. (R. C. Ch.)  One who, after having received sacred orders, renounces his clerical profession.  Pertaining to, or characterized by, apostasy; faithless to moral allegiance; renegade. So spake the apostate angel. Milton. A wretched and apostate state. Steele.  To apostatize. [Obs.] We are not of them which apostate from Christ. Bp. Hall.
adulterate: 1. To defile by adultery. [Obs.] Milton. 2. To corrupt, debase, or make impure by an admixture of a foreign or a baser substance; as, to adulterate food, drink, drugs, coin, etc. The present war has . . . adulterated our tongue with strange words. Spectator. Syn. -- To corrupt; defile; debase; contaminate; vitiate; sophisticate.  To commit adultery. [Obs.]  1. Tainted with adultery. 2. Debased by the admixture of a foreign substance; adulterated; spurious. -- A*dul"ter*ate*ly, adv. -- A*dul"ter*ate*ness, n.
tender: 1. One who tends; one who takes care of any person or thing; a nurse. 2. (Naut.)  A vessel employed to attend other vessels, to supply them with provisions and other stores, to convey intelligence, or the like. 3. A car attached to a locomotive, for carrying a supply of fuel and water.  1. (Law)  To offer in payment or satisfaction of a demand, in order to save a penalty or forfeiture; as, to tender the amount of rent or debt. 2. To offer in words; to present for acceptance. You see how all conditions, how all minds, . . . tender down Their services to Lord Timon. Shak.  1. (Law)  An offer, either of money to pay a debt, or of service to be performed, in order to save a penalty or forfeiture, which would be incurred by nonpayment or nonperformance; as, the tender of rent due, or of the amount of a note, with interest. Note: To constitute a legal tender, such money must be offered as the law prescribes. So also the tender must be at the time and place where the rent or debt ought to be paid, and it must be to the full amount due. 2. Any offer or proposal made for acceptance; as, a tender of a loan, of service, or of friendship; a tender of a bid for a contract. A free, unlimited tender of the gospel. South. 3. The thing offered; especially, money offered in payment of an obligation. Shak. Legal tender. See under Legal. -- Tender of issue (Law), a form of words in a pleading, by which a party offers to refer the question raised upon it to the appropriate mode of decision. Burrill.  1. Easily impressed, broken, bruised, or injured; not firm or hard; delicate; as, tender plants; tender flesh; tender fruit. 2. Sensible to impression and pain; easily pained. Our bodies are not naturally more tender than our faces. L'Estrange. 3. Physically weak; not hardly or able to endure hardship; immature; effeminate. The tender and delicate woman among you. Deut. xxviii. 56. 4. Susceptible of the softer passions, as love, compassion, kindness; compassionate; pitiful; anxious for another's good; easily excited to pity, forgiveness, or favor; sympathetic. The Lord is very pitiful, and of tender mercy. James v. 11. I am choleric by my nature, and tender by my temper. Fuller. 5. Exciting kind concern; dear; precious. I love Valentine, Whose life's as tender to me as my soul! Shak. 6. Careful to save inviolate, or not to injure; -- with of. "Tender of property." Burke. The civil authority should be tender of the honor of God and religion. Tillotson. 7. Unwilling to cause pain; gentle; mild. You, that are thus so tender o'er his follies, Will never do him good. Shak. 8. Adapted to excite feeling or sympathy; expressive of the softer passions; pathetic; as, tender expressions; tender expostulations; a tender strain. 9. Apt to give pain; causing grief or pain; delicate; as, a tender subject. "Things that are tender and unpleasing." Bacon. 10. (Naut.)  Heeling over too easily when under sail; -- said of a vessel. Note: Tender is sometimes used in the formation of self-explaining compounds; as, tender-footed, tender-looking, tender-minded, tender- mouthed, and the like. Syn. -- Delicate; effeminate; soft; sensitive; compassionate; kind; humane; merciful; pitiful.  Regard; care; kind concern. [Obs.] Shak.  To have a care of; to be tender toward; hence, to regard; to esteem; to value. [Obs.] For first, next after life, he tendered her good. Spenser. Tender yourself more dearly. Shak. To see a prince in want would move a miser's charity. Our western princes tendered his case, which they counted might be their own. Fuller.
exasperation: 1. The act of exasperating or the state of being exasperated; irritation; keen or bitter anger. Extorted from him by the exasperation of his spirits. South. 2. Increase of violence or malignity; aggravation; exacerbation. "Exasperation of the fits." Sir H. Wotton.
onerous: Burdensome; oppressive. "Too onerous a solicitude." I. Taylor. Onerous cause (Scots Law), a good and legal consideration; -- opposed to gratuitous.
occlude: 1. To shut up; to close. Sir T. Browne. 2. (Chem.)  To take in and retain; to absorb; -- said especially with respect to gases; as iron, platinum, and palladium occlude large volumes of hydrogen.
allay: 1. To make quiet or put at rest; to pacify or appease; to quell; to calm; as, to allay popular excitement; to allay the tumult of the passions. 2. To alleviate; to abate; to mitigate; as, to allay the severity of affliction or the bitterness of adversity. It would allay the burning quality of that fell poison. Shak. Syn. -- To alleviate; check; repress; assuage; appease; abate; subdue; destroy; compose; soothe; calm; quiet. See Alleviate.  To diminish in strength; to abate; to subside. "When the rage allays." Shak.  Alleviation; abatement; check. [Obs.]  Alloy. [Obs.] Chaucer.  To mix (metals); to mix with a baser metal; to alloy; to deteriorate. [Archaic] Fuller.
audacious: 1. Daring; spirited; adventurous. As in a cloudy chair, ascending rides Audacious. Milton. 2. Contemning the restraints of law, religion, or decorum; bold in wickedness; presumptuous; impudent; insolent. " Audacious traitor." Shak. " Such audacious neighborhood." Milton. 3. Committed with, or proceedings from, daring effrontery or contempt of law, morality, or decorum. "Audacious cruelty." "Audacious prate." Shak.
founder: One who founds, establishes, and erects; one who lays a foundation; an author; one from whom anything originates; one who endows.  One who founds; one who casts metals in various forms; a caster; as, a founder of cannon, bells, hardware, or types. Fonder's dust. Same as Facing, 4. -- Founder's sand, a kind of sand suitable for purposes of molding.  1. (Naut.)  To become filled with water, and sink, as a ship. 2. To fall; to stumble and go lame, as a horse. For which his horse fearé gan to turn, And leep aside, and foundrede as he leep. Chaucer. 3. To fail; to miscarry. "All his tricks founder." Shak.  To cause internal inflammation and soreness in the feet or limbs of (a horse), so as to disable or lame him.  (a) A lameness in the foot of a horse, occasioned by inflammation; closh. (b) An inflammatory fever of the body, or acute rheumatism; as, chest founder. See Chest ffounder. James White.
aberrant: See Aberr.] 1. Wandering; straying from the right way. 2. (Biol.)  Deviating from the ordinary or natural type; exceptional; abnormal. The more aberrant any form is, the greater must have been the number of connecting forms which, on my theory, have been exterminated. Darwin.
redress: To dress again.  1. To put in order again; to set right; to emend; to revise. [R.] The common profit could she redress. Chaucer. In yonder spring of roses intermixed With myrtle, find what to redress till noon. Milton. Your wish that I should redress a certain paper which you had prepared. A. Hamilton. 2. To set right, as a wrong; to repair, as an injury; to make amends for; to remedy; to relieve from. Those wrongs, those bitter injuries, . . . I doubt not but with honor to redress. Shak. 3. To make amends or compensation to; to relieve of anything unjust or oppressive; to bestow relief upon. "'T is thine, O king! the afflicted to redress." Dryden. Will Gaul or Muscovite redress ye Byron.  1. The act of redressing; a making right; reformation; correction; amendment. [R.] Reformation of evil laws is commendable, but for us the more necessary is a speedy redress of ourselves. Hooker. 2. A setting right, as of wrong, injury, or opression; as, the redress of grievances; hence, relief; remedy; reparation; indemnification. Shak. A few may complain without reason; but there is occasion for redress when the cry is universal. Davenant. 3. One who, or that which, gives relief; a redresser. Fair majesty, the refuge and redress Of those whom fate pursues and wants oppress. Dryden.
ubiquitous: Existing or being everywhere, or in all places, at the same time; omnipresent. -- U*biq"ui*tous*ly, adv. In this sense is he ubiquitous. R. D. Hitchcock.
bombastic: Characterized by bombast; highsounding; inflated. -- Bom*bas"tic*al*ly, adv. A theatrical, bombastic, windy phraseology. Burke. Syn. -- Turgid; tumid; pompous; grandiloquent.
die: 1. To pass from an animate to a lifeless state; to cease to live; to suffer a total and irreparable loss of action of the vital functions; to become dead; to expire; to perish; -- said of animals and vegetables; often with of, by, with, from, and rarely for, before the cause or occasion of death; as, to die of disease or hardships; to die by fire or the sword; to die with horror at the thought. To die by the roadside of grief and hunger. Macaulay. She will die from want of care. Tennyson. 2. To suffer death; to lose life. In due time Christ died for the ungodly. Rom. v. 6. 3. To perish in any manner; to cease; to become lost or extinct; to be extinguished. Letting the secret die within his own breast. Spectator. Great deeds can not die. Tennyson. 4. To sink; to faint; to pine; to languish, with weakness, discouragement, love, etc. His heart died within, and he became as a stone. 1 Sam. xxv. 37. The young men acknowledged, in love letters, that they died for Rebecca. Tatler. 5. To become indifferent; to cease to be subject; as, to die to pleasure or to sin. 6. To recede and grow fainter; to become imperceptible; to vanish; -- often with out or away. Blemishes may die away and disappear amidst the brightness. Spectator. 7. (Arch.)  To disappear gradually in another surface, as where moldings are lost in a sloped or curved face. 8. To become vapid, flat, or spiritless, as liquor. To die in the last ditch, to fight till death; to die rather than surrender. "There is one certain way," replied the Prince [William of Orange] " by which I can be sure never to see my country's ruin, -- I will die in the last ditch." Hume (Hist. of Eng. ). -- To die out, to cease gradually; as, the prejudice has died out. Syn. -- To expire; decease; perish; depart; vanish.  1. A small cube, marked on its faces with spots from one to six, and used in playing games by being shaken in a box and thrown from it. See Dice. 2. Any small cubical or square body. Words . . . pasted upon little flat tablets or dies. Watts. 3. That which is, or might be, determined, by a throw of the die; hazard; chance. Such is the die of war. Spenser. 4. (Arch.)  That part of a pedestal included between base and cornice; the dado. 5. (Mach.) (a) A metal or plate (often one of a pair) so cut or shaped as to give a certain desired form to, or impress any desired device on, an object or surface, by pressure or by a blow; used in forging metals, coining, striking up sheet metal, etc. (b) A perforated block, commonly of hardened steel used in connection with a punch, for punching holes, as through plates, or blanks from plates, or for forming cups or capsules, as from sheet metal, by drawing. (c) A hollow internally threaded screw-cutting tool, made in one piece or composed of several parts, for forming screw threads on bolts, etc.; one of the separate parts which make up such a tool. Cutting die (Mech.), a thin, deep steel frame, sharpened to a cutting edge, for cutting out articles from leather, cloth, paper, etc. -- The die is cast, the hazard must be run; the step is taken, and it is too late to draw back; the last chance is taken.
amalgamate: 1. To compound or mix, as quicksilver, with another metal; to unite, combine, or alloy with mercury. 2. To mix, so as to make a uniform compound; to unite or combine; as, to amalgamate two races; to amalgamate one race with another. Ingratitude is indeed their four cardinal virtues compacted and amalgamated into one. Burke.  1. To unite in an amalgam; to blend with another metal, as quicksilver. 2. To coalesce, as a result of growth; to combine into a uniform whole; to blend; as, two organs or parts amalgamate.  Coalesced; united; combined.
sanguine: 1. Having the color of blood; red. Of his complexion he was sanguine. Chaucer. Like to that sanguine flower inscribed with woe. Milton. 2. Characterized by abundance and active circulation of blood; as, a sanguine bodily temperament. 3. Warm; ardent; as, a sanguine temper. 4. Anticipating the best; not desponding; confident; full of hope; as, sanguine of success. Syn. -- Warm; ardent; lively; confident; hopeful.  1. Blood color; red. Spenser. 2. Anything of a blood-red, as cloth. [Obs.] In sanguine and in pes he clad was all. Chaucer. 3. (Min.)  Bloodstone. 4. Red crayon. See the Note under Crayon, 1.  To stain with blood; to impart the color of blood to; to ensanguine.  In a sanguine manner. I can not speculate quite so sanguinely as he does. Burke.
pristine: Belonging to the earliest period or state; original; primitive; primeval; as, the pristine state of innocence; the pristine manners of a people; pristine vigor.
luminous: 1. Shining; emitting or reflecting light; brilliant; bright; as, the is a luminous body; a luminous color. Fire burneth wood, making it . . . luminous. Bacon. The mountains lift . . . their lofty and luminous heads. Longfellow. 2. Illuminated; full of light; bright; as, many candles made the room luminous. Up the staircase moved a luminous space in the darkness. Longfellow. 3. Enlightened; intelligent; also, clear; intelligible; as, a luminous mind. " Luminous eloquence." Macaulay. " A luminous statement." Brougham. Luminous paint, a paint made up with some phosphorescent substance, as sulphide of calcium, which after exposure to a strong light is luminous in the dark for a time. Syn. -- Lucid; clear; shining; perspicuous. -- Lu"mi*nous*ly, adv. -- Lu"mi*nous*ness, n.
unfeigned: Not feigned; not counterfeit; not hypocritical; real; sincere; genuine; as, unfeigned piety; unfeigned love to man. "Good faith unfeigned." Chaucer. -- Un*feign"ed*ly, adv. -- Un*feign"ed*ness, n.
exemplar: 1. A model, original, or pattern, to be copied or imitated; a specimen; sometimes; an ideal model or type, as that which an artist conceives. Such grand exemplar as make their own abilities the sole measure of what is fit or unfit. South. 2. A copy of a book or writing. [Obs.] Udall.  Exemplary. [Obs.] The exemplar piety of the father of a family. Jer. Taylor.
encomium: Warm or high praise; panegyric; strong commendation. His encomiums awakened all my ardor. W. Irving. Syn. -- See Eulogy.
asperity: 1. Roughness of surface; unevenness; -- opposed to smoothness. "The asperities of dry bodies." Boyle. 2. Roughness or harshness of sound; that quality which grates upon the ear; raucity. 3. Roughness to the taste; sourness; tartness. 4. Moral roughness; roughness of manner; severity; crabbedness; harshness; -- opposed to mildness. "Asperity of character." Landor. It is no very cynical asperity not to confess obligations where no benefit has been received. Johnson. 5. Sharpness; disagreeableness; difficulty. The acclivities and asperities of duty. Barrow. Syn. -- Acrimony; moroseness; crabbedness; harshness; sourness; tartness. See Acrimony.
paean: 1. An ancient Greek hymn in honor of Apollo as a healing deity, and, later, a song addressed to other deities. 2. Any loud and joyous song; a song of triumph. Dryden. "Public pæans of congratulation." De Quincey. 3. See Pæon.
chasten: 1. To correct by punishment; to inflict pain upon the purpose of reclaiming; to discipline; as, to chasten a son with a rod. For whom the Lord loveth he chasteneth. Heb. xii. 6. 2. To purify from errors or faults; to refine. They [classics] chasten and enlarge the mind, and excite to noble actions. Layard. Syn. -- To chastise; punish; correct; discipline; castigate; afflict; subdue; purify. To Chasten, Punish, Chastise. To chasten is to subject to affliction or trouble, in order to produce a general change for the better in life or character. To punish is to inflict penalty for violation of law, disobedience to authority, or intentional wrongdoing. To chastise is to punish a particular offense, as with stripes, especially with the hope that suffering or disgrace may prevent a repetition of faults.
fetter: 1. A chain or shackle for the feet; a chain by which an animal is confined by the foot, either made fast or disabled from free and rapid motion; a bond; a shackle. [They] bound him with fetters of brass. Judg. xvi. 21. 2. Anything that confines or restrains; a restraint. Passion's too fierce to be in fetters bound. Dryden.  1. To put fetters upon; to shakle or confine the feet of with a chain; to bind. My heels are fettered, but my fist is free. Milton. 2. To reastrain from motion; to impose restrains on; to confine; to enchain; as, fettered by obligations. My conscience! thou art fettered More than my shanks and wrists. Shak.
sanction: 1. Solemn or ceremonious ratification; an official act of a superior by which he ratifies and gives validity to the act of some other person or body; establishment or furtherance of anything by authority to it; confirmation; approbation. The strictest professors of reason have added the sanction of their testimony. I. Watts. 2. Anything done or said to enforce the will, law, or authority of another; as, legal sanctions. Syn. -- Ratification; authorization; authoruty; countenance; support.  To give sanction to; to ratify; to confirm; to approve. Would have counseled, or even sanctioned, such perilous experiments. De Quincey. Syn. -- To ratify; confirm; authorize; countenance.
equivocate: To use words of equivocal or doubtful signification; to express one's opinions in terms which admit of different senses, with intent to deceive; to use ambiguous expressions with a view to mislead; as, to equivocate is the work of duplicity. All that Garnet had to say for him was that he supposed he meant to equivocate. Bp. Stillingfleet. Syn. -- To prevaricate; evade; shuffle; quibble. See Prevaricate.  To render equivocal or ambiguous. He equivocated his vow by a mental reservation. Sir G. Buck.
extant: 1. Standing out or above any surface; protruded. That part of the teeth which is extant above the gums. Ray. A body partly immersed in a fluid and partly extant. Bentley. 2. Still existing; not destroyed or lost; outstanding. Writings that were extant at that time. Sir M. Hale. The extant portraits of this great man. I. Taylor. 3. Publicly known; conspicuous. [Obs.] B. Jonson.
impunity: Exemption or freedom from punishment, harm, or loss. Heaven, though slow to wrath, Is neimpunity defied. Cowper. The impunity and also the recompense. Holland.
gregarious: Habitually living or moving in flocks or herds; tending to flock or herd together; not habitually solitary or living alone. Burke. No birds of prey are gregarious. Ray. -- Gre*ga"ri*ous*ly, adv. -- Gre-ga'ri-ous-ness, n.
inherent: Permanently existing in something; inseparably attached or connected; naturally pertaining to; innate; inalienable; as, polarity is an inherent quality of the magnet; the inherent right of men to life, liberty, and protection. "A most inherent baseness." Shak. The sore disease which seems inherent in civilization. Southey. Syn. -- Innate; inborn; native; natural; inbred; inwrought; inseparable; essential; indispensable.
singular: 1. Separate or apart from others; single; distinct. [Obs.] Bacon. And God forbid that all a company Should rue a singular man's folly. Chaucer. 2. Engaged in by only one on a side; single. [Obs.] To try the matter thus together in a singular combat. Holinshed. 3. (Logic)  Existing by itself; single; individual. The idea which represents one . . . determinate thing, is called a singular idea, whether simple, complex, or compound. I. Watts. 4. (Law)  Each; individual; as, to convey several parcels of land, all and singular. 5. (Gram.)  Denoting one person or thing; as, the singular number; -- opposed to dual and Ant: plural. 6. Standing by itself; out of the ordinary course; unusual; uncommon; strange; as, a singular phenomenon. So singular a sadness Must have a cause as strange as the effect. Denham. 7. Distinguished as existing in a very high degree; rarely equaled; eminent; extraordinary; exceptional; as, a man of singular gravity or attainments. 8. Departing from general usage or expectations; odd; whimsical; -- often implying disapproval or consure. His zeal None seconded, as out of season judged, Or singular and rash. Milton. To be singular in anything that is wise and worthy, is not a disparagement, but a praise. Tillotson. 9. Being alone; belonging to, or being, that of which there is but one; unique. These busts of the emperors and empresses are all very scarce, and some of them almost singular in their kind. Addison. Singular point in a curve (Math.), a point at which the curve possesses some peculiar properties not possessed by other points of the curve, as a cusp point, or a multiple point. -- Singular proposition (Logic), a proposition having as its subject a singular term, or a common term limited to an individual by means of a singular sign. Whately. -- Singular succession (Civil Law), division among individual successors, as distinguished from universal succession, by which an estate descended in intestacy to the heirs in mass. -- Singular term (Logic), a term which represents or stands for a single individual. Syn. -- Unexampled; unprecedented; eminent; extraordinary; remarkable; uncommon; rare; unusual; peculiar; strange; odd; eccentric; fantastic.  1. An individual instance; a particular. [Obs.] Dr. H. More. 2. (Gram)  The singular number, or the number denoting one person or thing; a word in the singular number.
sycophant: 1. An informer; a talebearer. [Obs.] "Accusing sycophants, of all men, did best sort to his nature." Sir P. Sidney. 2. A base parasite; a mean or servile flatterer; especially, a flatterer of princes and great men. A sycophant will everything admire: Each verse, each sentence, sets his soul on fire. Dryden.  1. To inform against; hence, to calumniate. [Obs.] Sycophanting and misnaming the work of his adversary. Milton. 2. To play the sycophant toward; to flatter obsequiously.  To play the sycophant.
waft: 1. To give notice to by waving something; to wave the hand to; to beckon. [Obs.] But soft: who wafts us yonder Shak. 2. To cause to move or go in a wavy manner, or by the impulse of waves, as of water or air; to bear along on a buoyant medium; as, a balloon was wafted over the channel. A gentle wafting to immortal life. Milton. Speed the soft intercourse from soul to soul, And waft a sigh from Indus to the pole. Pope. 3. To cause to float; to keep from sinking; to buoy. [Obs.] Sir T. Browne. Note: This verb is regular; but waft was formerly somwafted.  To be moved, or to pass, on a buoyant medium; to float. And now the shouts waft near the citadel. Dryden.  1. A wave or current of wind. "Everywaft of the air." Longfellow. In this dire season, oft the whirlwind's wing Sweeps up the burden of whole wintry plains In one wide waft. Thomson. 2. A signal made by waving something, as a flag, in the air. 3. An unpleasant flavor. [Obs.] 4. (Naut.)  A knot, or stop, in the middle of a flag. [Written also wheft.] Note: A flag with a waft in it, when hoisted at the staff, or half way to the gaff, means, a man overboard; at the peak, a desire to communicate; at the masthead, "Recall boats."
imminent: 1. Threatening to occur immediately; near at hand; impending; -- said especially of misfortune or peril. "In danger imminent." Spenser. 2. Full of danger; threatening; menacing; perilous. Hairbreadth scapes i' the imminent deadly breach. Shak. 3. (With upon) Bent upon; attentive to. [R.] Their eyes ever imminent upon worldly matters. Milton. Syn. -- Impending; threatening; near; at hand. -- Imminent, Impending, Threatening. Imminent is the strongest: it denotes that something is ready to fall or happen on the instant; as, in imminent danger of one's life. Impending denotes that something hangs suspended over us, and may so remain indefinitely; as, the impending evils of war. Threatening supposes some danger in prospect, but more remote; as, threatening indications for the future. Three times to-day You have defended me from imminent death. Shak. No story I unfold of public woes, Nor bear advices of impending foes. Pope. Fierce faces threatening war. Milton.
intractable: Not tractable; not easily governed, managed, or directed; indisposed to be taught, disciplined, or tamed; violent; stubborn; obstinate; refractory; as, an intractable child. Syn. -- Stubborn; perverse; obstinate; refractory; cross; unmanageable; unruly; headstrong; violent; ungovernable; unteachable. -- In*tract"a*ble*ness, n. -- In*tract"a*bly, adv.
hyperbole: A figure of speech in which the expression is an evident exaggeration of the meaning intended to be conveyed, or by which things are represented as much greater or less, better or worse, than they really are; a statement exaggerated fancifully, through excitement, or for effect. Our common forms of compliment are almost all of them extravagant hyperboles. Blair. Somebody has said of the boldest figure in rhetoric, the hyperbole, that it lies without deceiving. Macaulay.
obviate: 1. To meet in the way. [Obs.] Not to stir a step to obviate any of a different religion. Fuller. 2. To anticipate; to prevent by interception; to remove from the way or path; to make unnecessary; as, to obviate the necessity of going. To lay down everything in its full light, so as to obviate all exceptions. Woodward.
reticent: Inclined to keep silent; reserved; uncommunicative.
repudiate: 1. To cast off; to disavow; to have nothing to do with; to renounce; to reject. Servitude is to be repudiated with greater care. Prynne. 2. To divorce, put away, or discard, as a wife, or a woman one has promised to marry. His separation from Terentis, whom he repudiated not long afterward. Bolingbroke. 3. To refuse to acknowledge or to pay; to disclaim; as, the State has repudiated its debts.
recalcitrant: Kicking back; recalcitrating; hence, showing repugnance or opposition; refractory.
oscillation: 1. The act of oscillating; a swinging or moving backward and forward, like a pendulum; vibration. 2. Fluctuation; variation; change back and forth. His mind oscillated, undoubtedly; but the extreme points of the oscillation were not very remote. Macaulay. Axis of oscillation, Center of oscillation. See under Axis, and Center.
augury: 1. The art or practice of foretelling events by observing the actions of birds, etc.; divination. 2. An omen; prediction; prognostication; indication of the future; presage. From their flight strange auguries she drew. Drayton. He resigned himself . . . with a docility that gave little augury of his future greatness. Prescott. 3. A rite, ceremony, or observation of an augur.
anomaly: 1. Deviation from the common rule; an irregularity; anything anomalous. We are enabled to unite into a consistent whole the various anomalies and contending principles that are found in the minds and affairs of men. Burke. As Professor Owen has remarked, there is no greater anomaly in nature than a bird that can not fly. Darwin. 2. (Astron.) (a) The angular distance of a planet from its perihelion, as seen from the sun. This is the true anomaly. The eccentric anomaly is a corresponding angle at the center of the elliptic orbit of the planet. The mean anomaly is what the anomaly would be if the planet's angular motion were uniform. (b) The angle measuring apparent irregularities in the motion of a planet. 3. (Nat. Hist.)  Any deviation from the essential characteristics of a specific type.
nebulous: 1. Cloudy; hazy; misty. 2. (Astron.)  Of, pertaining to, or having the appearance of, a nebula; nebular; cloudlike. -- Neb"u*lous*ly, adv. -- Neb"u*lous*ness, n.
censure: 1. Judgment either favorable or unfavorable; opinion. [Obs.] Take each man's censure, but reserve thy judgment. Shak. 2. The act of blaming or finding fault with and condemning as wrong; reprehension; blame. Both the censure and the praise were merited. Macaulay. 3. Judicial or ecclesiastical sentence or reprimand; condemnatory judgment. Excommunication or other censure of the church. Bp. Burnet. Syn. -- Blame; reproof; condemnation; reprobation; disapproval; disapprobation; reprehension; animadversion; reprimand; reflection; dispraise; abuse.  1. To form or express a judgment in regard to; to estimate; to judge. [Obs.] "Should I say more, you might well censure me a flatterer." Beau. & Fl. 2. To find fault with and condemn as wrong; to blame; to express disapprobation of. I may be censured that nature thus gives way to loyalty. Shak. 3. To condemn or reprimand by a judicial or ecclesiastical sentence. Shak. Syn. -- To blame; reprove; rebuke; condemn; reprehend; reprimand.  To judge. [Obs.] Shak.
estimable: 1. Capable of being estimated or valued; as, estimable damage. Paley. . 2. Valuable; worth a great price. [R.] A pound of man's flesh, taken from a man, Is not so estimable, profitable neither, As flesh of muttons, beefs, or goats. Shak. 3. Worth of esteem or respect; deserving our good opinion or regard. A lady said of her two companions, that one was more amiable, the other more estimable. Sir W. Temple.  A thing worthy of regard. [R.] One of the peculiar estimables of her country. Sir T. Browne.
detraction: 1. A taking away or withdrawing. [Obs.] The detraction of the eggs of the said wild fowl. Bacon. 2. The act of taking away from the reputation or good name of another; a lessening or cheapening in the estimation of others; the act of depreciating another, from envy or malice; calumny. Syn. -- Depreciation; disparagement; derogation; slander; calumny; aspersion; censure.
paucity: 1. Fewness; smallness of number; scarcity. Hooker. Revelation denies it by the stern reserve, the paucity, and the incompleteness, of its communications. I. Taylor. 2. Smallnes of quantity; exiguity; insufficiency; as, paucity of blood. Sir T. Browne.
morose: 1. Of a sour temper; sullen and austere; ill-humored; severe. "A morose and affected taciturnity." I. Watts. 2. Lascivious; brooding over evil thoughts. [Obs.] Syn. -- Sullen; gruff; severe; austere; gloomy; crabbed; crusty; churlish; surly; ill-humored.
anachronistic: Erroneous in date; containing an anachronism. T. Warton.
iconoclast: 1. A breaker or destroyer of images or idols; a determined enemy of idol worship. 2. One who exposes or destroys impositions or shams; one who attacks cherished beliefs; a radical.
concomitant: Accompanying; conjoined; attending. It has pleased our wise Creator to annex to several objects, as also to several of our thoughts, a concomitant pleasure. Locke.  One who, or that which, accompanies, or is collaterally connected with another; a companion; an associate; an accompaniment. Reproach is a concomitant to greatness. Addison. The other concomitant of ingratitude is hardheartedness. South.
gainsay: To contradict; to deny; to controvert; to dispute; to forbid. I will give you a mouth and wisdom which all your adversaries shall not be able to gainsay nor resist. Luke xxi. 15. The just gods gainsay That any drop thou borrow'dst from thy mother, My sacred aunt, should by my mortal sword Be drained. Shak.
evanescent: 1. Liable to vanish or pass away like vapor; vanishing; fleeting; as, evanescent joys. So evanescent are the fashions of the world in these particulars. Hawthorne. 2. Vanishing from notice; imperceptible. The difference between right and wrong, is some petty cases, is almost evanescent. Wollaston.
noxious: 1. Hurtful; harmful; baneful; pernicious; injurious; destructive; unwholesome; insalubrious; as, noxious air, food, or climate; pernicious; corrupting to morals; as, noxious practices or examples. Too frequent an appearance in places of public resort is noxious to spiritual promotions. Swift. 2. Guilty; criminal. [R.] Those who are noxious in the eye of the law. Abp. Bramhall. Syn. -- Noisome; hurtful; harmful; injurious; destructive; pernicious; mischievous; corrupting; baneful; unwholesome; insalubrious. See Noisome. -- Nox"ious*ly, adv. -- Nox"ious*ness, n.
arduous: 1. Steep and lofty, in a literal sense; hard to climb. Those arduous pats they trod. Pope. 2. Attended with great labor, like the ascending of acclivities; difficult; laborious; as, an arduous employment, task, or enterprise. Syn. -- Difficult; trying; laborious; painful; exhausting. -- Arduous, Hard, Difficult. Hard is simpler, blunter, and more general in sense than difficult; as, a hard duty to perform, hard work, a hard task, one which requires much bodily effort and perseverance to do. Difficult commonly implies more skill and sagacity than hard, as when there is disproportion between the means and the end. A work may be hard but not difficult. We call a thing arduous when it requires strenuous and persevering exertion, like that of one who is climbing a precipice; as, an arduous task, an arduous duty. "It is often difficult to control our feelings; it is still harder to subdue our will; but it is an arduous undertaking to control the unruly and contending will of others."
prolific: 1. Having the quality of generating; producing young or fruit; generative; fruitful; productive; -- applied to plants producing fruit, animals producing young, etc.; -- usually with the implied idea of frequent or numerous production; as, a prolific tree, female, and the like. 2. Serving to produce; fruitful of results; active; as, a prolific brain; a controversy prolific of evil. 3. (Bot.)  Proliferous.
countenance: 1. Appearance or expression of the face; look; aspect; mien. So spake the Son, and into terror changed His countenance. Milton. 2. The face; the features. In countenance somewhat doth resemble you. Shak. 3. Approving or encouraging aspect of face; hence, favor, good will, support; aid; encouragement. Thou hast made him . . . glad with thy countenance. Ps. xxi. 6. This is the magistrate's peculiar province, to give countenance to piety and virtue, and to rebuke vice. Atterbury. 4. Superficial appearance; show; pretense. [Obs.] The election being done, he made countenance of great discontent thereat. Ascham. In countenance, in an assured condition or aspect; free from shame or dismay. "It puts the learned in countenance, and gives them a place among the fashionable part of mankind." Addison. -- Out of countenance, not bold or assured; confounded; abashed. "Their best friends were out of countenance, because they found that the imputations . . . were well grounded." Clarendon. -- To keep the countenance, to preserve a composed or natural look, undisturbed by passion or emotion. Swift.  1. To encourage; to favor; to approve; to aid; to abet. This conceit, though countenanced by learned men, is not made out either by experience or reason. Sir T. Browne. Error supports custom, custom countenances error. Milton. 2. To make a show of; to pretend. [Obs.] Which to these ladies love did countenance. Spenser.
lissome: 1. Limber; supple; flexible; lithe; lithesome. Straight, but as lissome as a hazel wand. Tennyson. 2. Light; nimble; active. Halliwell. -- Lis"some*ness, n.
halcyon: A kingfisher. By modern ornithologists restricted to a genus including a limited number of species having omnivorous habits, as the sacred kingfisher (Halcyon sancta) of Australia. Amidst our arms as quiet you shall be As halcyons brooding on a winter sea. Dryden.  1. Pertaining to, or resembling, the halcyon, which was anciently said to lay her eggs in nests on or near the sea during the calm weather about the winter solstice. 2. Hence: Calm; quiet; peaceful; undisturbed; happy. "Deep, halcyon repose." De Quincy.
sinecure: 1. An ecclesiastical benefice without the care of souls. Ayliffe. 2. Any office or position which requires or involves little or no responsibility, labor, or active service. A lucrative sinecure in the Excise. Macaulay.  To put or place in a sinecure.
elegy: A mournful or plaintive poem; a funereal song; a poem of lamentation. Shak.
pluck: 1. To pull; to draw. Its own nature . . . plucks on its own dissolution. Je 2. Especially, to pull with sudden force or effort, or to pull off or out from something, with a twitch; to twitch; also, to gather, to pick; as, to pluck feathers from a fowl; to pluck hair or wool from a skin; to pluck grapes. I come to pluck your berries harsh and crude. Milton. E'en children followed, with endearing wile, And plucked his gown to share the good man's smile. Goldsmith. 3. To strip of, or as of, feathers; as, to pluck a fowl. They which pass by the way do pluck her. Ps. lxxx. 4. (Eng. Universities)  To reject at an examination for degrees. C. Bronté. To pluck away, to pull away, or to separate by pulling; to tear away. -- To pluck down, to pull down; to demolish; to reduce to a lower state. -- to pluck off, to pull or tear off; as, to pluck off the skin. -- to pluck up. (a) To tear up by the roots or from the foundation; to eradicate; to exterminate; to destroy; as, to pluck up a plant; to pluk up a nation. Jer. xii. 17. (b) To gather up; to summon; as, to pluck up courage.  To make a motion of pulling or twitching; -- usually with at; as, to pluck at one's gown.  1. The act of plucking; a pull; a twitch. 2. Etym: [Prob. so called as being plucked out after the animal is killed; or cf. Gael. & Ir. pluc a lump, a knot, a bunch.]  The heart, liver, and lights of an animal. 3. Spirit; courage; indomitable resolution; fortitude. Decay of English spirit, decay of manly pluck. Thackeray. 4. The act of plucking, or the state of being plucked, at college. See Pluck, v. t., 4. 5. (Zoöl.)  The lyrie. [Prov. Eng.]
dogmatic: One of an ancient sect of physicians who went by general principles; -- opposed to the Empiric.  1. Pertaining to a dogma, or to an established and authorized doctrine or tenet. 2. Asserting a thing positively and authoritatively; positive; magisterial; hence, arrogantly authoritative; overbearing. Critics write in a positive, dogmatic way. Spectator. [They] are as assertive and dogmatical as if they were omniscient. Glanvill. Dogmatic theology. Same as Dogmatics. Syn. -- Magisterial; arrogant. See Magisterial.
bombast: 1. Originally, cotton, or cotton wool. [Obs.] A candle with a wick of bombast. Lupton. 2. Cotton, or any soft, fibrous material, used as stuffing for garments; stuffing; padding. [Obs.] How now, my sweet creature of bombast! Shak. Doublets, stuffed with four, five, or six pounds of bombast at least. Stubbes. 3. Fig.: High-sounding words; an inflated style; language above the dignity of the occasion; fustian. Yet noisy bombast carefully avoid. Dryden.  High-sounding; inflated; big without meaning; magniloquent; bombastic. [He] evades them with a bombast circumstance, Horribly stuffed with epithets of war. Shak. Nor a tall metaphor in bombast way. Cowley.  To swell or fill out; to pad; to inflate. [Obs.] Not bombasted with words vain ticklish ears to feed. Drayton.
apposite: Very applicable; well adapted; suitable or fit; relevant; pat; -- followed by to; as, this argument is very apposite to the case. -- Ap"po*site*ly, adv. -- Ap"po*site*ness, n.
germane: Literally, near akin; hence, closely allied; appropriate or fitting; relevant. The phrase would be more germane to the matter. Shak. [An amendment] must be germane. Barclay (Digest).
hermetic: 1. Of, pertaining to, or taught by, Hermes Trismegistus; as, hermetic philosophy. Hence: Alchemical; chemic. "Delusions of the hermetic art." Burke. The alchemists, as the people were called who tried to make gold, considered themselves followers of Hermes, and often called themselves Hermetic philosophers. A. B. Buckley. 2. Of or pertaining to the system which explains the causes of diseases and the operations of medicine on the principles of the hermetic philosophy, and which made much use, as a remedy, of an alkali and an acid; as, hermetic medicine. 3. Made perfectly close or air-tight by fusion, so that no gas or spirit can enter or escape; as, an hermetic seal. See Note under Hermetically. Hermetic art, alchemy. -- Hermetic books. (a) Books of the Egyptians, which treat of astrology. (b) Books which treat of universal principles, of the nature and orders of celestial beings, of medicine, and other topics.
profligate: 1. Overthrown; beaten; conquered. [Obs.] The foe is profligate, and run. Hudibras. 2. Broken down in respect of rectitude, principle, virtue, or decency; openly and shamelessly immoral or vicious; dissolute; as, profligate man or wretch. A race more profligate than we. Roscommon. Made prostitute and profligate muse. Dryden. Syn. -- Abandoned; corrupt; dissolute; vitiated; depraved; vicious; wicked. See Abandoned.  An abandoned person; one openly and shamelessly vicious; a dissolute person. "Such a profligate as Antony." Swift.  To drive away; to overcome. Note: [A Latinism] [Obs.] Harvey.
venal: Of or pertaining to veins; venous; as, venal blood. [R.]  Capable of being bought or obtained for money or other valuable consideration; made matter of trade or barter; held for sale; salable; mercenary; purchasable; hireling; as, venal services. " Paid court to venal beauties." Macaulay. The venal cry and prepared vote of a passive senate. Burke. Syn. -- Mercenary; hireling; vendible. -- Venal, Mercenary. One is mercenary who is either actually a hireling (as, mercenary soldiers, a mercenary judge, etc.), or is governed by a sordid love of gain; hence, we speak of mercenary motives, a mercenary marriage, etc. Venal goes further, and supposes either an actual purchase, or a readiness to be purchased, which places a person or thing wholly in the power of the purchaser; as, a venal press. Brissot played ingeniously on the latter word in his celebrated saying, " My pen is venal that it may not be mercenary," meaning that he wrote books, and sold them to the publishers, in order to avoid the necessity of being the hireling of any political party. Thus needy wits a vile revenue made, And verse became a mercenary trade. Dryden. This verse be thine, my friend, nor thou refuse This, from no venal or ungrateful muse. Pope.
jibe: To shift, as the boom of a fore-and-aft sail, from one side of a vessel to the other when the wind is aft or on the quarter. See Gybe.  1. (Naut.)  To change a ship's course so as to cause a shifting of the boom. See Jibe, v. t., and Gybe. 2. To agree; to harmonize. [Colloq.] Bartlett.
chimera: 1. (Myth.)  A monster represented as vomiting flames, and as having the head of a lion, the body of a goat, and the tail of a dragon. "Dire chimeras and enchanted isles." Milton. 2. A vain, foolish, or incongruous fancy, or creature of the imagination; as, the chimera of an author. Burke.
query: 1. A question; an inquiry to be answered or solved. I shall conclude with proposing only some queries, in order to a . . . search to be made by others. Sir I. Newton. 2. A question in the mind; a doubt; as, I have a query about his sincerity. 3. An interrogation point [] as the sign of a question or a doubt.  1. To ask questions; to make inquiry. Each prompt to query, answer, and debate. Pope. 2. To have a doubt; as, I query if he is right.  1. To put questions about; to elicit by questioning; to inquire into; as, to query the items or the amount; to query the motive or the fact. 2. To address questions to; to examine by questions. 3. To doubt of; to regard with incredulity. 4. To write " query" (qu., qy., or ) against, as a doubtful spelling, or sense, in a proof. See Quære.
idolatrous: 1. Of or pertaining to idolatry; partaking of the nature of idolatry; given to idolatry or the worship of false gods; as, idolatrous sacrifices. [Josiah] put down the idolatrous priests. 2 Kings xxiii. 5. 2. Consisting in, or partaking of, an excessive attachment or reverence; as, an idolatrous veneration for antiquity.
tenacity: 1. The quality or state of being tenacious; as, tenacity, or retentiveness, of memory; tenacity, or persistency, of purpose. 2. That quality of bodies which keeps them from parting without considerable force; cohesiveness; the effect of attraction; -- as distinguished from brittleness, fragility, mobility, etc. 3. That quality of bodies which makes them adhere to other bodies; adhesiveness; viscosity. Holland. 4. (Physics)  The greatest longitudinal stress a substance can bear without tearing asunder, -- usually expressed with reference to a unit area of the cross section of the substance, as the number of pounds per square inch, or kilograms per square centimeter, necessary to produce rupture.
pedagogy: Pedagogics; pedagogism. South.
beset: 1. To set or stud (anything) with ornaments or prominent objects. A robe of azure beset with drops of gold. Spectator. The garden is so beset with all manner of sweet shrubs that it perfumes the air. Evelyn. 2. To hem in; to waylay; to surround; to besiege; to blockade. "Beset with foes." Milton. Let thy troops beset our gates. Addison. 3. To set upon on all sides; to perplex; to harass; -- said of dangers, obstacles, etc. "Adam, sore beset, replied." Milton. "Beset with ills." Addison. "Incommodities which beset old age." Burke. 4. To occupy; to employ; to use up. [Obs.] Chaucer. Syn. -- To surround; inclose; environ; hem in; besiege; encircle; encompass; embarrass; urge; press.
penchant: Inclination; decided taste; bias; as, a penchant for art.
penury: 1. Absence of resources; want; privation; indigence; extreme poverty; destitution. "A penury of military forces." Bacon. They were exposed to hardship and penury. Sprat. It arises in neither from penury of thought. Landor. 2. Penuriousness; miserliness. [Obs.] Jer. Taylor.
decorum: Propriety of manner or conduct; grace arising from suitableness of speech and behavior to one's own character, or to the place and occasion; decency of conduct; seemliness; that which is seemly or suitable. Negligent of the duties and decorums of his station. Hallam. If your master Would have a queen his beggar, you must tell him, That majesty, to keep decorum, must No less beg than a kingdom. Shak. Syn. -- Decorum, Dignity. Decorum, in accordance with its etymology, is that which is becoming in outward act or appearance; as, the decorum of a public assembly. Dignity springs from an inward elevation of soul producing a corresponding effect on the manners; as, dignity of personal appearance.
decorous: Suitable to a character, or to the time, place, and occasion; marked with decorum; becoming; proper; seemly; befitting; as, a decorous speech; decorous behavior; a decorous dress for a judge. A decorous pretext the war. Motley. -- De*co"rous*ly, adv. -- De*co"rous*ness, n.
antediluvian: Of or relating to the period before the Deluge in Noah's time; hence, antiquated; as, an antediluvian vehicle. -- n.  One who lived before the Deluge.
ineptitude: 1. The quality of being inept; unfitness; inaptitude; unsuitableness. That ineptitude for society, which is frequently the fault of us scholars. Tatler. 2. Absurdity; nonsense; foolishness.
eloquent: 1. Having the power of expressing strong emotions or forcible arguments in an elevated, impassioned, and effective manner; as, an eloquent orator or preacher. O Death, all-eloquent! You only prove What dust we dote on when 't is man we love. Pope. 2. Adapted to express strong emotion or to state facts arguments with fluency and power; as, an eloquent address or statement; an eloquent appeal to a jury.
lackluster: A want of luster. -- a.  Wanting luster or brightness. "Lackluster eye." Shak.
squalid: Dirty through neglect; foul; filthy; extremely dirty. Uncomed his locks, and squalid his attrie. Dryden. Those squalid dens, which are the reproach of large capitals. Macaulay.
stygian: Of or pertaining to the river Styx; hence, hellish; infernal. See Styx. At that so sudden blaze, the Stygian throng Bent their aspect. Milton.
engender: 1. To produce by the union of the sexes; to beget. [R.] 2. To cause to exist; to bring forth; to produce; to sow the seeds of; as, angry words engender strife. Engendering friendship in all parts of the common wealth. Southey. Syn. -- To breed; generate; procreate; propagate; occasion; call forth; cause; excite; develop.  1. To assume form; to come into existence; to be caused or produced. Thick clouds are spread, and storms engender there. Dryden. 2. To come together; to meet, as in sexual embrace. "I saw their mouths engender." Massinger.  One who, or that which, engenders.
feckless: Spiritless; weak; worthless. [Scot]
gratuitous: 1. Given without an equivalent or recompense; conferred without valuable consideration; granted without pay, or without claim or merit; not required by justice. We mistake the gratuitous blessings of Heaven for the fruits of our own industry. L'Estrange. 2. Not called for by the circumstances; without reason, cause, or proof; adopted or asserted without any good ground; as, a gratuitous assumption. Acts of gratuitous self-humiliation. De Quincye. -- Gra*tu"i*tous*ly, adv. -- Gra*tu"i*tous*ness, n.
inimical: 1. Having the disposition or temper of an enemy; unfriendly; unfavorable; -- chiefly applied to private, as hostile is to public, enmity. 2. Opposed in tendency, influence, or effects; antagonistic; inconsistent; incompatible; adverse; repugnant. We are at war with a system, which, by its essence, is inimical to all other governments. Burke.
platitude: 1. The quality or state of being flat, thin, or insipid; flat commonness; triteness; staleness of ideas of language. To hammer one golden grain of wit into a sheet of infinite platitude. Motley. 2. A thought or remark which is flat, dull, trite, or weak; a truism; a commonplace.
pithy: 1. Consisting wholly, or in part, of pith; abounding in pith; as, a pithy stem; a pithy fruit. 2. Having nervous energy; forceful; cogent. This pithy speech prevailed, and all agreed. Dryden. In all these Goodman Fact was very short, but pithy. Addison. Pithy gall (Zoöl.), a large, rough, furrowed, oblong gall, formed on blackberry canes by a small gallfly (Diastrophus nebulosus).
pervasive: Tending to pervade, or having power to spread throughout; of a pervading quality. "Civilization pervasive and general." M. Arnold.
inchoate: Recently, or just, begun; beginning; partially but not fully in existence or operation; existing in its elements; incomplete. -- In"cho*ate*ly, adv. Neither a substance perfect, nor a substance inchoate. Raleigh.  To begin. [Obs.] Dr. H. More.
eclectic: 1. Selecting; choosing (what is true or excellent in doctrines, opinions, etc.) from various sources or systems; as, an eclectic philosopher. 2. Consisting, or made up, of what is chosen or selected; as, an eclectic method; an eclectic magazine. Eclectic physician, one of a class of practitioners of medicine, who select their modes of practice and medicines from all schools; formerly, sometimes the same as botanic physician. [U.S.] -- Eclectic school. (Paint.) See Bolognese school, under Bolognese.  One who follows an eclectic method.
insular: 1. Of or pertaining to an island; of the nature, or possessing the characteristics, of an island; as, an insular climate, fauna, etc. 2. Of or pertaining to the people of an island; narrow; circumscribed; illiberal; contracted; as, insular habits, opinions, or prejudices. The penury of insular conversation. Johnson.  An islander. [R.] Berkeley.
munificence: Means of defense; fortification. [Obs.] Spenser.  The quality or state of being munificent; a giving or bestowing with extraordinary liberality; generous bounty; lavish generosity. The virtues of liberality and munificence. Addison. Syn. -- Benevolence; beneficence; liberality; generosity; bounty; bounteousness. See Benevolence.
desuetude: The cessation of use; disuse; discontinuance of practice, custom, or fashion. The desuetude abrogated the law, which, before, custom had established. Jer. Taylor.
arabesque: A style of ornamentation either painted, inlaid, or carved in low relief. It consists of a pattern in which plants, fruits, foliage, etc., as well as figures of men and animals, real or imaginary, are fantastically interlaced or put together. Note: It was employed in Roman imperial ornamentation, and appeared, without the animal figures, in Moorish and Arabic decorative art. (See Moresque.) The arabesques of the Renaissance were founded on Greco-Roman work.  1. Arabian. [Obs.] 2. Relating to, or exhibiting, the style of ornament called arabesque; as, arabesque frescoes.
filibuster: A lawless military adventurer, especially one in quest of plunder; a freebooter; -- originally applied to buccaneers infesting the Spanish American coasts, but introduced into common English to designate the followers of Lopez in his expedition to Cuba in 1851, and those of Walker in his expedition to Nicaragua, in 1855.  1. To act as a filibuster, or military freebooter. Bartlett. 2. To delay legislation, by dilatory motions or other artifices. [political cant or slang, U.S.] Bartlett.
abrogate: Abrogated; abolished. [Obs.] Latimer.  1. To annul by an authoritative act; to abolish by the authority of the maker or his successor; to repeal; -- applied to the repeal of laws, decrees, ordinances, the abolition of customs, etc. Let us see whether the New Testament abrogates what we so frequently see in the Old. South. Whose laws, like those of the Medes and Persian, they can not alter or abrogate. Burke. 2. To put an end to; to do away with. Shak. Syn. -- To abolish; annul; do away; set aside; revoke; repeal; cancel; annihilate. See Abolish.
divulge: 1. To make public; to several or communicate to the public; to tell (a secret) so that it may become generally known; to disclose; -- said of that which had been confided as a secret, or had been before unknown; as, to divulge a secret. Divulge not such a love as mine. Cowper. 2. To indicate publicly; to proclaim. [R.] God . . . marks The just man, and divulges him through heaven. Milton. 3. To impart; to communicate. Which would not be To them [animals] made common and divulged. Milton. Syn. -- To publish; disclose; discover; uncover; reveal; communicate; impart; tell.  To become publicly known. [R.] "To keep it from divulging." Shak.
proclivity: 1. Inclination; propensity; proneness; tendency. "A proclivity to steal." Abp. Bramhall. 2. Readiness; facility; aptitude. He had such a dexterous proclivity as his teachers were fain to restrain his forwardness. Sir H. Wotton.
lassitude: A condition of the body, or mind, when its voluntary functions are performed with difficulty, and only by a strong exertion of the will; languor; debility; weariness. The corporeal instruments of action being strained to a high pitch . . . will soon feel a lassitude. Barrow.
pith: 1. (Bot.)  The soft spongy substance in the center of the stems of many plants and trees, especially those of the dicotyledonous or exogenous classes. It consists of cellular tissue. 2. (a) (Zoöl.) The spongy interior substance of a feather. (b) (Anat.) The spinal cord; the marrow. 3. Hence: The which contains the strength of life; the vital or essential part; concentrated force; vigor; strength; importance; as, the speech lacked pith. Enterprises of great pith and moment. Shak. Pith paper. Same as Rice paper, under Rice.  To destroy the central nervous system of (an animal, as a frog), as by passing a stout wire or needle up and down the vertebral canal.
pirate: 1. A robber on the high seas; one who by open violence takes the property of another on the high seas; especially, one who makes it his business to cruise for robbery or plunder; a freebooter on the seas; also, one who steals in a harbor. 2. An armed ship or vessel which sails without a legal commission, for the purpose of plundering other vessels on the high seas. 3. One who infringes the law of copyright, or publishes the work of an author without permission. Pirate perch (Zoöl.), a fresh-water percoid fish of the United States (Aphredoderus Sayanus). It is of a dark olive color, speckled with blackish spots.  To play the pirate; to practice robbery on the high seas.  To publish, as books or writings, without the permission of the author. They advertised they would pirate his edition. Pope.
excoriate: To strip or wear off the skin of; to abrade; to gall; to break and remove the cuticle of, in any manner, as by rubbing, beating, or by the action of acrid substances.
canon: 1. A law or rule. Or that the Everlasting had not fixed His canon 'gainst self- slaughter. Shak. 2. (Eccl.)  A law, or rule of doctrine or discipline, enacted by a council and confirmed by the pope or the sovereign; a decision, regulation, code, or constitution made by ecclesiastical authority. Various canons which were made in councils held in the second centry. Hock. 3. The collection of books received as genuine Holy Scriptures, called the sacred canon, or general rule of moral and religious duty, given by inspiration; the Bible; also, any one of the canonical Scriptures. See Canonical books, under Canonical, a. 4. In monasteries, a book containing the rules of a religious order. 5. A catalogue of saints sckowledged and canonized in the Roman Catholic Church. 6. A member of a cathedral chapter; a person who possesses a prebend in a cathedral or collegiate church. 7. (Mus.)  A musical composition in which the voice begin one after another, at regular intervals, succesively taking up the same subject. It either winds up with a coda (tailpiece), or, as each voice finishes, commences anew, thus forming a perpetual fugue or round. It is the strictest form of imitation. See Imitation. 8. (Print.)  The largest size of type having a specific name; -- so called from having been used for printing the canons of the church. 9. The part of a bell by which it is suspended; -- called also ear and shank. Note: [See Illust. of Bell.] Knight. 10. (Billiards)  See Carom. Apostolical canons. See under Apostolical. -- Augustinian canons, Black canons. See under Augustinian. -- Canon capitular, Canon residentiary, a resident member of a cathedral chapter (during a part or the whole of the year). -- Canon law. See under Law. -- Canon of the Mass (R. C. Ch.), that part of the mass, following the Sanctus, which never changes. -- Honorary canon, a canon who neither lived in a monastery, nor kept the canonical hours. -- Minor canon (Ch. of Eng.), one who has been admitted to a chapter, but has not yet received a prebend. -- Regular canon (R. C. Ch.), one who lived in a conventual community and follower the rule of St. Austin; a Black canon. -- Secular canon (R. C. Ch.), one who did not live in a monastery, but kept the hours.  A deep gorge, ravine, or gulch, between high and steep banks, worn by water courses. [Mexico & Western U. S.]
vestigial: Of or pertaining to a vestige or remnant; like a vestige.
sap: 1. The juice of plants of any kind, especially the ascending and descending juices or circulating fluid essential to nutrition. Note: The ascending is the crude sap, the assimilation of which takes place in the leaves, when it becomes the elaborated sap suited to the growth of the plant. 2. The sapwood, or alburnum, of a tree. 3. A simpleton; a saphead; a milksop. [Slang] Sap ball (Bot.), any large fungus of the genus Polyporus. See Polyporus. -- Sap green, a dull light green pigment prepared from the juice of the ripe berries of the Rhamnus catharticus, or buckthorn. It is used especially by water-color artists. -- Sap rot, the dry rot. See under Dry. -- Sap sucker (Zoöl.), any one of several species of small American woodpeckers of the genus Sphyrapicus, especially the yellow-bellied woodpecker (S. varius) of the Eastern United States. They are so named because they puncture the bark of trees and feed upon the sap. The name is loosely applied to other woodpeckers. -- Sap tube (Bot.), a vessel that conveys sap.  1. To subvert by digging or wearing away; to mine; to undermine; to destroy the foundation of. Nor safe their dwellings were, for sapped by floods, Their houses fell upon their household gods. Dryden. 2. (Mil.)  To pierce with saps. 3. To make unstable or infirm; to unsettle; to weaken. Ring out the grief that saps the mind. Tennyson.  To proceed by mining, or by secretly undermining; to execute saps. W. P. Craighill. Both assaults carried on by sapping. Tatler.  A narrow ditch or trench made from the foremost parallel toward the glacis or covert way of a besieged place by digging under cover of gabions, etc. Sap fagot (Mil.), a fascine about three feet long, used in sapping, to close the crevices between the gabions before the parapet is made. -- Sap roller (Mil.), a large gabion, six or seven feet long, filled with fascines, which the sapper sometimes rolls along before him for protection from the fire of an enemy.
exegesis: 1. Exposition; explanation; especially, a critical explanation of a text or portion of Scripture. 2. (Math.)  The process of finding the roots of an equation. [Obs.]
ossified: Changed to bone or something resembling bone; hardened by deposits of mineral matter of any kind; -- said of tissues.
fractious: Apt to break out into a passion; apt to scold; cross; snappish; ugly; unruly; as, a fractious man; a fractious horse. Syn. -- Snappish; peevish; waspish; cross; irritable; perverse; pettish. -- Frac"tious*ly, v. -- Frac"tious*ness, n.
quixotic: Like Don Quixote; romantic to extravagance; absurdly chivalric; apt to be deluded. "Feats of quixotic gallantry." Prescott.
anathema: 1. A ban or curse pronounced with religious solemnity by ecclesiastical authority, and accompanied by excommunication. Hence: Denunciation of anything as accursed. [They] denounce anathemas against unbelievers. Priestley. 2. An imprecation; a curse; a malediction. Finally she fled to London followed by the anathemas of both [families]. Thackeray. 3. Any person or thing anathematized, or cursed by ecclesiastical authority. The Jewish nation were an anathema destined to destruction. St. Paul . . . says he could wish, to save them from it, to become an anathema, and be destroyed himself. Locke. Anathema Maranatha Etym: (see 1 Cor. xvi. 22), an expression commonly considered as a highly intensified form of anathema. Maran atha is now considered as a separate sentence, meaning, "Our Lord cometh."
mendacity: 1. The quality or state of being mendacious; a habit of lying. Macaulay. 2. A falsehood; a lie. Sir T. Browne. Syn. -- Lying; deceit; untruth; falsehood.
prize: 1. That which is taken from another; something captured; a thing seized by force, stratagem, or superior power. I will depart my pris, or may prey, by deliberation. Chaucer. His own prize, Whom formerly he had in battle won. Spenser. 2. Hence, specifically; (a) (Law) Anything captured by a belligerent using the rights of war; esp., property captured at sea in virtue of the rights of war, as a vessel. Kent. Brande & C. (b) An honor or reward striven for in a competitive contest; anything offered to be competed for, or as an inducement to, or reward of, effort. I'll never wrestle for prize more. Shak. I fought and conquered, yet have lost the prize. Dryden. (c) That which may be won by chance, as in a lottery. 3. Anything worth striving for; a valuable possession held or in prospect. I press toward the mark for the prize of the high calling of God in Christ Jesus. Phil. iii. 14. 4. A contest for a reward; competition. [Obs.] Shak. 5. A lever; a pry; also, the hold of a lever. [Written also prise.] Prize court, a court having jurisdiction of all captures made in war on the high seas. Bouvier. -- Prize fight, an exhibition contest, esp. one of pugilists, for a stake or wager. -- Prize fighter, one who fights publicly for a reward; -- applied esp. to a professional boxer or pugilist. Pope. -- Prize fighting, fighting, especially boxing, in public for a reward or wager. -- Prize master, an officer put in charge or command of a captured vessel. -- Prize medal, a medal given as a prize. -- Prize money, a dividend from the proceeds of a captured vessel, etc., paid to the captors. -- Prize ring, the ring or inclosure for a prize fight; the system and practice of prize fighting. -- To make prize of, to capture. Hawthorne.  To move with a lever; to force up or open; to pry. [Written also prise.]  1. To set or estimate the value of; to appraise; to price; to rate. A goodly price that I was prized at. Zech. xi. 13. I prize it [life] not a straw, but for mine honor. Shak. 2. To value highly; to estimate to be of great worth; to esteem. "[I] do love, prize, honor you. " Shak. I prized your person, but your crown disdain. Dryden.  Estimation; valuation. [Obs.] Shak.
innocuous: Harmless; producing no ill effect; innocent. A patient, innocuous, innocent man. Burton. -- In*noc"u*ous*ly, adv. -- In*noc"u*ous*ness, n. Where the salt sea innocuously breaks. Wordsworth.
proliferate: 1. (Biol.)  To produce or form cells; especially, to produce cells rapidly. 2. (Zoöl.)  To produce zooids by budding.
static: 1. Resting; acting by mere weight without motion; as, statical pressure; static objects. 2. Pertaining to bodies at rest or in equilibrium. Statical electricity. See Note under Electricity, 1. -- Statical moment. See under Moment.
prodigal: Given to extravagant expenditure; expending money or other things without necessity; recklessly or viciously profuse; lavish; wasteful; not frugal or economical; as, a prodigal man; the prodigal son; prodigal giving; prodigal expenses. In fighting fields [patriots] were prodigal of blood. Dryden. Syn. -- Profuse; lavish; extravagant; squandering; wasteful. See Profuse.  One who expends money extravagantly, viciously, or without necessity; one that is profuse or lavish in any expenditure; a waster; a spendthrift. "Noble prodigals of life." Trench.
perfunctory: 1. Done merely to get rid of a duty; performed mechanically and as a thing of rote; done in a careless and superficial manner; characterized by indifference; as, perfunctory admonitions. Macaulay. 2. Hence: Mechanical; indifferent; listless; careless. "Perfunctory in his devotions." Sharp.
crestfallen: 1. With hanging head; hence, dispirited; dejected; cowed. Let it make thee crestfullen; Ay, and allay this thy abortive pride. Shak. 2. Having the crest, or upper part of the neck, hanging to one side; -- said of a horse.
relegate: To remove, usually to an inferior position; to consign; to transfer; specifically, to send into exile; to banish. It [the Latin language] was relegated into the study of the scholar. Milman.
deleterious: Hurtful; noxious; destructive; pernicious; as, a deleterious plant or quality; a deleterious example. -- Del`e*te"ri*ous*ly, adv. -- Del`e*te"ri*ous*ness, n.
eccentric: 1. Deviating or departing from the center, or from the line of a circle; as, an eccentric or elliptical orbit; pertaining to deviation from the center or from true circular motion. 2. Not having the same center; -- said of circles, ellipses, spheres, etc., which, though coinciding, either in whole or in part, as to area or volume, have not the same center; -- opposed to concentric. 3. (Mach.)  Pertaining to an eccentric; as, the eccentric rod in a steam engine. 4. Not coincident as to motive or end. His own ends, which must needs be often eccentric to those of his master. Bacon. 5. Deviating from stated methods, usual practice, or established forms or laws; deviating from an appointed sphere or way; departing from the usual course; irregular; anomalous; odd; as, eccentric conduct. "This brave and eccentric young man." Macaulay. He shines eccentric, like a comet's blaze. Savage. Eccentric anomaly. (Astron.) See Anomaly. -- Eccentric chuck (Mach.), a lathe chuck so constructed that the work held by it may be altered as to its center of motion, so as to produce combinations of eccentric combinations of eccentric circles. -- Eccentric gear. (Mach.) (a) The whole apparatus, strap, and other parts, by which the motion of an eccentric is transmitted, as in the steam engine. (b) A cogwheel set to turn about an eccentric axis used to give variable rotation. -- Eccentric hook or gab, a hook-shaped journal box on the end of an eccentric rod, opposite the strap. -- Eccentric rod, the rod that connects as eccentric strap with any part to be acted upon by the eccentric. -- Eccentric sheave, or Eccentric pulley, an eccentric. -- Eccentric strap, the ring, operating as a journal box, that encircles and receives motion from an eccentric; -- called also eccentric hoop. Syn. -- Irregular; anomalous; singular; odd; peculiar; erratic; idiosyncratic; strange; whimsical.  1. A circle not having the same center as another contained in some measure within the first. 2. One who, or that which, deviates from regularity; an anomalous or irregular person or thing. 3. (Astron.) (a) In the Ptolemaic system, the supposed circular orbit of a planet about the earth, but with the earth not in its center. (b) A circle described about the center of an elliptical orbit, with half the major axis for radius. Hutton. 4. (Mach.)  A disk or wheel so arranged upon a shaft that the center of the wheel and that of the shaft do not coincide. It is used for operating valves in steam engines, and for other purposes. The motion derived is precisely that of a crank having the same throw. Back eccentric, the eccentric that reverses or backs the valve gear and the engine. -- Fore eccentric, the eccentric that imparts a forward motion to the valve gear and the engine.
rarefy: To make rare, thin, porous, or less dense; to expand or enlarge without adding any new portion of matter to; -- opposed to condense.  To become less dense; to become thin and porous. "Earth rarefies to dew." Dryden.
fetid: Having an offensive smell; stinking. Most putrefactions . . . smell either fetid or moldy. Bacon.
mettle: Substance or quality of temperament; spirit, esp. as regards honor, courage, fortitude, ardor, etc.; disposition; -- usually in a good sense. A certain critical hour which shall... try what mettle his heart is made of. South. Gentlemen of brave mettle. Shak. The winged courser, like a generous horse, Shows most true mettle when you check his course. Pope. To put one one's mettle, to cause or incite one to use one's best efforts.
wag: To move one way and the other with quick turns; to shake to and fro; to move vibratingly; to cause to vibrate, as a part of the body; as, to wag the head. No discerner durst wag his tongue in censure. Shak. Every one that passeth thereby shall be astonished, and wag his head. Jer. xviii. 16. Note: Wag expresses specifically the motion of the head and body used in buffoonery, mirth, derision, sport, and mockery.  1. To move one way and the other; to be shaken to and fro; to vibrate. The resty sieve wagged ne'er the more. Dryden. 2. To be in action or motion; to move; to get along; to progress; to stir. [Colloq.] "Thus we may see," quoth he, "how the world wags." Shak. 3. To go; to depart; to pack oft. [R.] I will provoke him to 't, or let him wag. Shak.  1. The act of wagging; a shake; as, a wag of the head. [Colloq.] 2. Etym: [Perhaps shortened from wag-halter a rogue.]  A man full of sport and humor; a ludicrous fellow; a humorist; a wit; a joker. We wink at wags when they offend. Dryden. A counselor never pleaded without a piece of pack thread in his hand, which he used to twist about a finger all the while he was speaking; the wags used to call it the thread of his discourse. Addison.
bucolic: Of or pertaining to the life and occupation of a shepherd; pastoral; rustic.  A pastoral poem, representing rural affairs, and the life, manners, and occupation of shepherds; as, the Bucolics of Theocritus and Virgil. Dryden.
gossamer: 1. A fine, filmy substance, like cobwebs, floating in the air, in calm, clear weather, especially in autumn. It is seen in stubble fields and on furze or low bushes, and is formed by small spiders. 2. Any very thin gauzelike fabric; also, a thin waterproof stuff. 3. An outer garment, made of waterproof gossamer. Gossamer spider (Zoöl.), any small or young spider which spins webs by which to sail in the air. See Ballooning spider.
incipient: Beginning to be, or to show itself; commencing; initial; as, the incipient stage of a fever; incipient light of day. -- In*cip"i*ent*ly, adv.
intrepid: Not trembling or shaking with fear; fearless; bold; brave; undaunted; courageous; as, an intrepid soldier; intrepid spirit. Syn. -- Fearless; dauntless; resolute; brave; courageous; daring; valiant; heroic; doughty.
alacrity: A cheerful readiness, willingness, or promptitude; joyous activity; briskness; sprightliness; as, the soldiers advanced with alacrity to meet the enemy. I have not that alacrity of spirit, Nor cheer of mind that I was wont to have. Shak.
alloy: 1. Any combination or compound of metals fused together; a mixture of metals; for example, brass, which is an alloy of copper and zinc. But when mercury is one of the metals, the compound is called an amalgam. 2. The quality, or comparative purity, of gold or silver; fineness. 3. A baser metal mixed with a finer. Fine silver is silver without the mixture of any baser metal. Alloy is baser metal mixed with it. Locke. 4. Admixture of anything which lessens the value or detracts from; as, no happiness is without alloy. "Pure English without Latin alloy." F. Harrison.  1. To reduce the purity of by mixing with a less valuable substance; as, to alloy gold with silver or copper, or silver with copper. 2. To mix, as metals, so as to form a compound. 3. To abate, impair, or debase by mixture; to allay; as, to alloy pleasure with misfortunes.  To form a metallic compound. Gold and iron alloy with ease. Ure.
shard: A plant; chard. [Obs.] Dryden.  1. A piece or fragment of an earthen vessel, or a like brittle substance, as the shell of an egg or snail. Shak. The precious dish Broke into shards of beauty on the board. E. Arnold. 2. (Zoöl.)  The hard wing case of a beetle. They are his shards, and he their beetle. Shak. 3. A gap in a fence. [Obs.] Stanyhurst. 4. A boundary; a division. [Obs. & R.] Spenser.
querulous: 1. Given to quarreling; quarrelsome. [Obs.] land. 2. Apt to find fault; habitually complaining; disposed to murmur; as, a querulous man or people. Enmity can hardly be more annoying that querulous, jealous, exacting fondness. Macaulay. 3. Expressing complaint; fretful; whining; as, a querulous tone of voice. Syn. -- Complaining; bewailing; lamenting; whining; mourning; murmuring; discontented; dissatisfied. -- Quer"u*lous*ly, adv. -- Quer"u*lous*ness, n.
disinterested: Not influenced by regard to personal interest or advantage; free from selfish motive; having no relation of interest or feeling; not biased or prejudiced; as, a disinterested decision or judge. The happiness of disinterested sacrifices. Channing. Syn. -- Unbiased; impartial; uninterested; indifferent.
quaff: To drink with relish; to drink copiously of; to swallow in large draughts. "Quaffed off the muscadel." Shak. They eat, they drink, and in communion sweet Quaff immortality and joy. Milton.  To drink largely or luxuriously. Twelve days the gods their solemn revels keep, And quaff with blameless Ethiops in the deep. Dryden.
pedantic: Of or pertaining to a pedant; characteristic of, or resembling, a pedant; ostentatious of learning; as, a pedantic writer; a pedantic description; a pedantical affectation. "Figures pedantical." Shak.
opaque: 1. Impervious to the rays of light; not transparent; as, an opaque substance. 2. Obscure; not clear; unintelligible. [Colloq.]  That which is opaque; opacity. Young.
perennial: 1. ing or continuing through the year; as, perennial fountains. 2. Continuing without cessation or intermission; perpetual; unceasing; never failing. The perennial existence of bodies corporate. Burke. 3. (Bot.)  Continuing more than two years; as, a perennial steam, or root, or plant. Syn. -- Perpetual; unceasing; never failing; enduring; continual; permanent; uninterrupted.  A perennial plant; a plant which lives or continues more than two years, whether it retains its leaves in winter or not.
adulation: Servile flattery; praise in excess, or beyond what is merited. Think'st thou the fiery fever will go out With titles blown from adulation Shak. Syn. -- Sycophancy; cringing; fawning; obsequiousness; blandishment. -- Adulation, Flattery, Compliment. Men deal in compliments from a desire to please; they use flattery either from undue admiration, or a wish to gratify vanity; they practice adulation from sordid motives, and with a mingled spirit of falsehood and hypocrisy. Compliment may be a sincere expression of due respect and esteem, or it may be unmeaning; flattery is apt to become gross; adulation is always servile, and usually fulsome.
virulent: 1. Extremely poisonous or venomous; very active in doing injury. A contagious disorder rendered more virulent by uncleanness. Sir W. Scott. 2. Very bitter in enmity; actuated by a desire to injure; malignant; as, a virulent invective.
dearth: Scarcity which renders dear; want; lack; specifically, lack of food on account of failure of crops; famine. There came a dearth over all the land of Egypt. Acts vii. 11. He with her press'd, she faint with dearth. Shak. Dearth of plot, and narrowness of imagination. Dryden.
cow: A chimney cap; a cowl  1. The mature female of bovine animals. 2. The female of certain large mammals, as whales, seals, etc.  To depress with fear; to daunt the spirits or courage of; to overawe. To vanquish a people already cowed. Shak. THe French king was cowed. J. R. Green.  A wedge, or brake, to check the motion of a machine or car; a chock. Knight.
diatribe: A prolonged or exhaustive discussion; especially, an acrimonious or invective harangue; a strain of abusive or railing language; a philippic. The ephemeral diatribe of a faction. John Morley.
boor: 1. A husbandman; a peasant; a rustic; esp. a clownish or unrefined countryman. 2. A Dutch, German, or Russian peasant; esp. a Dutch colonist in South Africa, Guiana, etc.: a boer. 3. A rude ill-bred person; one who is clownish in manners.
harrow: 1. An implement of agriculture, usually formed of pieces of timber or metal crossing each other, and set with iron or wooden teeth. It is drawn over plowed land to level it and break the clods, to stir the soil and make it fine, or to cover seed when sown. 2. (Mil.)  An obstacle formed by turning an ordinary harrow upside down, the frame being buried. Bush harrow, a kind of light harrow made of bushes, for harrowing grass lands and covering seeds, or to finish the work of a toothed harrow. -- Drill harrow. See under 6th Drill. -- Under the harrow, subjected to actual torture with a toothed instrument, or to great affliction or oppression.  1. To draw a harrow over, as for the purpose of breaking clods and leveling the surface, or for covering seed; as, to harrow land. Will he harrow the valleys after thee Job xxxix. 10. 2. To break or tear, as with a harrow; to wound; to lacerate; to torment or distress; to vex. My aged muscles harrowed up with whips. Rowe. I could a tale unfold, whose lightest word Would harrow up thy soul. Shak.  Help! Halloo! An exclamation of distress; a call for succor;- the ancient Norman hue and cry. "Harrow and well away!" Spenser. Harrow! alas! here lies my fellow slain. Chaucer.  To pillage; to harry; to oppress. [Obs.] Spenser. Meaning thereby to harrow his people. Bacon
loquacious: 1. Given to continual talking; talkative; garrulous. Loquacious, brawling, ever in the wrong. Dryden. 2. Speaking; expressive. [R.] J. Philips. 3. Apt to blab and disclose secrets. Syn. -- Garrulous; talkative. See Garrulous.
cursory: 1. Running about; not stationary. [Obs.] 2. Characterized by haste; hastily or superficially performed; slight; superficial; careless. Events far too important to be treated in a cursory manner. Hallam.
noisome: 1. Noxious to health; hurtful; mischievous; unwholesome; insalubrious; destructive; as, noisome effluvia. "Noisome pestilence." Ps. xci. 3. 2. Offensive to the smell or other senses; disgusting; fetid. "Foul breath is noisome." Shak. -- Noi"some*ly, adv. -- Noi"some*ness, n. Syn. -- Noxious; unwholesome; insalubrious; mischievous; destructive. -- Noisome, Noxious. These words have to a great extent been interchanged; but there is a tendency to make a distinction between them, applying noxious to things that inflict evil directly; as, a noxious plant, noxious practices, etc., and noisome to things that operate with a remoter influence; as, noisome vapors, a noisome pestilence, etc. Noisome has the additional sense of disqusting. A garden may be free from noxious weeds or animals; but, if recently covered with manure, it may be filled with a noisome smell.
corrigible: 1. Capable of being set right, amended, or reformed; as, a corrigible fault. 2. Submissive to correction; docile. "Bending down his corrigible neck." Shak. 3. Deserving chastisement; punishable. [Obs.] He was taken up very short, and adjudged corrigible for such presumptuous language. Howell. 4. Having power to correct; corrective. [Obs.] The . . . .corrigible authority of this lies in our wills. Shak.
volatile: 1. Passing through the air on wings, or by the buoyant force of the atmosphere; flying; having the power to fly. [Obs.] 2. Capable of wasting away, or of easily passing into the aëriform state; subject to evaporation. Note: Substances which affect the smell with pungent or fragrant odors, as musk, hartshorn, and essential oils, are called volatile substances, because they waste away on exposure to the atmosphere. Alcohol and ether are called volatile liquids for a similar reason, and because they easily pass into the state of vapor on the application of heat. On the contrary, gold is a fixed substance, because it does not suffer waste, even when exposed to the heat of a furnace; and oils are called fixed when they do not evaporate on simple exposure to the atmosphere. 3. Fig.: Light-hearted; easily affected by circumstances; airy; lively; hence, changeable; fickle; as, a volatile temper. You are as giddy and volatile as ever. Swift. Volatile alkali. (Old Chem.) See under Alkali. -- Volatile liniment, a liniment composed of sweet oil and ammonia, so called from the readiness with which the latter evaporates. -- Volatile oils. (Chem.) See Essential oils, under Essential.  A winged animal; wild fowl; game. [Obs.] Chaucer. Sir T. Browne.
delineate: Delineated; portrayed. [R.]  1. To indicate by lines drawn in the form or figure of; to represent by sketch, design, or diagram; to sketch out; to portray; to picture; in drawing and engraving, to represent in lines, as with the pen, pencil, or graver; hence, to represent with accuracy and minuteness. See Delineation. Adventurous to delineate nature's form. Akenside. 2. To portray to the mind or understanding by words; to set forth; to describe. Customs or habits delineated with great accuracy. Walpole.
boisterous: 1. Rough or rude; unbending; unyielding; strong; powerful. [Obs.] "Boisterous sword." "Boisterous hand." Shak. 2. Exhibiting tumultuous violence and fury; acting with noisy turbulence; violent; rough; stormy. The waters swell before a boisterous storm. Shak. The brute and boisterous force of violent men. Milton. 3. Noisy; rough; turbulent; as, boisterous mirth; boisterous behavior. I like not that loud, boisterous man. Addison. 4. Vehement; excessive. [R.] The heat becomes too powerful and boisterous for them. Woodward. Syn. -- Loud; roaring; violent; stormy; turbulent; furious; tumultuous; noisy; impetuous; vehement.
denizen: 1. A dweller; an inhabitant. "Denizens of air." Pope. Denizens of their own free, independent state. Sir W. Scott. 2. One who is admitted by favor to all or a part of the rights of citizenship, where he did not possess them by birth; an adopted or naturalized citizen. 3. One admitted to residence in a foreign country. Ye gods, Natives, or denizens, of blest abodes. Dryden.  1. To constitute (one) a denizen; to admit to residence, with certain rights and privileges. As soon as denizened, they domineer. Dryden. 2. To provide with denizens; to populate with adopted or naturalized occupants. There [islets] were at once denizened by various weeds. J. D. Hooker.
acerbic: Sour or severe.
propitiate: To appease to render favorable; to make propitious; to conciliate. Let fierce Achilles, dreadful in his rage, The god propitiate, and the pest assuage. Pope.  To make propitiation; to atone.
disparage: 1. To match unequally; to degrade or dishonor by an unequal marriage. [Obs.] Alas! that any of my nation Should ever so foul disparaged be. Chaucer. 2. To dishonor by a comparison with what is inferior; to lower in rank or estimation by actions or words; to speak slightingly of; to depreciate; to undervalue. Those forbidding appearances which sometimes disparage the actions of men sincerely pious. Bp. Atterbury. Thou durst not thus disparage glorious arms. Milton. Syn. -- To decry; depreciate; undervalue; underrate; cheapen; vilify; reproach; detract from; derogate from; degrade; debase. See Decry.  Inequality in marriage; marriage with an inferior. [Obs.] Chaucer. Dissuaded her from such a disparage. Spenser.
wend: p. p. of Wene. Chaucer.  1. To go; to pass; to betake one's self. "To Canterbury they wend." Chaucer. To Athens shall the lovers wend. Shak. 2. To turn round. [Obs.] Sir W. Raleigh.  To direct; to betake;- used chiefly in the phrase to wend one's way. Also used reflexively. "Great voyages to wend." Surrey.  A large extent of ground; a perambulation; a circuit. [Obs.] Burrill.
chicanery: Mean or unfair artifice to perplex a cause and obscure the truth; stratagem; sharp practice; sophistry. Irritated by perpetual chicanery. Hallam. Syn. -- Trickery; sophistry; stratagem.
opprobrium: Disgrace; infamy; reproach mingled with contempt; abusive language. Being both dramatic author and dramatic performer, he found himself heir to a twofold opprobrium. De Quincey.
puissance: Power; strength; might; force; potency. " Youths of puissance." Tennyson. The power and puissance of the king. Shak. Note: In Spenser, Shakespeare, and Milton, puissance and puissant are usually dissyllables.
forswear: 1. To reject or renounce upon oath; hence, to renounce earnestly, determinedly, or with protestations. I . . . do forswear her. Shak. 2. To deny upon oath. Like innocence, and as serenely bold As truth, how loudly he forswears thy gold! Dryden. To forswear one's self, to swear falsely; to peforswear thyself." Syn. -- See Perjure.  To swear falsely; to commit perjury. Shak.
discreet: 1. Possessed of discernment, especially in avoiding error or evil, and in the adaptation of means to ends; prudent; sagacious; judicious; not rash or heedless; cautious. It is the discreet man, not the witty, nor the learned, nor the brave, who guides the conversation, and gives measures to society. Addison. Satire 's my weapon, but I 'm too discreet To run amuck, and tilt at all I meet. Pope. The sea is silent, the sea is discreet. Longfellow. 2. Differing; distinct. [Obs.] Spenser. -- Dis*creet"ly, adv. -- Dis*creet"ness, n.
maverick: In the southwestern part of the united States, a bullock or heifer that has not been branded, and is unclaimed or wild; -- said to be from Maverick, the name of a cattle owner in Texas who naglected to brand his cattle.
nascent: 1. Commencing, or in process of development; beginning to exist or to grow; coming into being; as, a nascent germ. Nascent passions and anxieties. Berkley. 2. (Chem.)  Evolving; being evolved or produced. Nascent state (Chem.), the supposed instantaneous or momentary state of an uncombined atom or radical just separated from one compound acid, and not yet united with another, -- a hypothetical condition implying peculiarly active chemical properties; as, hydrogen in the nascent state is a strong reducer.
adumbrate: 1. To give a faint shadow or slight representation of; to outline; to shadow forth. Both in the vastness and the richness of the visible universe the invisible God is adumbrated. L. Taylor. 2. To overshadow; to shade.
misogynist: A woman hater. Fuller.
parody: 1. A writing in which the language or sentiment of an author is mimicked; especially, a kind of literary pleasantry, in which what is written on one subject is altered, and applied to another by way of burlesque; travesty. The lively parody which he wrote . . . on Dryden's "Hind and Panther" was received with great applause. Macaulay. 2. A popular maxim, adage, or proverb. [Obs.]  To write a parody upon; to burlesque. I have translated, or rather parodied, a poem of Horace. Pope.
extemporaneous: Composed, performed, or uttered on the spur of the moment, or without previous study; unpremeditated; off-hand; extempore; extemporary; as, an extemporaneous address or production. -- Ex*tem`po*ra"ne*ous*ly, adv. -- Ex*tem`po*ra"ne*ous*ness,n.
effluvium: Subtile or invisible emanation; exhalation perceived by the sense of smell; especially, noisome or noxious exhalation; as, the effluvium from diseased or putrefying bodies, or from ill drainage.
natty: Neat; tidy; spruce. [Colloq.] -- Nat"ti*ly, adv. -- Nat"ti*ness, n.
aver: A work horse, or working ox. [Obs. or Dial. Eng.]  1. To assert, or prove, the truth of. [Obs.] 2. (Law)  To avouch or verify; to offer to verify; to prove or justify. See Averment. 3. To affirm with confidence; to declare in a positive manner, as in confidence of asserting the truth. It is sufficient that the very fact hath its foundation in truth, as I do seriously aver is the case. Fielding. Then all averred I had killed the bird. Coleridge. Syn. -- To assert; affirm; asseverate. See Affirm.
stentorian: Of or pertaining to a stentor; extremely loud; powerful; as, a stentorian voice; stentorian lungs.
debacle: A breaking or bursting forth; a violent rush or flood of waters which breaks down opposing barriers, and hurls forward and disperses blocks of stone and other débris.
viscous: Adhesive or sticky, and having a ropy or glutinous consistency; viscid; glutinous; clammy; tenacious; as, a viscous juice. -- Vis"cous*ness, n. Note: There is no well-defined distinction in meaning between viscous and viscid.
disparate: 1. Unequal; dissimilar; separate. Connecting disparate thoughts, purely by means of resemblances in the words expressing them. Coleridge. 2. (Logic)  Pertaining to two coördinate species or divisions.
taciturn: Habitually silent; not given to converse; not apt to talk or speak. -- Tac"i*turn*ly, adv. Syn. -- Silent; reserved. Taciturn, Silent. Silent has reference to the act; taciturn, to the habit. A man may be silent from circumstances; he is taciturn from disposition. The loquacious man is at times silent; one who is taciturn may now and then make an effort at conversation.
voluble: 1. Easily rolling or turning; easily set in motion; apt to roll; rotating; as, voluble particles of matter. 2. Moving with ease and smoothness in uttering words; of rapid speech; nimble in speaking; glib; as, a flippant, voluble, tongue. [Cassio,] a knave very voluble. Shak. Note: Voluble was used formerly to indicate readiness of speech merely, without any derogatory suggestion. "A grave and voluble eloquence." Bp. Hacket. 3. Changeable; unstable; fickle. [Obs.] 4. (Bot.)  Having the power or habit of turning or twining; as, the voluble stem of hop plants. Voluble stem (Bot.), a stem that climbs by winding, or twining, round another body. -- Vol"u*ble*ness, n. -- Vol"u*bly, adv.
culpable: 1. Deserving censure; worthy of blame; faulty; immoral; criminal. State Trials (1413). If he acts according to the best reason he hath, he is not culpable, though he be mistaken in his measures. Sharp. 2. Guilty; as, clpable of a crime. [Obs.] Spenser. -- Cul"pa*ble*ness, n. -- Cul"pa*bly, adv.
precipitate: 1. Overhasty; rash; as, the king was too precipitate in declaring war. Clarendon. 2. Lacking due deliberation or care; hurried; said or done before the time; as, a precipitate measure. "The rapidity of our too precipitate course." Landor. 3. Falling, flowing, or rushing, with steep descent; headlong. Precipitate the furious torrent flows. Prior. 4. Ending quickly in death; brief and fatal; as, a precipitate case of disease. [Obs.] Arbuthnot.  An insoluble substance separated from a solution in a concrete state by the action of some reagent added to the solution, or of some force, such as heat or cold. The precipitate may fall to the bottom (whence the name), may be diffused through the solution, or may float at or near the surface. Red precipitate (Old. Chem), mercuric oxide (HgO) a heavy red crystalline powder obtained by heating mercuric nitrate, or by heating mercury in the air. Prepared in the latter manner, it was the precipitate per se of the alchemists. -- White precipitate (Old Chem.) (a) A heavy white amorphous powder (NH2.HgCl) obtained by adding ammonia to a solution of mercuric chloride or corrosive sublimate; -- formerly called also infusible white precipitate, and now amido-mercuric chloride. (b) A white crystalline substance obtained by adding a solution of corrosive sublimate to a solution of sal ammoniac (ammonium chloride); -- formerly called also fusible white precipitate.  1. To throw headlong; to cast down from a precipice or height. She and her horse had been precipitated to the pebbled region of the river. W. Irving. 2. To urge or press on with eager haste or violence; to cause to happen, or come to a crisis, suddenly or too soon; as, precipitate a journey, or a conflict. Back to his sight precipitates her steps. Glover. If they be daring, it may precipitate their designs, and prove dangerous. Bacon. 3. (Chem.)  To separate from a solution, or other medium, in the form of a precipitate; as, water precipitates camphor when in solution with alcohol. The light vapor of the preceding evening had been precipitated by the cold. W. Irving.  1. To dash or fall headlong. [R.] So many fathom down precipitating. Shak. 2. To hasten without preparation. [R.] 3. (Chem.)  To separate from a solution as a precipitate. See Precipitate, n.
cacophony: 1. (Rhet.)  An uncouth or disagreable sound of words, owing to the concurrence of harsh letters or syllables. "Cacophonies of all kinds." Pope. 2. (Mus.)  A combination of discordant sounds. 3. (Med.)  An unhealthy state of the voice.
felicitous: Characterized by felicity; happy; prosperous; delightful; skilful; successful; happily applied or expressed; appropriate. Felicitous words and images. M. Arnold. -- Fe*lic"i*tous*ly, adv. -- Fe*lic"i*tous*ness, n.
maculate: To spot; to stain; to blur. Maculate the honor of their people. Sir T. Elyot.  Marked with spots or maculæ; blotched; hence, defiled; impure; as, most maculate thoughts. Shak.
abjure: 1. To renounce upon oath; to forswear; to disavow; as, to abjure allegiance to a prince. To abjure the realm, is to swear to abandon it forever. 2. To renounce or reject with solemnity; to recant; to abandon forever; to reject; repudiate; as, to abjure errors. "Magic I here abjure." Shak. Syn. -- See Renounce.  To renounce on oath. Bp. Burnet.
timorous: 1. Fearful of danger; timid; deficient in courage. Shak. 2. Indicating, or caused by, fear; as, timorous doubts. "The timorous apostasy of chuchmen." Milman. -- Tim"or*ous*ly, adv. -- Tim"or*ous*ness, n.
chary: Careful; wary; cautious; not rash, reckless, or spendthrift; saving; frugal. His rising reputation made him more chary of his fame. Jeffrey.
waffle: 1. A thin cake baked and then rolled; a wafer. 2. A soft indented cake cooked in a waffle iron. Waffle iron, an iron utensil or mold made in two parts shutting together, -- used for cooking waffles over a fire.
vigilant: Attentive to discover and avoid danger, or to provide for safety; wakeful; watchful; circumspect; wary. "Be sober, be vigilant." 1 Pet. v. 8. Sirs, take your places, and be vigilant. Shak.
magnanimous: 1. Great of mind; elevated in soul or in sentiment; raised above what is low, mean, or ungenerous; of lofty and courageous spirit; as, a magnanimous character; a magnanimous conqueror. Be magnanimous in the enterprise. Shak. To give a kingdom hath been thought Greater and nobler done, and to law down Far more magnanimousan to assume. Milton. 2. Dictated by or exhibiting nobleness of soul; honorable; noble; not selfish. Both strived for death; magnanimous debate. Stirling. There is an indissoluble union between a magnanimous policy and the solid rewards of public prosperity and felicity. Washington.
captious: 1. Art to catch at faults; disposed to find fault or to cavil; eager to object; difficult to please. A captius and suspicious. Stillingfleet. I am sensible I have not disposed my materials to adbide the test of a captious controversy. Bwike. 2. Fitted to harass, perplex, or insnare; insidious; troublesome. Captious restraints on navigation. Bancroft. Syn. -- Caviling, carping, fault-finding; censorious; hypercritical; peevish, fretful; perverse; troublesome. -- Captious, caviling, Carping. A captious person is one who has a fault-finding habit or manner, or is disposed to catch at faults, errors, etc., with quarrelsome intent; a caviling person is disposed to raise objections on frivolous grounds; carping implies that one is given to ill-natured, persistent, or unreasonable fault-finding, or picking up of the words or actions of others. Caviling is the carping of argument, carping the caviling of ill temper. C. J. Smith.
discretion: 1. Disjunction; separation. [Obs.] Mede. 2. The quality of being discreet; wise conduct and management; cautious discernment, especially as to matters of propriety and self- control; prudence; circumspection; wariness. The better part of valor is discretion. Shak. The greatest parts without discretion may be fatal to their owner. Hume. 3. Discrimination. Well spoken, with good accent and good discretion. Shak. 4. Freedom to act according to one's own judgment; unrestrained exercise of choice or will. At discretion, without conditions or stipulations.
anodyne: Serving to assuage pain; soothing. The anodyne draught of oblivion. Burke. Note: "The word [in a medical sense] in chiefly applied to the different preparations of opium, belladonna, hyoscyamus, and lettuce." Am. Cyc.  Any medicine which allays pain, as an opiate or narcotic; anything that soothes disturbed feelings.
terse: 1. Appearing as if rubbed or wiped off; rubbed; smooth; polished. [Obs.] Many stones, . . . although terse and smooth, have not this power attractive. Sir T. Browne. 2. Refined; accomplished; -- said of persons. [R. & Obs.] "Your polite and terse gallants." Massinger. 3. Elegantly concise; free of superfluous words; polished to smoothness; as, terse language; a terse style. Terse, luminous, and dignified eloquence. Macaulay. A poet, too, was there, whose verse Was tender, musical, and terse. Longfellow. Syn. -- Neat; concise; compact. Terse, Concise. Terse was defined by Johnson "cleanly written", i. e., free from blemishes, neat or smooth. Its present sense is "free from excrescences," and hence, compact, with smoothness, grace, or elegance, as in the following lones of Whitehead: - "In eight terse lines has Phædrus told (So frugal were the bards of old) A tale of goats; and closed with grace, Plan, moral, all, in that short space." It differs from concise in not implying, perhaps, quite as much condensation, but chiefly in the additional idea of "grace or elegance." -- Terse"ly, adv. -- Terse"ness, n.
importune: 1. Inopportune; unseasonable. [Obs.] 2. Troublesome; vexatious; persistent; urgent; hence, vexatious on account of untimely urgency or perinacious solicitation. [Obs.] And their importune fates all satisfied. Spenser. Of all other affections it [envy] is the most importune and continual. Bacon.  1. To request or solicit, with urgency; to press with frequent, unreasonable, or troublesome application or pertinacity; hence, to tease; to irritate; to worry. Their ministers and residents here have perpetually importuned the court with unreasonable demands. Swift. 2. To import; to signify. [Obs.] "It importunes death." Spenser.  To require; to demand. [Obs.] We shall write to you, As time and our concernings shall importune. Shak.
foment: 1. To apply a warm lotion to; to bathe with a cloth or sponge wet with warm water or medicated liquid. 2. To cherish with heat; to foster. [Obs.] Which these soft fires . . . foment and warm. Milton. 3. To nurse to life or activity; to cherish and promote by excitements; to encourage; to abet; to instigate; -- used often in a bad sense; as, to foment ill humors. Locke. But quench the choler you foment in vain. Dryden. Exciting and fomenting a religious rebellion. Southey.
derision: 1. The act of deriding, or the state of being derided; mockery; scornful or contemptuous treatment which holds one up to ridicule. He that sitteth in the heavens shall laugh; the Lord shall have them in derision. Ps. ii. 4. Saderision called. Milton. 2. An object of derision or scorn; a laughing-stock. I was a derision to all my people. Lam. iii. 14. Syn. -- Scorn; mockery; contempt; insult; ridicule.
apogee: 1. (Astron.)  That point in the orbit of the moon which is at the greatest distance from the earth. Note: Formerly, on the hypothesis that the earth is in the center of the system, this name was given to that point in the orbit of the sun, or of a planet, which was supposed to be at the greatest distance from the earth. 2. Fig.: The farthest or highest point; culmination.
discomfit: 1. To scatter in fight; to put to rout; to defeat. And his proud foes discomfit in victorious field. Spenser. 2. To break up and frustrate the plans of; to balk Well, go with me and be not so discomfited. Shak. Syn. -- To defeat; overthrow; overpower; vanquish; conquer; baffle; frustrate; confound; discourage.  Discomfited; overthrown. [Obs.]  Rout; overthrow; discomfiture. Such as discomfort as shall quite despoil him. Milton.
insensible: 1. Destitute of the power of feeling or perceiving; wanting bodily sensibility. Milton. 2. Not susceptible of emotion or passion; void of feeling; apathetic; unconcerned; indifferent; as, insensible to danger, fear, love, etc.; -- often used with of or to. Accept an obligation without being a slave to the giver, or insensible to his kindness. Sir H. Wotton. Lost in their loves, insensible of shame. Dryden. 3. Incapable of being perceived by the senses; imperceptible. Hence: Progressing by imperceptible degrees; slow; gradual; as, insensible motion. Two small and almost insensible pricks were found upon Cleopatra's arm. Sir T. Browne. They fall away, And languish with insensible decay. Dryden. 4. Not sensible or reasonable; meaningless. [Obs.] If it make the indictment be insensible or uncertain, it shall be quashed. Sir M. Hale. Syn. -- Imperceptible; imperceivable; dull; stupid; torpid; numb; unfeeling; apathetic; stoical; impassive; indifferent; unsusceptible; hard; callous.
consequential: 1. Following as a consequence, result, or logical inference; consequenment. All that is revealed in Scripture has a consequential necessity of being believed . . . because it is of divine authority. Locke. These kind of arguments . . . are highly consequential and concludent to my purpose. Sir M. Hale. 2. Assuming or exhibiting an air of consequence; pretending to importance; pompous; self-important; as, a consequential man. See Consequence, n., 4. His stately and consequential pace. Sir W. Scott. Consequential damage (Law) (a) Damage so remote as not to be actionable (b) Damage which although remote is actionable. (c) Actionable damage, but not following as an immediate result of an act.
strut: 1. To swell; to bulge out. [R.] The bellying canvas strutted with the gale. Dryden. 2. To walk with a lofty, proud gait, and erect head; to walk with affected dignity. Does he not hold up his head, . . . and strut in his gait Shak.  1. The act of strutting; a pompous step or walk. 2. (Arch.)  In general, any piece of a frame which resists thrust or pressure in the direction of its own length. See Brace, and Illust. of Frame, and Roof. 3. (Engin.)  Any part of a machine or structure, of which the principal function is to hold things apart; a brace subjected to compressive stress; -- the opposite of stay, and tie.  To hold apart. Cf. Strut, n., 3.  Protuberant. [Obs.] Holland.
furtive: Stolen; obtained or characterized by stealth; sly; secret; stealthy; as, a furtive look. Prior. A hasty and furtive ceremony. Hallam.
abscond: 1. To hide, withdraw, or be concealed. The marmot absconds all winter. Ray. 2. To depart clandestinely; to steal off and secrete one's self; -- used especially of persons who withdraw to avoid a legal process; as, an absconding debtor. That very homesickness which, in regular armies, drives so many recruits to abscond. Macaulay.  To hide; to conceal. [Obs.] Bentley.
salubrious: Favorable to health; healthful; promoting health; as, salubrious air, water, or climate. Syn. -- Healthful; wholesome; healthy; salutary. -- Sa-lu"bri*ous*ly, adv. -- Sa*lu"bri*ous*ness, n.
refulgent: Casting a bright light; radiant; brilliant; resplendent; shining; splendid; as, refulgent beams. -- Re*ful"gent*ly, adv. So conspicuous and refulgent a truth. Boyle.
surfeit: 1. Excess in eating and drinking. Let not Sir Surfeit sit at thy board. Piers Plowman. Now comes the sick hour that his surfeit made. Shak. 2. Fullness and oppression of the system, occasioned often by excessive eating and drinking. To prevent surfeit and other diseases that are incident to those that heat their blood by travels. Bunyan. 3. Disgust caused by excess; satiety. Sir P. Sidney. Matter and argument have been supplied abundantly, and even to surfeit. Burke.  1. To load the stomach with food, so that sickness or uneasiness ensues; to eat to excess. They are as sick that surfeit with too much as they that starve with nothing. Shak. 2. To indulge to satiety in any gratification.  1. To feed so as to oppress the stomach and derange the function of the system; to overfeed, and produce satiety, sickness, or uneasiness; -- often reflexive; as, to surfeit one's self with sweets. 2. To fill to satiety and disgust; to cloy; as, he surfeits us with compliments. V. Knox.
neophyte: 1. A new convert or proselyte; -- a name given by the early Christians, and still given by the Roman Catholics, to such as have recently embraced the Christian faith, and been admitted to baptism, esp. to converts from heathenism or Judaism. 2. A novice; a tyro; a beginner in anything.
raffish: Resembling, or having the character of, raff, or a raff; worthless; low. A sad, raffish, disreputable character. Thackeray.
inscrutable: Unsearchable; incapable of being searched into and understood by inquiry or study; impossible or difficult to be explained or accounted for satisfactorily; obscure; incomprehensible; as, an inscrutable design or event. 'T is not in man To yield a reason for the will of Heaven Which is inscrutable. Beau. & Fl. Waiving a question so inscrutable as this. De Quincey.
putrefy: 1. To render putrid; to cause to decay offensively; to cause to be decomposed; to cause to rot. 2. To corrupt; to make foul. Private suits do putrefy the public good. Bacon. They would but stink, and putrefy the air. Shak. 3. To make morbid, carious, or gangrenous; as, to putrefy an ulcer or wound.  To become putrid; to decay offensively; to rot. Isa. 1. 6.
ignobility: Ignobleness. [Obs.] Bale.
asseverate: To affirm or aver positively, or with solemnity. Syn. -- To affirm; aver; protest; declare. See Affirm.
venerate: To regard with reverential respect; to honor with mingled respect and awe; to reverence; to revere; as, we venerate parents and elders. And seemed to venerate the sacred shade. Dryden. I do not know a man more to be venerated for uprightness of heart and loftiness of genius. Sir W. Scott. Syn. -- To reverence; revere; adore; respect.
axiom: 1. (Logic & Math.)  A self-evident and necessary truth, or a proposition whose truth is so evident as first sight that no reasoning or demonstration can make it plainer; a proposition which it is necessary to take for granted; as, "The whole is greater than a part;" "A thing can not, at the same time, be and not be." 2. An established principle in some art or science, which, though not a necessary truth, is universally received; as, the axioms of political economy. Syn. -- Axiom, Maxim, Aphorism, Adage. An axiom is a self-evident truth which is taken for granted as the basis of reasoning. A maxim is a guiding principle sanctioned by experience, and relating especially to the practical concerns of life. An aphorism is a short sentence pithily expressing some valuable and general truth or sentiment. An adage is a saying of long-established authority and of universal application.
filigree: Ornamental work, formerly with grains or breads, but now composed of fine wire and used chiefly in decorating gold and silver to which the wire is soldered, being arranged in designs frequently of a delicate and intricate arabesque pattern.  Relating to, composed of, or resembling, work in filigree; as, a filigree basket. Hence: Fanciful; unsubstantial; merely decorative. You ask for reality, not fiction and filigree work. J. C. Shairp.
exact: 1. Precisely agreeing with a standard, a fact, or the truth; perfectly conforming; neither exceeding nor falling short in any respect; true; correct; precise; as, the clock keeps exact time; he paid the exact debt; an exact copy of a letter; exact accounts. I took a great pains to make out the exact truth. Jowett (Thucyd. ) 2. Habitually careful to agree with a standard, a rule, or a promise; accurate; methodical; punctual; as, a man exact in observing an appointment; in my doings I was exact. "I see thou art exact of taste." Milton. 3. Precisely or definitely conceived or stated; strict. An exact command, Larded with many several sorts of reason. Shak.  To demand or require authoritatively or peremptorily, as a right; to enforce the payment of, or a yielding of; to compel to yield or to furnish; hence, to wrest, as a fee or reward when none is due; -- followed by from or of before the one subjected to exaction; as, to exact tribute, fees, obedience, etc., from or of some one. He said into them, Exact no more than that which is appointed you. Luke. iii. 13. Years of servise past From grateful souls exact reward at last Dryden. My designs Exact me in another place. Massinger.  To practice exaction. [R.] The anemy shall not exact upon him. Ps. lxxxix. 22.
untrammeled: Not hampered or impeded; free. [Written also untrammelled.]
histrionic: Of or relating to the stage or a stageplayer; befitting a theatre; theatrical; -- sometimes in a bad sense. -- His`tri*on"ic*al*ly, adv. Tainted with false and histrionic feeling. De Quincey.
parlous: 1. Attended with peril; dangerous; as, a parlous cough. [Archaic] "A parlous snuffing." Beau. & Fl. 2. Venturesome; bold; mischievous; keen. [Obs.] "A parlous boy." Shak. "A parlous wit." Dryden. -- Par"lous*ly, adv. [Obs.] -- Par"lous*ness, n. [Obs.]
tyro: A beginner in learning; one who is in the rudiments of any branch of study; a person imperfectly acquainted with a subject; a novice. [Written also tiro.] The management of tyros of eighteen Is difficult. Cowper.
veracity: The quality or state of being veracious; habitual observance of truth; truthfulness; truth; as, a man of veracity.
precocity: The quality or state of being precocious; untimely ripeness; premature development, especially of the mental powers; forwardness. Saucy precociousness in learning. Bp. Mannyngham. That precocity which sometimes distinguishes uncommon genius. Wirt.
ephemeral: 1. Beginning and ending in a day; existing only, or no longer than, a day; diurnal; as, an ephemeral flower. 2. Short-lived; existing or continuing for a short time only. "Ephemeral popularity." V. Knox. Sentences not of ephemeral, but of eternal, efficacy. Sir J. Stephen. Ephemeral fly (Zoöl.), one of a group of neuropterous insects, belonging to the genus Ephemera and many allied genera, which live in the adult or winged state only for a short time. The larvæ are aquatic; -- called also day fly and May fly.  Anything lasting but a day, or a brief time; an ephemeral plant, insect, etc.
probity: Tried virtue or integrity; approved moral excellence; honesty; rectitude; uprightness. "Probity of mind." Pope. Syn. -- Probity, Integrity. Probity denotes unimpeachable honesty and virtue, shown especially by the performance of those obligations, called imperfect, which the laws of the state do not reach, and can not enforce. Integrity denotes a whole-hearted honesty, and especially that which excludes all injustice that might favor one's self. It has a peculiar reference to uprightness in mutual dealings, transfer of property, and the execution of trusts for others.
solvent: 1. Having the power of dissolving; dissolving; as, a solvent fluid. "the solvent body." Boyle. 2. Able or sufficient to pay all just debts; as, a solvent merchant; the estate is solvent.  A substance (usually liquid) suitable for, or employed in, solution, or in dissolving something; as, water is the appropriate solvent of most salts, alcohol of resins, ether of fats, and mercury or acids of metal, etc. 2. That which resolves; as, a solvent of mystery.
arrest: 1. To stop; to check or hinder the motion or action of; as, to arrest the current of a river; to arrest the senses. Nor could her virtues the relentless hand Of Death arrest. Philips. 2. (Law)  To take, seize, or apprehend by authority of law; as, to arrest one for debt, or for a crime. Note: After his word Shakespeare uses of ("I arrest thee of high treason") or on; the modern usage is for. 3. To seize on and fix; to hold; to catch; as, to arrest the eyes or attention. Buckminster. 4. To rest or fasten; to fix; to concentrate. [Obs.] We may arrest our thoughts upon the divine mercies. Jer. Taylor. Syn. -- To obstruct; delay; detain; check; hinder; stop; apprehend; seize; lay hold of.  To tarry; to rest. [Obs.] Spenser.  1. The act of stopping, or restraining from further motion, etc.; stoppage; hindrance; restraint; as, an arrest of development. As the arrest of the air showeth. Bacon. 2. (Law)  The taking or apprehending of a person by authority of law; legal restraint; custody. Also, a decree, mandate, or warrant. William . . . ordered him to be put under arrest. Macaulay. [Our brother Norway] sends out arrests On Fortinbras; which he, in brief, obeys. Shak. Note: An arrest may be made by seizing or touching the body; but it is sufficient in the party be within the power of the officer and submit to the arrest. In Admiralty law, and in old English practice, the term is applied to the seizure of property. 3. Any seizure by power, physical or moral. The sad stories of fire from heaven, the burning of his sheep, etc., . . . were sad arrests to his troubled spirit. Jer. Taylor. 4. (Far.)  A scurfiness of the back part of the hind leg of a horse; -- also named rat-tails. White. Arrest of judgment (Law), the staying or stopping of a judgment, after verdict, for legal cause. The motion for this purpose is called a motion in arrest of judgment.
bent: imp. & p. p. of Bend.  1. Changed by pressure so as to be no longer straight; crooked; as, a bent pin; a bent lever. 2. Strongly inclined toward something, so as to be resolved, determined, set, etc.; -- said of the mind, character, disposition, desires, etc., and used with on; as, to be bent on going to college; he is bent on mischief.  1. The state of being curved, crooked, or inclined from a straight line; flexure; curvity; as, the bent of a bow. [Obs.] Wilkins. 2. A declivity or slope, as of a hill. [R.] Dryden. 3. A leaning or bias; proclivity; tendency of mind; inclination; disposition; purpose; aim. Shak. With a native bent did good pursue. Dryden. 4. Particular direction or tendency; flexion; course. Bents and turns of the matter. Locke. 5. (Carp.)  A transverse frame of a framed structure. 6. Tension; force of acting; energy; impetus. [Archaic] The full bent and stress of the soul. Norris. Syn. -- Predilection; turn. Bent, Bias, Inclination, Prepossession. These words agree in describing a permanent influence upon the mind which tends to decide its actions. Bent denotes a fixed tendency of the mind in a given direction. It is the widest of these terms, and applies to the will, the intellect, and the affections, taken conjointly; as, the whole bent of his character was toward evil practices. Bias is literally a weight fixed on one side of a ball used in bowling, and causing it to swerve from a straight course. Used figuratively, bias applies particularly to the judgment, and denotes something which acts with a permanent force on the character through that faculty; as, the bias of early education, early habits, etc. Inclination is an excited state of desire or appetency; as, a strong inclination to the study of the law. Prepossession is a mingled state of feeling and opinion in respect to some person or subject, which has laid hold of and occupied the mind previous to inquiry. The word is commonly used in a good sense, an unfavorable impression of this kind being denominated a prejudice. "Strong minds will be strongly bent, and usually labor under a strong bias; but there is no mind so weak and powerless as not to have its inclinations, and none so guarded as to be without its prepossessions." Crabb.  1. A reedlike grass; a stalk of stiff, coarse grass. His spear a bent, both stiff and strong. Drayton. 2. (Bot.)  A grass of the genus Agrostis, esp. Agrostis vulgaris, or redtop. The name is also used of many other grasses, esp. in America. 3. Any neglected field or broken ground; a common; a moor. [Obs.] Wright. Bowmen bickered upon the bent. Chevy Chase.
meet: 1. To join, or come in contact with; esp., to come in contact with by approach from an opposite direction; to come upon or against, front to front, as distinguished from contact by following and overtaking. 2. To come in collision with; to confront in conflict; to encounter hostilely; as, they met the enemy and defeated them; the ship met opposing winds and currents. 3. To come into the presence of without contact; to come close to; to intercept; to come within the perception, influence, or recognition of; as, to meet a train at a junction; to meet carriages or persons in the street; to meet friends at a party; sweet sounds met the ear. His daughter came out to meet him. Judg. xi. 34. 4. To perceive; to come to a knowledge of; to have personal acquaintance with; to experience; to suffer; as, the eye met a horrid sight; he met his fate. Of vice or virtue, whether blest or curst, Which meets contempt, or which compassion first. Pope. 5. To come up to; to be even with; to equal; to match; to satisfy; to ansver; as, to meet one's expectations; the supply meets the demand. To meet half way, literally, to go half the distance between in order to meet (one); hence, figuratively, to yield or concede half of the difference in order to effect a compromise or reconciliation with.  1. To come together by mutual approach; esp., to come in contact, or into proximity, by approach from opposite directions; to join; to come face to face; to come in close relationship; as, we met in the street; two lines meet so as to form an angle. O, when meet now Such pairs in love and mutual honor joined ! Milton. 2. To come together with hostile purpose; to have an encounter or conflict. Weapons more violent, when next we meet, May serve to better us and worse our foes. Milton. 3. To assemble together; to congregate; as, Congress meets on the first Monday of December. They . . . appointed a day to meet together. 2. Macc. xiv. 21. 4. To come together by mutual concessions; hence, to agree; to harmonize; to unite. To meet with. (a) To light upon; to find; to come to; -- often with the sense of unexpectedness. We met with many things worthy of observation. Bacon. (b) To join; to unite in company. Shak. (c) To suffer unexpectedly; as, to meet with a fall; to meet with a loss. (d) To encounter; to be subjected to. Prepare to meet with more than brutal fury From the fierce prince. Rowe. (e) To obviate. [Obs.] Bacon.  An assembling together; esp., the assembling of huntsmen for the hunt; also, the persons who so assemble, and the place of meeting.  Suitable; fit; proper; appropriate; qualified; convenient. It was meet that we should make merry. Luke xv. 32. To be meet with, to be even with; to be equal to. [Obs.]  Meetly. [Obs.] Shak.
aesthetic: Of or Pertaining to æsthetics; versed in æsthetics; as, æsthetic studies, emotions, ideas, persons, etc. -- Æs*thet"ic*al*ly, adv.
pecuniary: 1. Relating to money; monetary; as, a pecuniary penalty; a pecuniary reward. Burke.
cynicism: The doctrine of the Cynics; the quality of being cynical; the mental state, opnions, or conduct, of a cynic; morose and contemptuous views and opinions.
ameliorate: To make better; to improve; to meliorate. In every human being there is a wish to ameliorate his own condition. Macaulay.  To grow better; to meliorate; as, wine ameliorates by age.
guy: A rope, chain, or rod attached to anything to steady it; as: a rope to steady or guide an object which is being hoisted or lowered; a rope which holds in place the end of a boom, spar, or yard in a ship; a chain or wire rope connecting a suspension bridge with the land on either side to prevent lateral swaying; a rod or rope attached to the top of a structure, as of a derrick, and extending obliquely to the ground, where it is fastened.  To steady or guide with a guy.  1. A grotesque effigy, like that of Guy Fawkes, dressed up in England on the fifth of November, the day of the Gunpowder Plot. The lady . . . who dresses like a guy. W. S. Gilbert. 2. A person of queer looks or dress. Dickens.  To fool; to baffle; to make (a person) an object of ridicule. [Local & Collog U.S.]
erudite: Characterized by extensive reading or knowledge; well instructed; learned. "A most erudite prince." Sir T. More. "Erudite . . . theology." I. Taylor. -- Er"u*dite`ly, adv. -- Er"u*dite`ness, n.
fervent: 1. Hot; glowing; boiling; burning; as, a fervent summer. The elements shall melt with fervent heat. 2 Pet. iii. 10. 2. Warm in feeling; ardent in temperament; earnest; full of fervor; zealous; glowing. Not slothful in business; fervent in spirit. Rom. iii. 11. So spake the fervent angel. Milton. A fervent desire to promote the happiness of mankind. Macaulay. -- Fer"vent*ly, adv. -- Fer"vent*ness, n. Laboring fervently for you in prayers. Col. iv. 12.
indefatigable: Incapable of being fatigued; not readily exhausted; unremitting in labor or effort; untiring; unwearying; not yielding to fatigue; as, indefatigable exertions, perseverance, application. "A constant, indefatigable attendance." South. Upborne with indefatigable wings. Milton. Syn. -- Unwearied; untiring; persevering; persistent.
refute: To disprove and overthrow by argument, evidence, or countervailing proof; to prove to be false or erroneous; to confute; as, to refute arguments; to refute testimony; to refute opinions or theories; to refute a disputant. There were so many witnesses in these two miracles that it is impossible to refute such multitudes. Addison. Syn. -- To confute; disprove. See Confute.
soporific: Causing sleep; tending to cause sleep; soporiferous; as, the soporific virtues of opium. Syn. -- Somniferous; narcotic; opiate; anodyne.  A medicine, drug, plant, or other agent that has the quality of inducing sleep; a narcotic.
scurvy: 1. Covered or affected with scurf or scabs; scabby; scurfy; specifically, diseased with the scurvy. "Whatsoever man . . . be scurvy or scabbed." lev. xxi. 18, 20. 2. Vile; mean; low; vulgar; contemptible. "A scurvy trick." Ld. Lytton. That scurvy custom of taking tobacco. Swift. [He] spoke spoke such scurvy and provoking terms. Shak.  A disease characterized by livid spots, especially about the thighs and legs, due to extravasation of blood, and by spongy gums, and bleeding from almost all the mucous membranes. It is accompanied by paleness, languor, depression, and general debility. It is occasioned by confinement, innutritious food, and hard labor, but especially by lack of fresh vegetable food, or confinement for a long time to a limited range of food, which is incapable of repairing the waste of the system. It was formerly prevalent among sailors and soldiers. Scurvy grass Etym: [Scurvy + grass; or cf. Icel. skarfakal scurvy grass.] (Bot.) A kind of cress (Cochlearia officinalis) growing along the seacoast of Northern Europe and in arctic regions. It is a remedy for the scurvy, and has proved a valuable food to arctic explorers. The name is given also to other allied species of plants.
peroration: The concluding part of an oration; especially, a final summing up and enforcement of an argument. Burke.
hegemony: Leadership; preponderant influence or authority; -- usually applied to the relation of a government or state to its neighbors or confederates. Lieber.
intransigent: Refusing compromise; uncompromising; irreconcilable. Lond. Sat. Rev.
churlish: 1. Like a churl; rude; cross-grained; ungracious; surly; illiberal; niggardly. "Churlish benefits." Ld. Burleigh. Half mankind maintain a churlish strife. Cowper. 2. Wanting pliancy; unmanageable; unyielding; not easily wrought; as, a churlish soil; the churlish and intractable nature of some minerals. Boyle.
cosset: A lamb reared without the aid of the dam. Hence: A pet, in general.  To treat as a pet; to fondle. She was cosseted and posseted and prayed over and made much of. O. W. Holmes.
apotheosis: 1. The act of elevating a mortal to the rank of, and placing him among, "the gods;" deification. 2. Glorification; exaltation. "The apotheosis of chivalry." Prescott. "The noisy apotheosis of liberty and machinery." F. Harrison.
heterodox: 1. Contrary to, or differing from, some acknowledged standard, as the Bible, the creed of a church, the decree of a council, and the like; not orthodox; heretical; -- said of opinions, doctrines, books, etc., esp. upon theological subjects. Raw and indigested, heterodox, preaching. Strype. 2. Holding heterodox opinions, or doctrines not orthodox; heretical; -- said of persons. Macaulay. -- Het"er*o*dox`ly, adv. -- Het"er*o*dox`ness, n.  An opinion opposed to some accepted standard. [Obs.] Sir T. Browne.
transient: 1. Passing before the sight or perception, or, as it were, moving over or across a space or scene viewed, and then disappearing; hence, of short duration; not permanent; not lasting or durable; not stationary; passing; fleeting; brief; transitory; as, transient pleasure. "Measured this transient world." Milton. 2. Hasty; momentary; imperfect; brief; as, a transient view of a landscape. 3. Staying for a short time; not regular or permanent; as, a transient guest; transient boarders. [Colloq. U.S.] Syn. -- Transient, Transitory, Fleeting. Transient represents a thing as brief at the best; transitory, as liable at any moment to pass away. Fleeting goes further, and represents it as in the act of taking its flight. Life is transient; its joys are transitory; its hours are fleeting. What is loose love A transient gust. Pope If [we love] transitory things, which soon decay, Age must be loveliest at the latest day. Donne. O fleeting joys Of Paradise, dear bought with lasting woes. Milton. -- Tran"sient*ly, adv. -- Tran"sient*ness, n.  That which remains but for a brief time. Glanvill.
prowess: Distinguished bravery; valor; especially, military bravery and skill; gallantry; intrepidity; fearlessness. Chaucer. Sir P. Sidney. He by his prowess conquered all France. Shak.
diaphanous: Allowing light to pass through, as porcelain; translucent or transparent; pellucid; clear. Another cloud in the region of them, light enough to be fantastic and diaphanous. Landor.
forestall: 1. To take beforehand, or in advance; to anticipate. What need a man forestall his date of grief, And run to meet what he would most avoid Milton. 2. To take possession of, in advance of some one or something else, to the exclusion or detriment of the latter; to get ahead of; to preoccupy; also, to exclude, hinder, or prevent, by prior occupation, or by measures taken in advance. An ugly serpent which forestalled their way. Fairfax. But evermore those damsels did forestall Their furious encounter. Spenser. To be forestalled ere we come to fall. Shak. Habit is a forestalled and obstinate judge. Rush. 3. To deprive; -- with of. [R.] All the better; may This night forestall him of the coming day! Shak. 4. (Eng. Law)  To obstruct or stop up, as a way; to stop the passage of on highway; to intercept on the road, as goods on the way to market. To forestall the market, to buy or contract for merchandise or provision on its way to market, with the intention of selling it again at a higher price; to dissuade persons from bringing their goods or provisions there; or to persuade them to enhance the price when there. This was an offense at law in England until 1844. Burrill. Syn. -- To anticipate; monopolize; engross.
deposition: 1. The act of depositing or deposing; the act of laying down or thrown down; precipitation. The deposition of rough sand and rolled pebbles. H. Miller. 2. The act of bringing before the mind; presentation. The influence of princes upon the dispositions of their courts needs not the deposition of their examples, since it hath the authority of a known principle. W. Montagu. 3. The act of setting aside a sovereign or a public officer; deprivation of authority and dignity; displacement; removal. Note: A deposition differs from an abdication, an abdication being voluntary, and a deposition compulsory. 4. That which is deposited; matter laid or thrown down; sediment; alluvial matter; as, banks are sometimes depositions of alluvial matter. 5. An opinion, example, or statement, laid down or asserted; a declaration. 6. (Law)  The act of laying down one's testimony in writing; also, testimony laid or taken down in writting, under oath or affirmation, befor some competent officer, and in reply to interrogatories and cross-interrogatories. Syn. -- Deposition, Affidavit. Affidavit is the wider term. It denotes any authorized ex parte written statement of a person, sworn to or affirmed before some competent magistrate. It is made without cross- examination, and requires no notice to an opposing party. It is generally signed by the party making it, and may be drawn up by himself or any other person. A deposition is the written testimony of a witness, taken down in due form of law, and sworn to or affirmed by the deponent. It must be taken before some authorized magistrate, and upon a prescribed or reasonable notice to the opposing party, that may attend and cross-examine. It is generally written down from the mouth of the witness by the magistrate, or some person for him, and in his presence.
dilatory: 1. Inclined to defer or put off what ought to be done at once; given the procrastination; delaying; procrastinating; loitering; as, a dilatory servant. 2. Marked by procrastination or delay; tardy; slow; sluggish; -- said of actions or measures. Alva, as usual, brought his dilatory policy to bear upon hiMotley. Dilatory plea (Law), a plea designed to create delay in the trial of a cause, generally founded upon some matter not connected with the merits of the case. Syn. -- Slow; delaying; sluggish; inactive; loitering; behindhand; backward; procrastinating. See Slow.
misanthrope: A hater of mankind; a misanthropist.
fulminate: 1. To thunder; hence, to make a loud, sudden noise; to detonate; to explode with a violent report. 2. To issue or send forth decrees or censures with the assumption of supreme authority; to thunder forth menaces.  1. To cause to explode. Sprat. 2. To utter or send out with denunciations or censures; -- said especially of menaces or censures uttered by ecclesiastical authority. They fulminated the most hostile of all decrees. De Quincey.  (a) A salt of fulminic acid. See under Fulminic. (b) A fulminating powder. Fulminate of gold, an explosive compound of gold; -- called also fulminating gold, and aurum fulminans.
impassive: Not susceptible of pain or suffering; apathetic; impassible; unmoved. Impassive as the marble in the quarry. De Quincey. On the impassive ice the lightings play. Pope. -- Im*pas"sive*ly, adv. -- Im*pas"sive*ness, n.
forbearance: The act of forbearing or waiting; the exercise of patience. He soon shall findForbearance no acquittance ere day end. Milton. 2. The quality of being forbearing; indulgence toward offenders or enemies; long-suffering. Have a continent forbearance, till the speed of his rage goeShak. Syn. -- Abstinence; refraining; lenity; mildness.
wanton: 1. Untrained; undisciplined; unrestrained; hence, loose; free; luxuriant; roving; sportive. "In woods and wanton wilderness." Spenser. "A wild and wanton herd." Shak. A wanton and a merry [friar]. Chaucer. [She] her unadorned golden tresses wore Disheveled, but in wanton ringlets waved. Milton. How does your tongue grow wanton in her praise! Addison. 2. Wandering from moral rectitude; perverse; dissolute. "Men grown wanton by prosperity." Roscommon. 3. Specifically: Deviating from the rules of chastity; lewd; lustful; lascivious; libidinous; lecherous. Not with wanton looking of folly. Chaucer. [Thou art] froward by nature, enemy to peace, Lascivious, wanton. Shak. 4. Reckless; heedless; as, wanton mischief.  1. A roving, frolicsome thing; a trifler; -- used rarely as a term of endearment. I am afeard you make a wanton of me. Shak. Peace, my wantons; he will do More than you can aim unto. B. Jonson. 2. One brought up without restraint; a pampered pet. Anything, sir, That's dry and wholesome; I am no bred wanton. Beau. & Fl. 3. A lewd person; a lascivious man or woman.  1. To rove and ramble without restraint, rule, or limit; to revel; to play loosely; to frolic. Nature here wantoned as in her prime. Milton. How merrily we would sally into the fields, and strip under the first warmth of the sun, and wanton like young dace in the streams! Lamb. 2. To sport in lewdness; to play the wanton; to play lasciviously.  To cause to become wanton; also, to waste in wantonness. [Obs.]
lament: To express or feel sorrow; to weep or wail; to mourn. Jeremiah lamented for Josiah. 2 Chron. xxxv. 25. Ye shall weep and lament, but the world shall rejoice. John xvi. 20.  To mourn for; to bemoan; to bewail. One laughed at follies, one lamented crimes. Dryden. Syn. -- To deplore; mourn; bewail. See Deplore.  1. Grief or sorrow expressed in complaints or cries; lamentation; a wailing; a moaning; a weeping. Torment, and loud lament, and furious rage. Milton. 2. An elegy or mournful ballad, or the like.
redolence: The quality of being redolent; sweetness of scent; pleasant odor; fragrance.
pious: 1. Of or pertaining to piety; exhibiting piety; reverential; dutiful; religious; devout; godly. "Pious hearts." Milton. "Pious poetry." Johnson. Where was the martial brother's pious care Pope. 2. Practiced under the pretext of religion; prompted by mistaken piety; as, pious errors; pious frauds. Syn. -- Godly; devout; religious; righteous.
insipid: 1. Wanting in the qualities which affect the organs of taste; without taste or savor; vapid; tasteless; as, insipid drink or food. Boyle. 2. Wanting in spirit, life, or animation; uninteresting; weak; vapid; flat; dull; heavy; as, an insipid woman; an insipid composition. Flat, insipid, and ridiculous stuff to him. South. But his wit is faint, and his salt, if I may dare to say so, almost insipid. Dryden. Syn. -- Tasteless; vapid; dull; spiritless; unanimated; lifeless; flat; stale; pointless; uninteresting.
belie: 1. To show to be false; to convict of, or charge with, falsehood. Their trembling hearts belie their boastful tongues. Dryden. 2. To give a false representation or account of. Should I do so, I should belie my thoughts. Shak. 3. To tell lie about; to calumniate; to slander. Thou dost belie him, Percy, thou dost belie him. Shak. 4. To mimic; to counterfeit. [Obs.] Dryden. 5. To fill with lies. [Obs.] "The breath of slander doth belie all corners of the world." Shak.
waver: 1. To play or move to and fro; to move one way and the other; hence, to totter; to reel; to swing; to flutter. With banners and pennons wavering with the wind. Ld. Berners. Thou wouldst waver on one of these trees as a terror to all evil speakers against dignities. Sir W. Scott. 2. To be unsettled in opinion; to vacillate; to be undetermined; to fluctuate; as, to water in judgment. Let us hold fast . . . without wavering. Heb. x. 23. In feeble hearts, propense enough before To waver, or fall off and join with idols. Milton. Syn. -- To reel; totter; vacillate. See Fluctuate.  A sapling left standing in a fallen wood. [Prov. Eng.] Halliwell.
lucid: 1. Shining; bright; resplendent; as, the lucid orbs of heaven. Lucid, like a glowworm. Sir I. Newton. A court compact of lucid marbles. Tennyson. 2. Clear; transparent. " Lucid streams." Milton. 3. Presenting a clear view; easily understood; clear. A lucid and interesting abstract of the debate. Macaulay. 4. Bright with the radiance of intellect; not darkened or confused by delirium or madness; marked by the regular operations of reason; as, a lucid interval. Syn. -- Luminous; bright; clear; transparent; sane; reasonable. See Luminous.
frieze: (a) That part of the entablature of an order which is between the architrave and cornice. It is a flat member or face, either uniform or broken by triglyphs, and often enriched with figures and other ornaments of sculpture. (b) Any sculptured or richly ornamented band in a building or, by extension, in rich pieces of furniture. See Illust. of Column. Cornice or frieze with bossy sculptures graven. Milton.  A kind of coarse woolen cloth or stuff with a shaggy or tufted (friezed) nap on one side. "Robes of frieze." Goldsmith.  To make a nap on (cloth); to friz. See Friz, v. t., 2. Friezing machine, a machine for friezing cloth; a friezing machine.
variegated: Having marks or patches of different colors; as, variegated leaves, or flowers. Ladies like variegated tulips show. Pope.
minatory: Threatening; menacing. Bacon.
exonerate: 1. To unload; to disburden; to discharge. [Obs.] All exonerate themselves into one common duct. Ray. 2. To relieve, in a moral sense, as of a charge, obligation, or load of blame resting on one; to clear of something that lies upon oppresses one, as an accusation or imputation; as, to exonerate one's self from blame, or from the charge of avarice. Burke. 3. To discharge from duty or obligation, as a ball. Syn. - To absolve; acquit; exculpate. See Absolve.
deprave: 1. To speak ill of; to depreciate; to malign; to revile. [Obs.] And thou knowest, conscience, I came not to chide Nor deprave thy person with a proud heart. Piers Plowman. 2. To make bad or worse; to vitiate; to corrupt. Whose pride depraves each other better part. Spenser. Syn. -- To corrupt; vitiate; contaminate; pollute.
celerity: Rapidity of motion; quickness; swiftness. Time, with all its celerity, moves slowly to him whose whole employment is to watch its flight. Johnson.
fawn: 1. (Zoöl.)  A young deer; a buck or doe of the first year. See Buck. 2. The young of an animal; a whelp. [Obs.] [The tigress] . . . followeth . . . after her fawns. Holland. 3. A fawn color.  Of the color of a fawn; fawn-colored.  To bring forth a fawn.  To court favor by low cringing, frisking, etc., as a dog; to flatter meanly; -- often followed by on or upon. You showed your teeth like apes, and fawned like hounds. Shak. Thou with trembling fear, Or like a fawning parasite, obeyest. Milton. Courtiers who fawn on a master while they betray him. Macaulay.  A servile cringe or bow; mean flattery; sycophancy. Shak.
comportment: Manner of acting; behavior; bearing. A graceful comportment of their bodies. Cowley. Her serious and devout comportment. Addison.
torque: 1. A collar or neck chain, usually twisted, especially as worn by ancient barbaric nations, as the Gauls, Germans, and Britons. 2. Etym: [L. torquere to twist.] (Mech.)  That which tends to produce torsion; a couple of forces. J. Thomson. 3. (Phys. Science)  A turning or twisting; tendency to turn, or cause to turn, about an axis.
antithetical: Pertaining to antithesis, or opposition of words and sentiments; containing, or of the nature of, antithesis; contrasted.
dirge: A piece of music of a mournful character, to accompany funeral rites; a funeral hymn. The raven croaked, and hollow shrieks of owls Sung dirges at her funeral. Ford.
presumptuous: 1. Full of presumption; presuming; overconfident or venturesome; audacious; rash; taking liberties unduly; arrogant; insolent; as, a presumptuous commander; presumptuous conduct. A class of presumptuous men, whom age has not made cautious, nor adversity wise. Buckminster. 2. Founded on presumption; as, a presumptuous idea. "False, presumptuous hope." Milton. 3. Done with hold design, rash confidence, or in violation of known duty; willful. "Keep back the servant also from presumptuous sins." Ps. xix. 13. Syn. -- Overconfident; foolhardy; rash; presuming; forward; arrogant; insolent.
fallacy: 1. Deceptive or false appearance; deceitfulness; that which misleads the eye or the mind; deception. Winning by conquest what the first man lost, By fallacy surprised. Milton. 2. (Logic)  An argument, or apparent argument, which professes to be decisive of the matter at issue, while in reality it is not; a sophism. Syn. -- Deception; deceit; mistake. -- Fallacy, Sophistry. A fallacy is an argument which professes to be decisive, but in reality is not; sophistry is also false reasoning, but of so specious and subtle a kind as to render it difficult to expose its fallacy. Many fallacies are obvious, but the evil of sophistry lies in its consummate art. "Men are apt to suffer their minds to be misled by fallacies which gratify their passions. Many persons have obscured and confounded the nature of things by their wretched sophistry; though an act be never so sinful, they will strip it of its guilt." South.
recant: To withdraw or repudiate formally and publicly (opinions formerly expressed); to contradict, as a former declaration; to take back openly; to retract; to recall. How soon . . . ease would recant Vows made in pain, as violent and void! Milton. Syn. -- To retract; recall; revoke; abjure; disown; disavow. See Renounce.  To revoke a declaration or proposition; to unsay what has been said; to retract; as, convince me that I am wrong, and I will recant. Dryden.
risible: 1. Having the faculty or power of laughing; disposed to laugh. Laughing is our busines, . . . it has been made the definition of man that he is risible. Dr. H. More. 2. Exciting laughter; worthy to be laughed at; amusing. "Risible absurdities." Johnson. I hope you find nothing risible in my complaisance. Sir W. Scott. 3. Used in, or expressing, laughter; as, risible muscles. Note: Risible is sometimes used as a noun, in the plural, for the feeling of amusement and for the muscles and other organs used in laughing, collectively; as, unable to control one's risibles. Syn. -- Ludicrous; laughable; amusing; ridiculous -- Risible, Ludicrous, Ridiculous. Risible differs from ludicrous as species from genus; ludicrous expressing that which is playful and sportive; risible, that which may excite laughter. Risible differs from ridiculous, as the latter implies something contemptuous, and risible does not. --Ris"i*ble*ness(#), n. -- Ris"i*bly, adv.
prosaic: 1. Of or pertaining to prose; resembling prose; in the form of prose; unpoetical; writing or using prose; as, a prosaic composition. Cudworth. 2. Dull; uninteresting; commonplace; unimaginative; prosy; as, a prosaic person. Ed. Rev. -- Pro*sa"ic*al*ly, adv. -- Pro*sa"ic*al*ness, n.
aggrandize: 1. To make great; to enlarge; to increase; as, to aggrandize our conceptions, authority, distress. 2. To make great or greater in power, rank, honor, or wealth; -- applied to persons, countries, etc. His scheme for aggrandizing his son. Prescott. 3. To make appear great or greater; to exalt. Lamb. Syn. -- To augment; exalt; promote; advance.  To increase or become great. [Obs.] Follies, continued till old age, do aggrandize. J. Hall.
pine: Woe; torment; pain. [Obs.] "Pyne of hell." Chaucer.  1. To inflict pain upon; to torment; to torture; to afflict. [Obs.] Chaucer. Shak. That people that pyned him to death. Piers Plowman. One is pined in prison, another tortured on the rack. Bp. Hall. 2. To grieve or mourn for. [R.] Milton.  1. To suffer; to be afflicted. [Obs.] 2. To languish; to lose flesh or wear away, under any distress or anexiety of mind; to droop; -- often used with away. "The roses wither and the lilies pine." Tickell. 3. To languish with desire; to waste away with longing for something; -- usually followed by for. For whom, and not for Tybalt, Juliet pined. Shak. Syn. -- To languish; droop; flag; wither; decay.  1. (Bot.)  Any tree of the coniferous genus Pinus. See Pinus. Note: There are about twenty-eight species in the United States, of which the white pine (P. Strobus), the Georgia pine (P. australis), the red pine (P. resinosa), and the great West Coast sugar pine (P. Lambertiana) are among the most valuable. The Scotch pine or fir, also called Norway or Riga pine (Pinus sylvestris), is the only British species. The nut pine is any pine tree, or species of pine, which bears large edible seeds. See Pinon. The spruces, firs, larches, and true cedars, though formerly considered pines, are now commonly assigned to other genera. 2. The wood of the pine tree. 3. A pineapple. Ground pine. (Bot.) See under Ground. -- Norfolk Island pine (Bot.), a beautiful coniferous tree, the Araucaria excelsa. -- Pine barren, a tract of infertile land which is covered with pines. [Southern U.S.] -- Pine borer (Zoöl.), any beetle whose larvæ bore into pine trees. -- Pine finch. (Zoöl.) See Pinefinch, in the Vocabulary. -- Pine grosbeak (Zoöl.), a large grosbeak (Pinicola enucleator), which inhabits the northern parts of both hemispheres. The adult male is more or less tinged with red. -- Pine lizard (Zoöl.), a small, very active, mottled gray lizard (Sceloporus undulatus), native of the Middle States; -- called also swift, brown scorpion, and alligator. -- Pine marten. (Zoöl.) (a) A European weasel (Mustela martes), called also sweet marten, and yellow-breasted marten. (b) The American sable. See Sable. -- Pine moth (Zoöl.), any one of several species of small tortricid moths of the genus Retinia, whose larvæ burrow in the ends of the branchlets of pine trees, often doing great damage. -- Pine mouse (Zoöl.), an American wild mouse (Arvicola pinetorum), native of the Middle States. It lives in pine forests. -- Pine needle (Bot.), one of the slender needle-shaped leaves of a pine tree. See Pinus. -- Pine-needle wool. See Pine wool (below). -- Pine oil, an oil resembling turpentine, obtained from fir and pine trees, and used in making varnishes and colors. -- Pine snake (Zoöl.), a large harmless North American snake (Pituophis melanoleucus). It is whitish, covered with brown blotches having black margins. Called also bull snake. The Western pine snake (P. Sayi) is chestnut-brown, mottled with black and orange. -- Pine tree (Bot.), a tree of the genus Pinus; pine. -- Pine-tree money, money coined in Massachusetts in the seventeenth century, and so called from its bearing a figure of a pine tree. -- Pine weevil (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of weevils whose larvæ bore in the wood of pine trees. Several species are known in both Europe and America, belonging to the genera Pissodes, Hylobius, etc. -- Pine wool, a fiber obtained from pine needles by steaming them. It is prepared on a large scale in some of the Southern United States, and has many uses in the economic arts; -- called also pine- needle wool, and pine-wood wool.
damp: 1. Moisture; humidity; fog; fogginess; vapor. Night . . . with black air Accompanied, with damps and dreadful gloom. Milton. 2. Dejection; depression; cloud of the mind. Even now, while thus I stand blest in thy presence, A secret damp of grief comes o'er my soul. Addison. It must have thrown a damp over your autumn excursion. J. D. Forbes. 3. (Mining)  A gaseous prodact, formed in coal mines, old wells, pints, etc. Choke damp, a damp consisting principally of carboniCarbonic acid, under Carbonic. -- Damp sheet, a curtain in a mine gallery to direct air currents and prevent accumulation of gas. -- Fire damp, a damp consisting chiefly of light carbureted hydrogen; -- so called from its tendence to explode when mixed with atmospheric air and brought into contact with flame.  1. Being in a state between dry and wet; moderately wet; moist; humid. O'erspread with a damp sweat and holy fear. Dryden. 2. Dejected; depressed; sunk. [R.] All these and more came flocking, but with looks Downcast and damp. Milton.  1. To render damp; to moisten; to make humid, or moderately wet; to dampen; as, to damp cloth. 2. To put out, as fire; to depress or deject; to deaden; to cloud; to check or restrain, as action or vigor; to make dull; to weaken; to discourage. "To damp your tender hopes." Akenside. Usury dulls and damps all industries, improvements, and new inventions, wherein money would be stirring if it were not for this slug. Bacon. How many a day has been damped and darkened by an angry word! Sir J. Lubbock. The failure of his enterprise damped the spirit of the soldiers. Macaulay.
reprehensible: Worthy of reprehension; culpable; censurable; blamable. -- Rep`re*hen"si*ble*ness, n. -- Rep`re*hen"si*bly, adv.
adroit: Dexterous in the use of the hands or in the exercise of the mental faculties; exhibiting skill and readiness in avoiding danger or escaping difficulty; ready in invention or execution; -- applied to persons and to acts; as, an adroit mechanic, an adroit reply. "Adroit in the application of the telescope and quadrant." Horsley. "He was adroit in intrigue." Macaulay. Syn. -- Dexterous; skillful; expert; ready; clever; deft; ingenious; cunning; ready-witted.
tacit: Done or made in silence; implied, but not expressed; silent; as, tacit consent is consent by silence, or by not interposing an objection. -- Tac"it*ly, adv. The tacit and secret theft of abusing our brother in civil contracts. Jer. Taylor.
profuse: 1. Pouring forth with fullness or exuberance; bountiful; exceedingly liberal; giving without stint; as, a profuse government; profuse hospitality. A green, shady bank, profuse of flowers. Milton. 2. Superabundant; excessive; prodigal; lavish; as, profuse expenditure. "Profuse ornament." Kames. Syn. -- Lavish; exuberant; bountiful; prodigal; extravagant. -- Profuse, Lavish, Prodigal. Profuse denotes pouring out (as money, etc.) with great fullness or freeness; as, profuse in his expenditures, thanks, promises, etc. Lavish is stronger, implying unnecessary or wasteful excess; as, lavish of his bounties, favors, praises, etc. Prodigal is stronger still, denoting unmeasured or reckless profusion; as, prodigal of one's strength, life, or blood, to secure some object. Dryden.  To pour out; to give or spend liberally; to lavish; to squander. [Obs.] Chapman.
obdurate: 1. Hardened in feelings, esp. against moral or mollifying influences; unyielding; hard-hearted; stubbornly wicked. The very custom of evil makes the heart obdurate against whatsoever instructions to the contrary. Hooker. Art thou obdurate, flinty, hard as steel, Nay, more than flint, for stone at rain relenteth Shak. 2. Hard; harsh; rugged; rough; intractable. "Obdurate consonants." Swift. Note: Sometimes accented on the second syllable, especially by the older poets. There is no flesh in man's obdurate heart. Cowper. Syn. -- Hard; firm; unbending; inflexible; unyielding; stubborn; obstinate; impenitent; callous; unfeeling; insensible; unsusceptible. -- Obdurate, Callous, Hardened. Callous denotes a deadening of the sensibilities; as. a callous conscience. Hardened implies a general and settled disregard for the claims of interest, duty, and sympathy; as, hardened in vice. Obdurate implies an active resistance of the heart and will aganst the pleadings of compassion and humanity. -- Ob"du*rate*ly, adv. -- Ob"du*rate*ness, n.  To harden. [Obs.]
occult: Hidden from the eye or the understanding; inviable; secret; concealed; unknown. It is of an occult kind, and is so insensible in its advances as to escape observation. I. Taylor. Occult line (Geom.), a line drawn as a part of the construction of a figure or problem, but not to appear in the finished plan. -- Occult qualities, those qualities whose effects only were observed, but the nature and relations of whose productive agencies were undetermined; -- so called by the schoolmen. -- Occult sciences, those sciences of the Middle Ages which related to the supposed action or influence of occult qualities, or supernatural powers, as alchemy, magic, necromancy, and astrology.  To eclipse; to hide from sight.
abate: 1. To beat down; to overthrow. [Obs.] The King of Scots . . . sore abated the walls. Edw. Hall. 2. To bring down or reduce from a higher to a lower state, number, or degree; to lessen; to diminish; to contract; to moderate; toto cut short; as, to abate a demand; to abate pride, zeal, hope. His eye was not dim, nor his natural force abated. Deut. xxxiv. 7. 3. To deduct; to omit; as, to abate something from a price. Nine thousand parishes, abating the odd hundreds. Fuller. 4. To blunt. [Obs.] To abate the edge of envy. Bacon. 5. To reduce in estimation; to deprive. [Obs.] She hath abated me of half my train. Shak. 6. (Law)  (a) To bring entirely down or put an end to; to do away with; as, to abate a nuisance, to abate a writ. (b) (Eng. Law) To diminish; to reduce. Legacies are liable to be abated entirely or in proportion, upon a deficiency of assets. To abate a tax, to remit it either wholly or in part.  1. To decrease, or become less in strength or violence; as, pain abates, a storm abates. The fury of Glengarry . . . rapidly abated. Macaulay. 2. To be defeated, or come to naught; to fall through; to fail; as, a writ abates. To abate into a freehold, To abate in lands (Law), to enter into a freehold after the death of the last possessor, and before the heir takes possession. See Abatement, 4. Syn. -- To subside; decrease; intermit; decline; diminish; lessen. -- To Abate, Subside. These words, as here compared, imply a coming down from some previously raised or exited state. Abate expresses this in respect to degrees, and implies a diminution of force or of intensity; as, the storm abates, the cold abates, the force of the wind abates; or, the wind abates, a fever abates. Subside (to settle down) has reference to a previous state of agitation or commotion; as, the waves subside after a storm, the wind subsides into a calm. When the words are used figuratively, the same distinction should be observed. If we conceive of a thing as having different degrees of intensity or strength, the word to be used is abate. Thus we say, a man's anger abates, the ardor of one's love abates, "Winter rage abates". But if the image be that of a sinking down into quiet from preceding excitement or commotion, the word to be used is subside; as, the tumult of the people subsides, the public mind subsided into a calm. The same is the case with those emotions which are tumultuous in their nature; as, his passion subsides, his joy quickly subsided, his grief subsided into a pleasing melancholy. Yet if, in such cases, we were thinking of the degree of violence of the emotion, we might use abate; as, his joy will abate in the progress of time; and so in other instances.  Abatement. [Obs.] Sir T. Browne.
arcane: Hidden; secret. [Obs.] "The arcane part of divine wisdom." Berkeley.
exigent: Exacting or requiring immediate aid or action; pressing; critical. "At this exigent moment." Burke.  1. Exigency; pressing necessity; decisive moment. [Obs.] Why do you cross me in this exigent Shak. 2. (o. Eng. Law)  The name of a writ in proceedings before outlawry. Abbott.
behemoth: An animal, probably the hippopotamus, described in Job xl. 15- 24.
salutary: 1. Wholesome; healthful; promoting health; as, salutary exercise. 2. Promotive of, or contributing to, some beneficial purpose; beneficial; advantageous; as, a salutary design. Syn. -- Wholesome; healthful; salubrious; beneficial; useful; advantageous; profitable. -- Sal"u*ta*ri*ly, adv. -- Sal"u*ta*ri*ness, n.
barren: 1. Incapable of producing offspring; producing no young; sterile; -- She was barren of children. Bp. Hall. 2. Not producing vegetation, or useful vegetation; "Barren mountain tracts." Macaulay. 3. Unproductive; fruitless; unprofitable; empty. Brilliant but barren reveries. Prescott. Some schemes will appear barren of hints and matter. Swift. 4. Mentally dull; stupid. Shak. Barren flower, a flower which has only stamens without a pistil, or which as neither stamens nor pistils. -- Barren Grounds (Geog.), a vast tract in British America northward of the forest regions. -- Barren Ground bear (Zoöl.), a peculiar bear, inhabiting the Barren Grounds, now believed to be a variety of the brown bear of Europe. -- Barren Ground caribou (Zoöl.), a small reindeer (Rangifer Groenlandicus) peculiar to the Barren Grounds and Greenland.  1. A tract of barren land. 2. pl.  Elevated lands or plains on which grow small trees, but not timber; as, pine barrens; oak barrens. They are not necessarily sterile, and are often fertile. [Amer.] J. Pickering.
impecunious: Not having money; habitually without money; poor. An impecunious creature. B. Jonson.
stoic: 1. A disciple of the philosopher Zeno; one of a Greek sect which held that men should be free from passion, unmoved by joy or grief, and should submit without complaint to unavoidable necessity, by which all things are governed. 2. Hence, a person not easily excited; an apathetic person; one who is apparently or professedly indifferent to pleasure or pain. A Stoic of the woods, a man without a tear. Campbell. School of Stoics. See The Porch, under Porch.  1. Of or pertaining to the Stoics; resembling the Stoics or their doctrines. 2. Not affected by passion; manifesting indifference to pleasure or pain. -- Sto"ic*al*ly, adv. -- Sto"ic*al*ness, n.
magnanimity: The quality of being magnanimous; greatness of mind; elevation or dignity of soul; that quality or combination of qualities, in character, which enables one to encounter danger and trouble with tranquility and firmness, to disdain injustice, meanness and revenge, and to act and sacrifice for noble objects.
grandiloquence: The use of lofty words or phrases; bombast; -- usually in a bad sense. The sin of grandiloquence or tall talking. Thackeray,
limpid: Characterized by clearness or transparency; clear; as, a limpid stream. Springs which were clear, fresh, and limpid. Woodward. Syn. -- Clear; transparent; pellucid; lucid; pure; crystal; translucent; bright.
personable: 1. Having a well-formed body, or person; graceful; comely; of good appearance; presentable; as, a personable man or woman. Wise, warlike, personable, courteous, and kind. Spenser. The king, . . . so visited with sickness, was not personable. E. Hall. 2. (Law) (a) Enabled to maintain pleas in court. Cowell. (b) Having capacity to take anything granted.
epithet: 1. An adjective expressing some quality, attribute, or relation, that is properly or specially appropriate to a person or thing; as, a just man; a verdant lawn. A prince [Henry III.] to whom the epithet "worthless" seems best applicable. Hallam. 2. Term; expression; phrase. "Stiffed with epithets of war." Shak. Syn. -- Epithet, Title. The name epithet was formerly extended to nouns which give a title or describe character (as the "epithet of liar"), but is now confined wholly to adjectives. Some rhetoricians, as Whately, restrict it still further, considering the term epithet as belonging only to a limited class of adjectives, viz., those which add nothing to the sense of their noun, but simply hold forth some quality necessarily implied therein; as, the bright sun, the lofty heavens, etc. But this restriction does not prevail in general literature. Epithet is sometimes confounded with application, which is always a noun or its equivalent.  To describe by an epithet. [R.] Never was a town better epitheted. Sir H. Wotton.
malinger: To act the part of a malingerer; to feign illness or inability.
mellifluous: Flowing as with honey; smooth; flowing sweetly or smoothly; as, a mellifluous voice. -- Mel*lif"lu*ous*ly, adv.
tenuous: 1. Thin; slender; small; minute. 2. Rare; subtile; not dense; -- said of fluids.  Lacking substance, as a tenuous argument.
ebullience: A boiling up or over; effervescence. Cudworth.
plethora: 1. Overfullness; especially, excessive fullness of the blood vessels; repletion; that state of the blood vessels or of the system when the blood exceeds a healthy standard in quantity; hyperæmia; -- opposed to anæmia. 2. State of being overfull; excess; superabundance. He labors under a plethora of wit and imagination. Jeffrey.
palliate: 1. Covered with a mant [Obs.] Bp. Hall. 2. Eased; mitigated; alleviated. [Obs.] Bp. Fell.  1. To cover with a mantle or cloak; to cover up; to hide. [Obs.] Being palliated with a pilgrim's coat. Sir T. Herbert. 2. To cover with excuses; to conceal the enormity of, by excuses and apologies; to extenuate; as, to palliate faults. They never hide or palliate their vices. Swift. 3. To reduce in violence; to lessen or abate; to mitigate; to ease withhout curing; as, to palliate a disease. To palliate dullness, and give time a shove. Cowper. Syn. -- To cover; cloak; hide; extenuate; conceal. -- To Palliate, Extenuate, Cloak. These words, as here compared, are used in a figurative sense in reference to our treatment of wrong action. We cloak in order to conceal completely. We extenuate a crime when we endeavor to show that it is less than has been supposed; we palliate a crime when we endeavor to cover or conceal its enormity, at least in part. This naturally leads us to soften some of its features, and thus palliate approaches extenuate till they have become nearly or quite identical. "To palliate is not now used, though it once was, in the sense of wholly cloaking or covering over, as it might be, our sins, but in that of extenuating; to palliate our faults is not to hide them altogether, but to seek to diminish their guilt in part." Trench.
florid: 1. Covered with flowers; abounding in flowers; flowery. [R.] Fruit from a pleasant and florid tree. Jer. Taylor. 2. Bright in color; flushed with red; of a lively reddish color; as, a florid countenance. 3. Embellished with flowers of rhetoric; enriched to excess with figures; excessively ornate; as, a florid style; florid eloquence. 4. (Mus.)  Flowery; ornamental; running in rapid melodic figures, divisions, or passages, as in variations; full of fioriture or little ornamentations.
solicitous: Disposed to solicit; eager to obtain something desirable, or to avoid anything evil; concerned; anxious; careful. "Solicitous of my reputation." Dryden. "He was solicitous for his advice." Calerendon. Enjoy the present, whatsoever it be, and be not solicitous about the future. Jer. Taylor. The colonel had been intent upon other things, and not enough solicitous to finish the fortifications. Clarendon. -- So*lic"it*ous*ly, adv. -- So*lic"it*ous*ness, n.
contiguous: In actual contact; touching; also, adjacent; near; neighboring; adjoining. The two halves of the paper did not appear fully divided . . . but seemed contiguous at one of their angles. Sir I. Newton. Sees no contiguous palace rear its head. Goldsmith. Contiguous angles. See Adjacent angles, under Angle. Syn. -- Adjoining; adjacent. See Adjacent. - Con*tig"u*ous*ly, adv. -- Con*tig"u*ous*ness, n.
cozen: To cheat; to defrand; to beguile; to deceive, usually by small arts, or in a pitiful way. He had cozened the world by fine phrases. Macualay. Children may be cozened into a knowledge of the letters. Locke. Goring loved no man so well but that he would cozen him, and expose him to public mirth for having been cozened. Clarendon.  To deceive; to cheat; to act deceitfully. Some cogging,cozening slave. Shak.
didactic: Fitted or intended to teach; conveying instruction; preceptive; instructive; teaching some moral lesson; as, didactic essays. "Didactical writings." Jer. Taylor. The finest didactic poem in any language. Macaulay.  A treatise on teaching or education. [Obs.] Milton.
deprecate: To pray against, as an evil; to seek to avert by player; to desire the removal of; to seek deliverance from; to express deep regret for; to disapprove of strongly. His purpose was deprecated by all round him, and he was with difficulty induced to adandon it. Sir W. Scott.
nadir: 1. That point of the heavens, or lower hemisphere, directly opposite the zenith; the inferior pole of the horizon; the point of the celestial sphere directly under the place where we stand. 2. The lowest point; the time of greatest depression. The seventh century is the nadir of the human mind in Europe. Hallam. Nadir of the sun (Astron.), the axis of the conical shadow projected by the earth. Crabb.
assiduous: 1. Constant in application or attention; devoted; attentive; unremitting. She grows more assiduous in her attendance. Addison. 2. Performed with constant diligence or attention; unremitting; persistent; as, assiduous labor. To weary him with my assiduous cries. Milton. Syn. -- Diligent; attentive; sedulous; unwearied; unintermitted; persevering; laborious; indefatigable. As*sid"u*ous*ly, adv. -- As*sid"u*ous*ness, n.
daunt: 1. To overcome; to conquer. [Obs.] 2. To repress or subdue the courage of; to check by fear of danger; to cow; to intimidate; to dishearten. Some presences daunt and discourage us. Glanvill. Syn. -- To dismay; appall. See Dismay.
interdict: 1. To forbid; to prohibit or debar; as, to interdict intercourse with foreign nations. Charged not to touch the interdicted tree. Milton. 2. (Eccl.)  To lay under an interdict; to cut off from the enjoyment of religious privileges, as a city, a church, an individual. An archbishop may not only excommunicate and interdict his suffragans, but his vicar general may do the same. Ayliffe.  1. A prohibitory order or decree; a prohibition. These are not fruits forbidden; no interdict Defends the touching of these viands pure. Milton. 2. (R. C. Ch.)  A prohibition of the pope, by which the clergy or laymen are restrained from performing, or from attending, divine service, or from administering the offices or enjoying the privileges of the church. 3. (Scots Law)  An order of the court of session, having the like purpose and effect with a writ of injunction out of chancery in England and America.
penurious: 1. Excessively sparing in the use of money; sordid; stingy; miserly. "A penurious niggard of his wealth." Milton. 2. Not bountiful or liberal; scanty. Here creeps along a poor, penurious stream. C. Pitt. 3. Destitute of money; suffering extreme want. [Obs.] "My penurious band." Shak. Syn. -- Avaricious; covetous; parsimonious; miserly; niggardly; stingy. See Avaricious. --Pe*nu"ri*ous*ly, adv. -- Pe*nu"ri*ous*ness, n.
astringent: 1. Drawing together the tissues; binding; contracting; -- opposed to laxative; as, astringent medicines; a butter and astringent taste; astringent fruit. 2. Stern; austere; as, an astringent type of virtue.  A medicine or other substance that produces contraction in the soft organic textures, and checks discharges of blood, mucus, etc. External astringents are called styptics. Dunglison.
panegyric: An oration or eulogy in praise of some person or achievement; a formal or elaborate encomium; a laudatory discourse; laudation. See Synonym of Eulogy.  Containing praise or eulogy; encomiastic; laudatory. "Panegyric strains." Pope. -- Pan`e*gyr"ic*al*ly, adv. Some of his odes are panegyrical. Dryden.
peccadillo: A slight trespass or offense; a petty crime or fault. Sir W. Scott.
calumniate: To accuse falsely and maliciously of a crime or offense, or of something disreputable; to slander; to libel. Hatred unto the truth did always falsely report and calumniate all godly men's doings. Strype. Syn. -- To asperse; slander; defame; vilify; traduce; belie; bespatter; blacken; libel. See Asperse.  To propagate evil reports with a design to injure the reputation of another; to make purposely false charges of some offense or crime.
brook: A natural stream of water smaller than a river or creek. The Lord thy God bringeth thee into a good land, a land of brooks of water. Deut. viii. 7. Empires itself, as doth an inland brook Into the main of waters. Shak.  1. To use; to enjoy. [Obs.] Chaucer. 2. To bear; to endure; to put up with; to tolerate; as, young men can not brook restraint. Spenser. Shall we, who could not brook one lord, Crouch to the wicked ten Macaulay. 3. To deserve; to earn. [Obs.] Sir J. Hawkins.
inert: 1. Destitute of the power of moving itself, or of active resistance to motion; as, matter is inert. 2. Indisposed to move or act; very slow to act; sluggish; dull; inactive; indolent; lifeless. The inert and desponding party of the court. Macaulay. It present becomes extravagant, then imbecile, and at length utterly inert. I. Taylor. 3. Not having or manifesting active properties; not affecting other substances when brought in contact with them; powerless for an expected or desired effect. Syn. -- Inactive; dull; passive; indolent; sluggish; slothful; lazy; lifeless; irresolute; stupid; senseless; insensible. -- Inert, Inactive, Sluggish. A man may be inactive from mere want of stimulus to effort; but one who is inert has something in his constitution or his habits which operates like a weight holding him back from exertion. Sluggish is still stronger, implying some defect of temperament which directly impedes action. Inert and inactive are negative, sluggish is positive. Even the favored isles . . . Can boast but little virtue; and, inert Through plenty, lose in morals what they gain In manners -- victims of luxurious ease. Cowper. Doomed to lose four months in inactive obscurity. Johnson. Sluggish Idleness, the nurse of sin, Upon a slothful ass he chose to ride. Spenser.
obloquy: 1. Censorious speech; defamatory language; language that casts contempt on men or their actions; blame; reprehension. Shall names that made yuor city the glory of the earth be mentioned with obloquy and detraction Addison. 2. Cause of reproach; disgrace. [Obs.] Shak. Syn. -- Reproach; odium; censure; contumely; gainsaying; reviling; calumny; slander; detraction.
coalesce: 1. To grow together; to unite by growth into one body; as, the parts separated by a wound coalesce. 2. To unite in one body or product; to combine into one body or community; as, vapors coalesce. The Jews were incapable of coalescing with other nations. Campbell. Certain combinations of ideas that, once coalescing, could not be shaken loose. De Quincey. Syn. -- See Add.
obfuscate: Obfuscated; darkened; obscured. [Obs.] [Written also offuscate.] Sir. T. Elyot.  To darken; to obscure; to becloud; hence, to confuse; to bewilder. His head, like a smokejack, the funnel unswept, and the ideas whirling round and round about in it, all obfuscated and darkened over with fuliginous matter. Sterne. Clouds of passion which might obfuscate the intellects of meaner females. Sir. W. Scott.
mollify: 1. To soften; to make tender; to reduce the hardness, harshness, or asperity of; to qualify; as, to mollify the ground. With sweet science mollified their stubborn hearts. Spenser. 2. To assuage, as pain or irritation, to appease, as excited feeling or passion; to pacify; to calm.
desecrate: To divest of a sacred character or office; to divert from a sacred purpose; to violate the sanctity of; to profane; to put to an unworthy use; -- the opposite of consecrate. The [Russian] clergy can not suffer corporal punishment without being previously desecrated. W. Tooke. The founders of monasteries imprecated evil on those who should desecrate their donations. Salmon.
conciliate: To win ower; to gain from a state of hostility; to gain the good will or favor of; to make friendly; to mollify; to propitiate; to appease. The rapacity of his father's administration had excited such universal discontent, that it was found expedient to conciliate the nation. Hallam. Syn. -- To reconcile; propitiate; appease; pacify.
subtle: 1. Sly in design; artful; cunning; insinuating; subtile; -- applied to persons; as, a subtle foe. "A subtle traitor." Shak. 2. Cunningly devised; crafty; treacherous; as, a subtle stratagem. 3. Characterized by refinement and niceness in drawing distinctions; nicely discriminating; -- said of persons; as, a subtle logician; refined; tenuous; sinuous; insinuating; hence, penetrative or pervasive; -- said of the mind; its faculties, or its operations; as, a subtle intellect; a subtle imagination; a subtle process of thought; also, difficult of apprehension; elusive. Things remote from use, obscure and subtle. Milton. 4. Smooth and deceptive. [Obs.] Like to a bowl upon a subtle ground [bowling ground]. Shak. Syn. -- Artful; crafty; cunning; shrewd; sly; wily. Subtle is the most comprehensive of these epithets and implies the finest intellectual quality. See Shrewd, and Cunning.
beleaguer: To surround with an army so as to preclude escape; to besiege; to blockade. The wail of famine in beleaguered towns. Longfellow. Syn. -- To block up; environ; invest; encompass.
equanimity: Evenness of mind; that calm temper or firmness of mind which is not easily elated or depressed; patience; calmness; composure; as, to bear misfortunes with equanimity.
fortuitous: 1. Happening by chance; coming or occuring unexpectedly, or without any known cause; chance; as, the fortuitous concourse of atoms. It was from causes seemingly fortuitous . . . that all the mighty effects of the Reformation flowed. Robertson. So as to throw a glancing and fortuitous light upon the whole. Hazlitt. 2. (LAw)  Happening independently of human will or means of foresight; resulting from unavoidable physical causes. Abbott. Syn. -- Accidental; casual; contingent; incidental. See Accidental. -- For*tu"i*tous*ly, adv. -- For*tu"i*tous*ness, n.
plummet: 1. A piece of lead attached to a line, used in sounding the depth of water. I'll sink him deeper than e'er plummet sounded. Shak. 2. A plumb bob or a plumb line. See under Plumb, n. 3. Hence, any weight. 4. A piece of lead formerly used by school children to rule paper for writing. Plummet line, a line with a plummet; a sounding line.
prevaricate: 1. To shift or turn from one side to the other, from the direct course, or from truth; to speak with equivocation; to shuffle; to quibble; as, he prevaricates in his statement. He prevaricates with his own understanding. South. 2. (Civil Law)  To collude, as where an informer colludes with the defendant, and makes a sham prosecution. 3. (Eng. Law)  To undertake a thing falsely and deceitfully, with the purpose of defeating or destroying it. Syn. -- To evade; equivocate; quibble; shuffle. -- Prevaricate, Evade, Equivocate. One who evades a question ostensibly answers it, but really turns aside to some other point. He who equivocate uses words which have a double meaning, so that in one sense he can claim to have said the truth, though he does in fact deceive, and intends to do it. He who prevaricates talks all round the question, hoping to "dodge" it, and disclose nothing.  To evade by a quibble; to transgress; to pervert. [Obs.] Jer. Taylor.
approbation: 1. Proof; attestation. [Obs.] Shak. 2. The act of approving; an assenting to the propriety of a thing with some degree of pleasure or satisfaction; approval; sanction; commendation. Many . . . joined in a loud hum of approbation. Macaulay. The silent approbation of one's own breast. Melmoth. Animals . . . love approbation or praise. Darwin. 3. Probation or novitiate. [Obs.] This day my sister should the cloister enter, And there receive her approbation. Shak. Syn. -- Approval; liking; sanction; consent; concurrence. -- Approbation, Approval. Approbation and approval have the same general meaning, assenting to or declaring as good, sanction, commendation; but approbation is stronger and more positive. "We may be anxious for the approbation of our friends; but we should be still more anxious for the approval of our own consciences." "He who is desirous to obtain universal approbation will learn a good lesson from the fable of the old man and his ass." "The work has been examined by several excellent judges, who have expressed their unqualified approval of its plan and execution."
protracted: Prolonged; continued. Protracted meeting,a religious meeting continued for many successive days. [U. S.] -- Pro*tract"ed*ly, adv. -- Pro*tract"ed*ness, n.
avarice: 1. An excessive or inordinate desire of gain; greediness after wealth; covetousness; cupidity. To desire money for its own sake, and in order to hoard it up, is avarice. Beattie. 2. An inordinate desire for some supposed good. All are taught an avarice of praise. Goldsmith.
cajole: To deceive with flattery or fair words; to wheedle. I am not about to cajole or flatter you into a reception of my views. F. W. Robertson. Syn. -- To flatter; wheedle; delude; coax; entrap.
pied: imp. & p. p. of Pi, or Pie, v.  Variegated with spots of different colors; party-colored; spotted; piebald. "Pied coats." Burton. "Meadows trim with daisies pied." Milton. Pied antelope (Zoöl.), the bontebok. -- Pied-billed grebe (Zoöl.), the dabchick. -- Pied blackbird (Zoöl.), any Asiatic thrush of the genus Turdulus. -- Pied finch (Zoöl.) (a) The chaffinch. (b) The snow bunting. [Prov. Eng.] -- Pied flycatcher (Zoöl.), a common European flycatcher (Ficedula atricapilla). The male is black and white.
antedate: 1. Prior date; a date antecedent to another which is the actual date. 2. Anticipation. [Obs.] Donne.  1. To date before the true time; to assign to an earlier date; thus, to antedate a deed or a bond is to give it a date anterior to the true time of its execution. 2. To precede in time. 3. To anticipate; to make before the true time. And antedate the bliss above. Pope. Who rather rose the day to antedate. Wordsworth.
esoteric: Designed for, and understood by, the specially initiated alone; not communicated, or not intelligible, to the general body of followers; private; interior; acroamatic; -- said of the private and more recondite instructions and doctrines of philosophers. Opposed to exoteric. Enough if every age produce two or three critics of this esoteric class, with here and there a reader to understand them. De Quincey.
quail: 1. To die; to perish; hence, to wither; to fade. [Obs.] Spenser. 2. To become quelled; to become cast down; to sink under trial or apprehension of danger; to lose the spirit and power of resistance; to lose heart; to give way; to shrink; to cower. The atheist power shall quail, and confess his fears. I. Taylor. Stouter hearts than a woman's have quailed in this terrible winter. Longfellow. Syn. -- to cower; flinch; shrink; quake; tremble; blench; succumb; yield.  To cause to fail in spirit or power; to quell; to crush; to subdue. [Obs.] Spenser.  To curdle; to coagulate, as milk. [Obs.] Holland.  1. (Zoöl.)  Any gallinaceous bird belonging to Coturnix and several allied genera of the Old World, especially the common European quail (C. communis), the rain quail (C. Coromandelica) of India, the stubble quail (C. pectoralis), and the Australian swamp quail (Synoicus australis). 2. (Zoöl.)  Any one of several American partridges belonging to Colinus, Callipepla, and allied genera, especially the bobwhite (called Virginia quail, and Maryland quail), and the California quail (Calipepla Californica). 3. (Zoöl.)  Any one of numerous species of Turnix and allied genera, native of the Old World, as the Australian painted quail (Turnix varius). See Turnix. 4. A prostitute; -- so called because the quail was thought to be a very amorous bird.[Obs.] Shak. Bustard quail (Zoöl.), a small Asiatic quail-like bird of the genus Turnix, as T. taigoor, a black-breasted species, and the hill bustard quail (T. ocellatus). See Turnix. -- Button quail (Zoöl.), one of several small Asiatic species of Turnix, as T. Sykesii, which is said to be the smallest game bird of India. -- Mountain quail. See under Mountain. -- Quail call, a call or pipe for alluring quails into a net or within range. -- Quail dove (Zoöl.), any one of several American ground pigeons belonging to Geotrygon and allied genera. -- Quail hawk (Zoöl.), the New Zealand sparrow hawk (Hieracidea Novæ-Hollandiæ). -- Quail pipe. See Quail call, above. -- Quail snipe (Zoöl.), the dowitcher, or red-breasted snipe; -- called also robin snipe, and brown snipe. -- Sea quail (Zoöl.), the turnstone. [Local, U. S.]
artless: 1. Wanting art, knowledge, or skill; ignorant; unskillful. Artless of stars and of the moving sand. Dryden. 2. Contrived without skill or art; inartistic. [R.] Artless and massy pillars. T. Warton. 3. Free from guile, art, craft, or stratagem; characterized by simplicity and sincerity; sincere; guileless; ingenuous; honest; as, an artless mind; an artless tale. They were plain, artless men, without the least appearance of enthusiasm or credulity about them. Porteus. O, how unlike the complex works of man, Heaven's easy, artless, unencumbered plan! Cowper. Syn. -- Simple; unaffected; sincere; undesigning; guileless; unsophisticated; open; frank; candid.
assuage: To soften, in a figurative sense; to allay, mitigate, ease, or lessen, as heat, pain, or grief; to appease or pacify, as passion or tumult; to satisfy, as appetite or desire. Refreshing winds the summer's heat assuage. Addison. To assuage the sorrows of a desolate old man Burke. The fount at which the panting mind assuages Her thirst of knowledge. Byron. Syn. -- To alleviate; mitigate; appease; soothe; calm; tranquilize; relieve. See Alleviate.  To abate or subside. [Archaic] "The waters assuaged." Gen. vii. 1. The plague being come to a crisis, its fury began to assuage. De Foe.
fallow: 1. Pale red or pale yellow; as, a fallow deer or greyhound. Shak. 2. Etym: [Cf. Fallow, n.]  Left untilled or unsowed after plowing; uncultivated; as, fallow ground. Fallow chat, Fallow finch (Zoöl.), a small European bird, the wheatear (Saxicola ænanthe). See Wheatear.  1. Plowed land. [Obs.] Who . . . pricketh his blind horse over the fallows. Chaucer. 2. Land that has lain a year or more untilled or unseeded; land plowed without being sowed for the season. The plowing of fallows is a benefit to land. Mortimer. 3. The plowing or tilling of land, without sowing it for a season; as, summer fallow, properly conducted, has ever been found a sure method of destroying weeds. Be a complete summer fallow, land is rendered tender and mellow. The fallow gives it a better tilth than can be given by a fallow crop. Sinclair. Fallow crop, the crop taken from a green fallow. [Eng.] -- Green fallow, fallow whereby land is rendered mellow and clean from weeds, by cultivating some green crop, as turnips, potatoes, etc. [Eng.]  To plow, harrow, and break up, as land, without seeding, for the purpose of destroying weeds and insects, and rendering it mellow; as, it is profitable to fallow cold, strong, clayey land.
truculent: 1. Fierce; savage; ferocious; barbarous; as, the truculent inhabitants of Scythia. Ray. 2. Cruel; destructive; ruthless. More or less truculent plagues. Harvey.
appropriate: Set apart for a particular use or person. Hence: Belonging peculiarly; peculiar; suitable; fit; proper. In its strict and appropriate meaning. Porteus. Appropriate acts of divine worship. Stillingfleet. It is not at all times easy to find words appropriate to express our ideas. Locke.  1. To take to one's self in exclusion of others; to claim or use as by an exclusive right; as, let no man appropriate the use of a common benefit. 2. To set apart for, or assign to, a particular person or use, in exclusion of all others; -- with to or for; as, a spot of ground is appropriated for a garden; to appropriate money for the increase of the navy. 3. To make suitable; to suit. [Archaic] Paley. 4. (Eng. Eccl. Law)  To annex, as a benefice, to a spiritual corporation, as its property. Blackstone.  A property; attribute. [Obs.]
sporadic: Occuring singly, or apart from other things of the same kind, or in scattered instances; separate; single; as, a sporadic fireball; a sporadic case of disease; a sporadic example of a flower. Sporadic disease (Med.), a disease which occurs in single and scattered cases. See the Note under Endemic, a.
nefarious: Wicked in the extreme; abominable; iniquitous; atrociously villainous; execrable; detestably vile. Syn. -- Iniquitous; detestable; horrible; heinious; atrocious; infamous; impious. See Iniquitous. -- Ne*fa"ri*ous*ly, adv. -- Ne*fa"ri*ous*ness, n.
effrontery: Impudence or boldness in confronting or in transgressing the bounds of duty or decorum; insulting presumptuousness; shameless boldness; barefaced assurance. Corruption lost nothing of its effrontery. Bancroft. Syn. -- Impudence; sauciness. See Impudence.
evince: 1. To conquer; to subdue. [Obs.] Error by his own arms is best evinced. Milton. 2. To show in a clear manner; to prove beyond any reasonable doubt; to manifest; to make evident; to bring to light; to evidence. Common sense and experience must and will evince the truth of this. South.
apprise: To give notice, verbal or written; to inform; -- followed by of; as, we will apprise the general of an intended attack; he apprised the commander of what he had done.  Notice; information. [Obs.] Gower.
pusillanimous: 1. Destitute of a manly or courageous strength and firmness of mind; of weak spirit; mean-spirited; spiritless; cowardly; -- said of persons, as, a pussillanimous prince. 2. Evincing, or characterized by, weakness of mind, and want of courage; feeble; as, pusillanimous counsels. "A low and pusillanimous spirit." Burke. Syn. -- Cowardly; dastardly; mean-spirited; fainthearted; timid; weak; feeble.
acumen: Quickness of perception or discernment; penetration of mind; the faculty of nice discrimination. Selden. Syn. -- Sharpness; sagacity; keenness; shrewdness; acuteness.
convoluted: 1. Having convolutions. beaks recurved and convoluted like a ram's horn. Pennant. 2. Folded in tortuous windings. A highly convoluted brain. North Amer. Rev.
precursor: One who, or that which, precedes an event, and indicates its approach; a forerunner; a harbinger. Evil thoughts are the invisible, airy precursors of all the storms and tempests of the soul. Buckminster. Syn. -- Predecessor; forerunner; harbinger; messenger; omen; sign.
attenuate: 1. To make thin or slender, as by mechanical or chemical action upon inanimate objects, or by the effects of starvation, disease, etc., upon living bodies. 2. To make thin or less consistent; to render less viscid or dense; to rarefy. Specifically: To subtilize, as the humors of the body, or to break them into finer parts. 3. To lessen the amount, force, or value of; to make less complex; to weaken. To undersell our rivals . . . has led the manufacturer to . . . attenuate his processes, in the allotment of tasks, to an extreme point. I. Taylor. We may reject and reject till we attenuate history into sapless meagerness. Sir F. Palgrave.  To become thin, slender, or fine; to grow less; to lessen. The attention attenuates as its sphere contracts. Coleridge.  1. Made thin or slender. 2. Made thin or less viscid; rarefied. Bacon.
etiolated: Having a blanched or faded appearance, as birds inhabiting desert regions.
credulous: 1. Apt to believe on slight evidence; easly imposed upon; unsuspecting. Landor. Eve, our credulous mother. Milton. 2. Believed too readily. [Obs.] Beau & Fl.
stand: 1. To be at rest in an erect position; to be fixed in an upright or firm position; as: (a) To be supported on the feet, in an erect or nearly erect position; -- opposed to lie, sit, kneel, etc. "I pray you all, stand up!" Shak. (b) To continue upright in a certain locality, as a tree fixed by the roots, or a building resting on its foundation. It stands as it were to the ground yglued. Chaucer. The ruined wall Stands when its wind worn battlements are gone. Byron. 2. To occupy or hold a place; to have a situation; to be situated or located; as, Paris stands on the Seine. Wite ye not where there stands a little town Chaucer. 3. To cease from progress; not to proceed; to stop; to pause; to halt; to remain stationary. I charge thee, stand, And tell thy name. Dryden. The star, which they saw in the east, went before them, till it came and stood over where the young child was. Matt. ii. 9. 4. To remain without ruin or injury; to hold good against tendencies to impair or injure; to be permanent; to endure; to last; hence, to find endurance, strength, or resources. My mind on its own center stands unmoved. Dryden. 5. To maintain one's ground; to be acquitted; not to fail or yield; to be safe. Readers by whose judgment I would stand or fall. Spectator. 6. To maintain an invincible or permanent attitude; to be fixed, steady, or firm; to take a position in resistance or opposition. "The standing pattern of their imitation." South. The king granted the Jews . . . to gather themselves together, and to stand for their life. Esther viii. 11. 7. To adhere to fixed principles; to maintain moral rectitude; to keep from falling into error or vice. We must labor so as to stand with godliness, according to his appointment. Latimer. 8. To have or maintain a position, order, or rank; to be in a particular relation; as, Christian charity, or love, stands first in the rank of gifts. 9. To be in some particular state; to have essence or being; to be; to consist. "Sacrifices . . . which stood only in meats and drinks." Heb. ix. 10. Accomplish what your signs foreshow; I stand resigned, and am prepared to go. Dryden. Thou seest how it stands with me, and that I may not tarry. Sir W. Scott. 10. To be consistent; to agree; to accord. Doubt me not; by heaven, I will do nothing But what may stand with honor. Massinger. 11. (Naut.)  To hold a course at sea; as, to stand from the shore; to stand for the harbor. From the same parts of heaven his navy stands. Dryden. 12. To offer one's self, or to be offered, as a candidate. He stood to be elected one of the proctors of the university. Walton. 13. To stagnate; not to flow; to be motionless. Or the black water of Pomptina stands. Dryden. 14. To measure when erect on the feet. Six feet two, as I think, he stands. Tennyson. 15. (Law) (a) To be or remain as it is; to continue in force; to have efficacy or validity; to abide. Bouvier. (b) To appear in court. Burrill. Stand by (Naut.), a preparatory order, equivalent to Be ready. -- To stand against, to opposite; to resist. -- To stand by. (a) To be near; to be a spectator; to be present. (b) To be aside; to be aside with disregard. "In the interim [we] let the commands stand by neglected." Dr. H. More. (c) To maintain; to defend; to support; not to desert; as, to stand by one's principles or party. (d) To rest on for support; to be supported by. Whitgift. -- To stand corrected, to be set right, as after an error in a statement of fact. Wycherley. -- To stand fast, to be fixed; to be unshaken or immovable. -- To stand firmly on, to be satisfied or convinced of. "Though Page be a secure fool, and stands so firmly on his wife's frailty." Shak. -- To stand for. (a) To side with; to espouse the cause of; to support; to maintain, or to profess or attempt to maintain; to defend. "I stand wholly for you." Shak. (b) To be in the place of; to be the substitute or to represent; as, a cipher at the left hand of a figure stands for nothing. "I will not trouble myself, whether these names stand for the same thing, or really include one another." Locke. -- To stand in, to cost. "The same standeth them in much less cost." Robynson (More's Utopia). The Punic wars could not have stood the human race in less than three millions of the species. Burke. -- To stand in hand, to conduce to one's interest; to be serviceable or advantageous. -- To stand off. (a) To keep at a distance. (b) Not to comply. (c) To keep at a distance in friendship, social intercourse, or acquaintance. (d) To appear prominent; to have relief. "Picture is best when it standeth off, as if it were carved." Sir H. Wotton. -- To stand off and on (Naut.), to remain near a coast by sailing toward land and then from it. -- To stand on (Naut.), to continue on the same tack or course. -- To stand out. (a) To project; to be prominent. "Their eyes stand out with fatness." Psalm lxxiii. 7. (b) To persist in opposition or resistance; not to yield or comply; not to give way or recede. His spirit is come in, That so stood out against the holy church. Shak. -- To stand to. (a) To ply; to urge; to persevere in using. "Stand to your tackles, mates, and stretch your oars." Dryden. (b) To remain fixed in a purpose or opinion. "I will stand to it, that this is his sense." Bp. Stillingfleet. (c) To abide by; to adhere to; as to a contrast, assertion, promise, etc.; as, to stand to an award; to stand to one's word. (d) Not to yield; not to fly; to maintain, as one's ground. "Their lives and fortunes were put in safety, whether they stood to it or ran away." Bacon. (e) To be consistent with; to agree with; as, it stands to reason that he could not have done so. (f) To support; to uphold. "Stand to me in this cause." Shak. -- To stand together, to be consistent; to agree. -- To stand to sea (Naut.), to direct the course from land. -- To stand under, to undergo; to withstand. Shak. -- To stand up. (a) To rise from sitting; to be on the feet. (b) To arise in order to speak or act. "Against whom, when the accusers stood up, they brought none accusation of such things as I supposed." Acts xxv. 18. (c) To rise and stand on end, as the hair. (d) To put one's self in opposition; to contend. "Once we stood up about the corn." Shak. -- To stand up for, to defend; to justify; to support, or attempt to support; as, to stand up for the administration. -- To stand upon. (a) To concern; to interest. (b) To value; to esteem. "We highly esteem and stand much upon our birth." Ray. (c) To insist on; to attach much importance to; as, to stand upon security; to stand upon ceremony. (d) To attack; to assault. [A Hebraism] "So I stood upon him, and slew him." 2 Sam. i. 10. -- To stand with, to be consistent with. "It stands with reason that they should be rewarded liberally." Sir J. Davies.  1. To endure; to sustain; to bear; as, I can not stand the cold or the heat. 2. To resist, without yielding or receding; to withstand. "Love stood the siege." Dryden. He stood the furious foe. Pope. 3. To abide by; to submit to; to suffer. Bid him disband his legions, . . . And stand the judgment of a Roman senate. Addison. 4. To set upright; to cause to stand; as, to stand a book on the shelf; to stand a man on his feet. 5. To be at the expense of; to pay for; as, to stand a treat. [Colloq.] Tackeray. To stand fire, to receive the fire of arms from an enemy without giving way. -- To stand one's ground, to keep the ground or station one has taken; to maintain one's position. "Pleasants and burghers, however brave, are unable to stand their ground against veteran soldiers." Macaulay. -- To stand trial, to sustain the trial or examination of a cause; not to give up without trial.  1. The act of standing. I took my stand upon an eminence . . . to look into thier several ladings. Spectator. 2. A halt or stop for the purpose of defense, resistance, or opposition; as, to come to, or to make, a stand. Vice is at stand, and at the highest flow. Dryden. 3. A place or post where one stands; a place where one may stand while observing or waiting for something. I have found you out a stand most fit, Where you may have such vantage on the duke, He shall not pass you. Shak. 4. A station in a city or town where carriages or wagons stand for hire; as, a cab stand. Dickens. 5. A raised platform or station where a race or other outdoor spectacle may be viewed; as, the judge's or the grand stand at a race course. 6. A small table; also, something on or in which anything may be laid, hung, or placed upright; as, a hat stand; an umbrella stand; a music stand. 7. A place where a witness stands to testify in court. 8. The situation of a shop, store, hotel, etc.; as, a good, bad, or convenient stand for business. [U. S.] 9. Rank; post; station; standing. Father, since your fortune did attain So high a stand, I mean not to descend. Daniel. 10. A state of perplexity or embarrassment; as, to be at a stand what to do. L'Estrange. 11. A young tree, usually reserved when other trees are cut; also, a tree growing or standing upon its own root, in distinction from one produced from a scion set in a stock, either of the same or another kind of tree. 12. (Com.)  A weight of from two hundred and fifty to three hundred pounds, -- used in weighing pitch. Microscope stand, the instrument, excepting the eyepiece, objective, and other removable optical parts. -- Stand of ammunition, the projectile, cartridge, and sabot connected together. -- Stand of arms. (Mil.) See under Arms. -- Stand of colors (Mil.), a single color, or flag. Wilhelm (Mil. Dict.) -- To be at a stand, to be stationary or motionless; to be at a standstill; hence, to be perplexed; to be embarrassed. -- To make a stand, to halt for the purpose of offering resistance to a pursuing enemy. Syn. -- Stop; halt; rest; interruption; obstruction; perplexity; difficulty; embarrassment; hesitation.
nostrum: 1. A medicine, the ingredients of which are kept secret for the purpose of restricting the profits of sale to the inventor or proprietor; a quack medicine. 2. Any scheme or device proposed by a quack. The incentives of agitators, the arts of impostors and the nostrums of quacks. Brougham.
partisan: 1. An adherent to a party or faction; esp., one who is strongly and passionately devoted to a party or an interest. "The violence of a partisan." Macaulay. Both sides had their partisans in the colony. Jefferson. 2. (Mil.) (a) The commander of a body of detached light troops engaged in making forays and harassing an enemy. (b) Any member of such a corps.  1. Adherent to a party or faction; especially, having the character of blind, passionate, or unreasonable adherence to a party; as, blinded by partisan zeal. 2. (Mil.)  Serving as a partisan in a detached command; as, a partisan officer or corps. Partisan ranger (Mil.), a member of a partisan corps.  A kind of halberd or pike; also, a truncheon; a staff. And make him with our pikes and partisans a grave. Shak.
voracious: Greedy in eating; very hungry; eager to devour or swallow; ravenous; gluttonous; edacious; rapacious; as, a voracious man or appetite; a voracious gulf or whirlpool. Dampier. -- Vo*ra"cious*ly, adv. -- Vo*ra"cious*ness, n.
disabuse: To set free from mistakes; to undeceive; to disengage from fallacy or deception; to set right. To undeceive and disabuse the people. South. If men are now sufficiently enlightened to disabuse themselves or artifice, hypocrisy, and superstition, they will consider this event as an era in their history. J. Adams.
abeyance: 1. (Law)  Expectancy; condition of being undetermined. Note: When there is no person in existence in whom an inheritance (or a dignity) can vest, it is said to be in abeyance, that is, in expectation; the law considering it as always potentially existing, and ready to vest whenever a proper owner appears. Blackstone. 2. Suspension; temporary suppression. Keeping the sympathies of love and admiration in a dormant state, or state of abeyance. De Quincey.
expurgate: To purify; to clear from anything noxious, offensive, or erroneous; to cleanse; to purge; as, to expurgate a book.
pedestrian: Going on foot; performed on foot; as, a pedestrian journey.  A walker; one who journeys on foot; a foot traveler; specif., a professional walker or runner.
gauche: 1. Left handed; hence, awkward; clumsy. 2. (Geom.)  Winding; twisted; warped; -- applied to curves and surfaces.
obstinate: 1. Pertinaciously adhering to an opinion, purpose, or course; persistent; not yielding to reason, arguments, or other means; stubborn; pertinacious; -- usually implying unreasonableness. I have known great cures done by obstinate resolution of drinking no wine. Sir W. Temple. No ass so meek, no ass so obstinate. Pope. Of sense and outward things. Wordsworth. 2. Not yielding; not easily subdued or removed; as, obstinate fever; obstinate obstructions. Syn. -- Stubborn; inflexible; immovable; firm; pertinacious; persistent; headstrong; opinionated; unyielding; refractory; contumacious. See Stubborn. -- Ob"sti*nate*ly, adv. -- Ob"sti*nate*ness, n.
homily: 1. A discourse or sermon read or pronounced to an audience; a serious discourse. Shak. 2. A serious or tedious exhortation in private on some moral point, or on the conduct of life. As I have heard my father Deal out in his long homilies. Byron. Book of Homilies. A collection of authorized, printed sermons, to be read by ministers in churches, esp. one issued in the time of Edward VI., and a second, issued in the reign of Elizabeth; -- both books being certified to contain a "godly and wholesome doctrine."
impetuous: 1. Rushing with force and violence; moving with impetus; furious; forcible; violent; as, an impetuous wind; an impetuous torrent. Went pouring forward with impetuous speed. Byron. 2. Vehement in feeling; hasty; passionate; violent; as, a man of impetuous temper. The people, on their holidays, Impetuous, insolent, unquenchable. Milton. Syn. -- Forcible; rapid; hasty; precipitate; furious; boisterous; violent; raging; fierce; passionate. -- Im*pet"u*ous*ly, adv. -- Im*pet"u*ous*ness, n.
vituperate: To find fault with; to scold; to overwhelm with wordy abuse; to censure severely or abusively; to rate.
prodigious: 1. Of the nature of a prodigy; marvelous; wonderful; portentous. [Obs. or R.] Spenser. It is prodigious to have thunder in a clear sky. Sir T. Browne. 2. Extraordinary in bulk, extent, quantity, or degree; very great; vast; huge; immense; as, a prodigious mountain; a prodigious creature; a prodigious blunder. "Prodigious might." Milton. Syn. -- Huge; enormous; monstrous; portentous; marvelous; amazing; astonishing; extraordinary.
implacable: 1. Not placable; not to be appeased; incapable of being pacified; inexorable; as, an implacable prince. I see thou art implacable. Milton. An object of implacable enmity. Macaulay. 2. Incapable of ebign relieved or assuaged; inextinguishable. [R.] O! how I burn with implacable fire. Spenser. Which wrought them pain Implacable, and many a dolorous groan. Milton. Syn. -- Unappeasable; inexorable; irreconcilable; unrelenting; relentless; unyielding.
flag: 1. To hang loose without stiffness; to bend down, as flexible bodies; to be loose, yielding, limp. As loose it [the sail] flagged around the mast. T. Moore. 2. To droop; to grow spiritless; to lose vigor; to languish; as, the spirits flag; the streugth flags. The pleasures of the town begin to flag. Swift. Syn. -- To droop; decline; fail; languish; pine.  1. To let droop; to suffer to fall, or let fall, into feebleness; as, to flag the wings. prior. 2. To enervate; to exhaust the vigor or elasticity of. Nothing so flags the spirits. Echard.  1. That which flags or hangs down loosely. 2. A cloth usually bearing a device or devices and used to indicate nationality, party, etc., or to give or ask information; -- commonly attached to a staff to be waved by the wind; a standard; a banner; an ensign; the colors; as, the national flag; a military or a naval flag. 3. (Zoöl.) (a) A group of feathers on the lower part of the legs of certain hawks, owls, etc. (b) A group of elongated wing feathers in certain hawks. (c) The bushy tail of a dog, as of a setter. Black flag. See under Black. -- Flag captain, Flag leutenant, etc., special officers attached to the flagship, as aids to the flag officer. -- Flag officer, the commander of a fleet or squadron; an admiral, or commodore. -- Flag of truse, a white flag carried or displayed to an enemy, as an invitation to conference, or for the purpose of making some communication not hostile. -- Flag share, the flag officer's share of prize money. -- Flag station (Railroad), a station at which trains do not stop unless signaled to do so, by a flag hung out or waved. -- National flag, a flag of a particular country, on which some national emblem or device, is emblazoned. -- Red flag, a flag of a red color, displayed as a signal of danger or token of defiance; the emblem of anarchists. -- To dip, the flag, to mlower it and quickly restore it to its place; -- done as a mark of respect. -- To hang out the white flag, to ask truce or quarter, or, in some cases, to manifest a friendly design by exhibiting a white flag. -- To hang the flag half-mast high or half-staff, to raise it only half way to the mast or staff, as a token or sign of mourning. -- To strike, or lower, the flag, to haul it down, in token of respect, submission, or, in an engagement, of surrender. -- Yellow flag, the quarantine flag of all nations; also carried at a vessel's fore, to denote that an infectious disease is on board.  1. To signal to with a flag; as, to flag a train. 2. To convey, as a message, by means of flag signals; as, to flag an order to troops or vessels at a distance.  An aquatic plant, with long, ensiform leaves, belonging to either of the genera Iris and Acorus. Cooper's flag, the cat-tail (Typha latifolia), the long leaves of which are placed between the staves of barrels to make the latter water-tight. -- Corn flag. See under 2d Corn. -- Flag broom, a coarse of broom, originally made of flags or rushes. -- Flag root, the root of the sweet flag. -- Sweet flag. See Calamus, n., 2.  To furnish or deck out with flags.  1. A flat stone used for paving. Woodward. 2. (Geol.)  Any hard, evenly stratified sandstone, which splits into layers suitable for flagstones.  To lay with flags of flat stones. The sides and floor are all flagged with . . . marble. Sandys.
inimitable: Not capable of being imitated, copied, or counterfeited; beyond imitation; surpassingly excellent; matchless; unrivaled; exceptional; unique; as, an inimitable style; inimitable eloquence. "Inimitable force." Dryden. Performing such inimitable feats. Cowper. -- In*im"i*ta*ble*ness, n. -- In*im"i*ta*bly, adv.
ineluctable: Not to be overcome by struggling; irresistible; inevitable. Bp. Pearson. The ineluctable conditions of matter. Hamerton.
table: 1. To form into a table or catalogue; to tabulate; as, to table fines. 2. To delineate, as on a table; to represent, as in a picture. [Obs.] Tabled and pictured in the chambers of meditation. Bacon. 3. To supply with food; to feed. [Obs.] Milton. 4. (Carp.)  To insert, as one piece of timber into another, by alternate scores or projections from the middle, to prevent slipping; to scarf. 5. To lay or place on a table, as money. Carlyle. 6. In parliamentary usage, to lay on the table; to postpone, by a formal vote, the consideration of (a bill, motion, or the like) till called for, or indefinitely. 7. To enter upon the docket; as, to table charges against some one. 8. (Naut.)  To make board hems in the skirts and bottoms of (sails) in order to strengthen them in the part attached to the boltrope.  To live at the table of another; to board; to eat. [Obs.] "He . . . was driven from the society of men to table with the beasts." South.
sinuous: Bending in and out; of a serpentine or undulating form; winding; crooked. -- Sin"u*ous*ly, adv. Streaking the ground with sinuous trace. Milton. Gardens bright with sinuous rills. Coleridge.
fell: imp. of Fall.  1. Cruel; barbarous; inhuman; fierce; savage; ravenous. While we devise fell tortures for thy faults. Shak. 2. Eager; earnest; intent. [Obs.] I am so fell to my business. Pepys.  Gall; anger; melancholy. [Obs.] Untroubled of vile fear or bitter fell. Spenser.  A skin or hide of a beast with the wool or hair on; a pelt; -- used chiefly in composition, as woolfell. We are still handling our ewes, and their fells, you know, are greasy. Shak.  1. A barren or rocky hill. T. Gray. 2. A wild field; a moor. Dryton.  To cause to fall; to prostrate; to bring down or to the ground; to cut down. Stand, or I'll fell thee down. Shak.  The finer portions of ore which go through the meshes, when the ore is sorted by sifting.  To sew or hem; -- said of seams.  1. (Sewing)  A form of seam joining two pieces of cloth, the edges being folded together and the stitches taken through both thicknesses. 2. (Weaving)  The end of a web, formed by the last thread of the weft.
quotidian: Occurring or returning daily; as, a quotidian fever.  Anything returning daily; especially (Med.), an intermittent fever or ague which returns every day. Milton.
puerile: Boyish; childish; trifling; silly. The French have been notorious through generations for their puerile affectation of Roman forms, models, and historic precedents. De Quincey. Syn. -- Youthful; boyish; juvenile; childish; trifling; weak. See Youthful.
dilettante: An admirer or lover of the fine arts; popularly, an amateur; especially, one who follows an art or a branch of knowledge, desultorily, or for amusement only. The true poet is not an eccentric creature, not a mere artist living only for art, not a dreamer or a dilettante, sipping the nectar of existence, while he keeps aloof from its deeper interests. J. C. Shairp.
obtuse: 1. Not pointed or acute; blunt; -- applied esp. to angles greater than a right angle, or containing more than ninety degrees. 2. Not having acute sensibility or perceptions; dull; stupid; as, obtuse senses. Milton. 3. Dull; deadened; as, obtuse sound. Johnson.
obtain: 1. To hold; to keep; to possess. [Obs.] His mother, then, is mortal, but his Sire He who obtains the monarchy of heaven. Milton. 2. To get hold of by effort; to gain possession of; to procure; to acquire, in any way. Some pray for riches; riches they obtain. Dryden. By guileful fair words peace may be obtained. Shak. It may be that I may obtain children by her. Gen. xvi. 2. Syn. -- To attain; gain; procure; acquire; win; earn. See Attain. -- To Obtain, Get, Gain, Earn, Acquire. The idea of getting is common to all these terms. We may, indeed, with only a slight change of sense, substitute get for either of them; as, to get or to gain a prize; to get or to obtain an employment; to get or to earn a living; to get or to acquire a language. To gain is to get by striving; and as this is often a part of our good fortune, the word gain is peculiarly applicable to whatever comes to us fortuitously. Thus, we gain a victory, we gain a cause, we gain an advantage, etc. To earn is to deserve by labor or service; as, to earn good wages; to earn a triumph. Unfortunately, one does not always get or obtain what he has earned. To obtain implies desire for possession, and some effort directed to the attainment of that which is not immediately within our reach. Whatever we thus seek and get, we obtain, whether by our own exertions or those of others; whether by good or bad means; whether permanently, or only for a time. Thus, a man obtains an employment; he obtains an answer to a letter, etc. To acquire is more limited and specific. We acquire what comes to us gradually in the regular exercise of our abilities, while we obtain what comes in any way, provided we desire it. Thus, we acquire knowledge, property, honor, reputation, etc. What we acquire becomes, to a great extent, permanently our own; as, to acquire a language; to acquire habits of industry, etc.  1. To become held; to gain or have a firm footing; to be recognized or established; to subsist; to become prevalent or general; to prevail; as, the custom obtains of going to the seashore in summer. Sobriety hath by use obtained to signify temperance in drinking. Jer. Taylor. The Theodosian code, several hundred years after Justinian's time, did obtain in the western parts of Europe. Baker. 2. To prevail; to succeed. [R.] Evelyn. So run that ye may obtain. 1 Cor. ix. 24. There is due from the judge to the advocate, some commendation, where causes are fair pleaded; especially towards the side which obtaineth not. Bacon.
antipathy: 1. Contrariety or opposition in feeling; settled aversion or dislike; repugnance; distaste. Inveterate antipathies against particular nations, and passionate attachments to others, are to be avoided. Washington. 2. Natural contrariety; incompatibility; repugnancy of qualities; as, oil and water have antipathy. A habit is generated of thinking that a natural antipathy exists between hope and reason. I. Taylor. Note: Any is opposed to sympathy. It is followed by to, against, or between; also sometimes by for. Syn. -- Hatred; aversion; dislike; disgust; distaste; enmity; ill will; repugnance; contrariety; opposition. See Dislike.
qualify: 1. To make such as is required; to give added or requisite qualities to; to fit, as for a place, office, occupation, or character; to furnish with the knowledge, skill, or other accomplishment necessary for a purpose; to make capable, as of an employment or privilege; to supply with legal power or capacity. He had qualified himself for municipal office by taking the oaths to the sovereigns in possession. Macaulay. 2. To give individual quality to; to modulate; to vary; to regulate. It hath no larynx . . . to qualify the sound. Sir T. Browne. 3. To reduce from a general, undefined, or comprehensive form, to particular or restricted form; to modify; to limit; to restrict; to restrain; as, to qualify a statement, claim, or proposition. 4. Hence, to soften; to abate; to diminish; to assuage; to reduce the strength of, as liquors. I do not seek to quench your love's hot fire, But qualify the fire's extreme rage. Shak. 5. To soothe; to cure; -- said of persons. [Obs.] In short space he has them qualified. Spenser. Syn. -- To fit; equip; prepare; adapt; capacitate; enable; modify; soften; restrict; restrain; temper.  1. To be or become qualified; to be fit, as for an office or employment. 2. To obtain legal power or capacity by taking the oath, or complying with the forms required, on assuming an office.
discomposure: 1. The state of being discomposed; disturbance; disorder; agitation; perturbation. No discomposure stirred her features. Akenside. 2. Discordance; disagreement of parts. [Obs.] Boyle.
tortuous: 1. Bent in different directions; wreathed; twisted; winding; as, a tortuous train; a tortuous train; a tortuous leaf or corolla. The badger made his dark and tortuous hole on the side of every hill where the copsewood grew thick. Macaulay. 2. Fig.: Deviating from rectitude; indirect; erroneous; deceitful. That course became somewhat lesstortuous, when the battle of the Boyne had cowed the spirit of the Jakobites. Macaulay. 3. Injurious: tortious. [Obs.] 4. (Astrol.)  Oblique; -- applied to the six signs of the zodiac (from Capricorn to Gemini) which ascend most rapidly and obliquely. [Obs.] Skeat. Infortunate ascendent tortuous. Chaucer. --Tor"tu*ous*ly, adv. -- Tor"tu*ous*ness, n.
apocryphal: 1. Pertaining to the Apocrypha. 2. Not canonical. Hence: Of doubtful authority; equivocal; mythic; fictitious; spurious; false. The passages . . . are, however, in part from apocryphal or fictitious works. Sir G. C. Lewis.
connoisseur: One well versed in any subject; a skillful or knowing person; a critical judge of any art, particulary of one of the fine arts. The connoisseur is "one who knows," as opposed to the dilettant, who only "thinks he knows." Fairholt.
sodden: Boiled; seethed; also, soaked; heavy with moisture; saturated; as, sodden beef; sodden bread; sodden fields.  To be seethed; to become sodden.  To soak; to make heavy with water.
burgeon: To bud. See Bourgeon.
sententious: 1. Abounding with sentences, axioms, and maxims; full of meaning; terse and energetic in expression; pithy; as, a sententious style or discourse; sententious truth. How he apes his sire, Ambitiously sententious! Addison. 2. Comprising or representing sentences; sentential. [Obs.] "Sententious marks." Grew. --- Sen*ten"tious*ly, adv. -- Sen*ten"tious*ness, n.
rail: An outer cloak or covering; a neckerchief for women. Fairholt.  To flow forth; to roll out; to course. [Obs.] Streams of tears from her fair eyes forth railing. Spenser.  1. A bar of timber or metal, usually horizontal or nearly so, extending from one post or support to another, as in fences, balustrades, staircases, etc. 2. (Arch.)  A horizontal piece in a frame or paneling. See Illust. of Style. 3. (Railroad)  A bar of steel or iron, forming part of the track on which the wheels roll. It is usually shaped with reference to vertical strength, and is held in place by chairs, splices, etc. 4. (Naut.) (a) The stout, narrow plank that forms the top of the bulwarks. (b) The light, fencelike structures of wood or metal at the break of the deck, and elsewhere where such protection is needed. Rail fence. See under Fence. -- Rail guard. (a) A device attached to the front of a locomotive on each side for clearing the rail obstructions. (b) A guard rail. See under Guard. -- Rail joint (Railroad), a splice connecting the adjacent ends of rails, in distinction from a chair, which is merely a seat. The two devices are sometimes united. Among several hundred varieties, the fish joint is standard. See Fish joint, under Fish. -- Rail train (Iron & Steel Manuf.), a train of rolls in a rolling mill, for making rails for railroads from blooms or billets.  1. To inclose with rails or a railing. It ought to be fenced in and railed. Ayliffe. 2. To range in a line. [Obs.] They were brought to London all railed in ropes, like a team of horses in a cart. Bacon.  Any one of numerous species of limicoline birds of the family Rallidæ, especially those of the genus Rallus, and of closely allied genera. They are prized as game birds. Note: The common European water rail (Rallus aquaticus) is called also bilcock, skitty coot, and brook runner. The best known American species are the clapper rail, or salt-marsh hen (Rallus lonqirostris, var. crepitans); the king, or red-breasted, rail (R. elegans) (called also fresh-water marshhen); the lesser clapper, or Virginia, rail (R. Virginianus); and the Carolina, or sora, rail (Porzana Carolina). See Sora. Land rail (Zoöl.), the corncrake.  To use insolent and reproachful language; to utter reproaches; to scoff; followed by at or against, formerly by on. Shak. And rail at arts he did not understand. Dryden. Lesbia forever on me rails. Swift.  1. To rail at. [Obs.] Feltham. 2. To move or influence by railing. [R.] Rail the seal from off my bond. Shak.
commensurate: 1. To reduce to a common measure. Sir T. Browne. 2. To proportionate; to adjust. T. Puller  1. Having a common measure; commensurable; reducible to a common measure; as, commensurate quantities. 2. Equal in measure or extent; proportionate. Those who are persuaded that they shall continue forever, can not choose but aspire after a hapiness commensurate to their duration. Tillotson.
ingenuous: 1. Of honorable extraction; freeborn; noble; as, ingenuous blood of birth. 2. Noble; generous; magnanimous; honorable; uprigth; high-minded; as, an ingenuous ardor or zeal. If an ingenuous detestation of falsehood be but carefully and early instilled, that is the true and genuin method to obviate dishonesty. Locke. 3. Free from reserve, disguise, equivocation, or dissimulation; open; frank; sa, an ingenuous man; an ingenuous declaration, confession, etc. Sensible in myself . . . what a burden it is for me, who would be ingenuous, to be loaded with courtesies which he hath not the least hope to requite or deserve. Fuller. 4. Ingenious. [Obs.] Shak. Note: (Formerly) printers did not discriminate between . . . ingenuous and ingenious, and these words were used or rather printed interchangeably almost to the begining of the eighteenth century. G. P. Marsh. Syn. -- Open; frank; unreserved; artless; plain; sincere; candid; fair; noble; generous. -- Ingenuous, Open, Frank. One who is open speaks out at once what is uppermost in his mind; one who is frank does it from a natural boldness, or dislike of self-restraint; one who is ingenuous is actuated by a native simplicity and artlessness, which make him willing to confess faults, and make known his sentiments without reserve. See Candid.
nice: 1. Foolish; silly; simple; ignorant; also, weak; effeminate. [Obs.] Gower. But say that we ben wise and nothing nice. Chaucer. 2. Of trifling moment; nimportant; trivial. [Obs.] The letter was not nice, but full of charge Of dear import. Shak. 3. Overscrupulous or exacting; hard to please or satisfy; fastidious in small matters. Curious not knowing, not exact but nice. Pope. And to taste Think not I shall be nice. Milton. 4. Delicate; refined; dainty; pure. Dear love, continue nice and chaste. Donne. A nice and subtile happiness. Milton. 5. Apprehending slight diffferences or delicate distinctions; distinguishing accurately or minutely; carefully discriminating; as, a nice taste or judgment. "Our author happy in a judge so nice." Pope. "Nice verbal criticism." Coleridge. 6. Done or made with careful labor; suited to excite admiration on account of exactness; evidencing great skill; exact; fine; finished; as, nice proportions, nice workmanship, a nice application; exactly or fastidiously discriminated; requiring close discrimination; as, a nice point of law, a nice distinction in philosophy. The difference is too nice Where ends the virtue, or begins the vice. Pope. 7. Pleasing; agreeable; gratifying; delightful; good; as, a nice party; a nice excursion; a nice person; a nice day; a nice sauce, etc. [Loosely & Colloquially] To make nice of, to be scrupulous about. [Obs.] Shak. Syn. -- Dainty; delicate; exquisite; fine; accurate; exact; correct; precise; particular; scrupulous; punctilious; fastidious; squeamish; finical; effeminate; silly.
facetious: 1. Given to wit and good humor; merry; sportive; jocular; as, a facetious companion. 2. Characterized by wit and pleasantry; exciting laughter; as, a facetious story or reply. -- Fa*ce"tious*ly, adv. -- Fa*ce"tious*ness, n.
reprove: 1. To convince. [Obs.] When he is come, he will reprove the world of sin, and of righteousness, and of judgment. John xvi. 9. 2. To disprove; to refute. [Obs.] Reprove my allegation, if you can. Shak. 3. To chide to the face as blameworthy; to accuse as guilty; to censure. What if thy son Prove disobedient, and, reproved, retort, "Wherefore didst thou beget me" Milton. 4. To express disapprobation of; as, to reprove faults. He neither reproved the ordinance of John, neither plainly condemned the fastings of the other men. Udall. Syn. -- To reprehend; chide; rebuke; scold; blame censure. -- Reprove, Rebuke, Reprimand. These words all signufy the expression of disapprobation. To reprove implies greater calmness and self-possession. To rebuke implies a more excited and personal feeling. A reproof may be administered long after the offience is committed, and is usually intended for the reformation of the offender; a rebuke is commonly given at the moment of the wrong, and is administered by way of punishment and condemnation. A reprimand proceeds from a person invested with authority, and is a formal and offiscial act. A child is reproved for his faults, and rebuked for his impudence. A military officer is reprimanded for neglect or violation of duty.
enigmatic: Relating to or resembling an enigma; not easily explained or accounted for; darkly expressed; obscure; puzzling; as, an enigmatical answer.
petulant: 1. Forward; pert; insolent; wanton. [Obs.] Burton. 2. Capriciously fretful; characterized by ill-natured freakishness; irritable. "Petulant moods." Macaulay. Syn. -- Irritable; ill-humored; peevish; cross; fretful; querulous.
fastidious: Difficult to please; delicate to fault; suited with difficulty; squeamish; as, a fastidious mind or ear; a fastidious appetite. Proud youth ! fastidious of the lower world. Young. Syn. -- Squeamish; critical; overnice; difficult; punctilious. -- Fastidious, Squeamish. We call a person fastidious when his taste or feelings are offended by trifling defects or errors; we call him squeamish when he is excessively nice or critical on minor points, and also when he is overscrupulous as to questions of duty. "Whoever examines his own imperfections will cease to be fastidious; whoever restrains his caprice and scrupulosity will cease to be squeamish." Crabb. -- Fas*tid"i*ous*ly, adv. -- Fas*tid"i*ous*ness, n.
obsequious: 1. Promptly obedient, or submissive, to the will of another; compliant; yielding to the desires of another; devoted. [Obs.] His servants weeping, Obsequious to his orders, bear him hither. Addison. 2. Servilely or meanly attentive; compliant to excess; cringing; fawning; as, obsequious flatterer, parasite. There lies ever in "obsequious" at the present the sense of an observance which is overdone, of an unmanly readiness to fall in with the will of another. Trench. 3. Etym: [See Obsequy.]  Of or pertaining to obsequies; funereal. [R.] "To do obsequious sorrow." Shak. Syn. -- Compliant; obedient; servile. See Yielding.
infelicitous: Not felicitous; unhappy; unfortunate; not fortunate or appropriate in application; not well said, expressed, or done; as, an infelicitous condition; an infelicitous remark; an infelicitous description; infelicitous words.
curmudgeon: An avaricious, grasping fellow; a miser; a niggard; a churl. A gray-headed curmudgeon of a negro. W. Irving.
proffer: 1. To offer for acceptance; to propose to give; to make a tender of; as, to proffer a gift; to proffer services; to proffer friendship. Shak. I reck not what wrong that thou me profre. Chaucer. 2. To essay or attempt of one's own accord; to undertake, or propose to undertake. [R.] Milton.  1. An offer made; something proposed for acceptance by another; a tender; as, proffers of peace or friendship. He made a proffer to lay down his commission. Clarendon. 2. Essay; attempt. [R.] Bacon.
subpoena: A writ commanding the attendance in court, as a witness, of the person on whom it is served, under a penalty; the process by which a defendant in equity is commanded to appear and answer the plaintiff's bill. [Written also subpena.] Subpoena ad testificandum (. Etym: [NL.] A writ used to procure the attendance of a witness for the purpose of testifying. -- Subpoena duces tecum (. Etym: [NL.] A writ which requires a witness to attend and bring certain documents.  To serve with a writ of subpoena; to command attendance in court by a legal writ, under a penalty in case of disobedience.
revel: See Reveal. [R.]  A feast with loose and noisy jollity; riotous festivity or merrymaking; a carousal. This day in mirth and revel to dispend. Chaucer. Some men ruin . . . their bodies by incessant revels. Rambler. Master of the revels, Revel master. Same as Lord of misrule, under Lord.  1. To feast in a riotous manner; to carouse; to act the bacchanalian; to make merry. Shak. 2. To move playfully; to indulge without restraint. "Where joy most revels." Shak.  To draw back; to retract. [Obs.] Harvey.
recondite: 1. Hidden from the mental or intellectual view; secret; abstruse; as, recondite causes of things. 2. Dealing in things abstruse; profound; searching; as, recondite studies. "Recondite learning." Bp. Horsley.
harbinger: 1. One who provides lodgings; especially, the officer of the English royal household who formerly preceded the court when traveling, to provide and prepare lodgings. Fuller. 2. A forerunner; a precursor; a messenger. I knew by these harbingers who were coming. Landor.  To usher in; to be a harbinger of. "Thus did the star of religious freedom harbinger the day." Bancroft.
enormity: 1. The state or quality of exceeding a measure or rule, or of being immoderate, monstrous, or outrageous. The enormity of his learned acquisitions. De Quincey. 2. That which is enormous; especially, an exceeding offense against order, right, or decency; an atrocious crime; flagitious villainy; an atrocity. These clamorous enormities which are grown too big and strong for law or shame. South.
demur: 1. To linger; to stay; to tarry. [Obs.] Yet durst not demur nor abide upon the camp. Nicols. 2. To delay; to pause; to suspend proceedings or judgment in view of a doubt or difficulty; to hesitate; to put off the determination or conclusion of an affair. Upon this rub, the English embassadors thought fit to demur. Hayward. 3. To scruple or object; to take exception; as, I demur to that statement. 4. (Law)  To interpose a demurrer. See Demurrer, 2.  1. To suspend judgment concerning; to doubt of or hesitate about. [Obs.] The latter I demur, for in their looks Much reason, and in their actions, oft appears. Milton. 2. To cause delay to; to put off. [Obs.] He demands a fee, And then demurs me with a vain delay. Quarles.  Stop; pause; hesitation as to proceeding; suspense of decision or action; scruple. All my demurs but double his attacks; At last he whispers, "Do; and we go snacks." Pope.
baleful: 1. Full of deadly or pernicious influence; destructive. "Baleful enemies." Shak. Four infernal rivers that disgorge Into the burning lake their baleful streams. Milton. 2. Full of grief or sorrow; woeful; sad. [Archaic]
epicure: 1. A follower of Epicurus; an Epicurean. [Obs.] Bacon. 2. One devoted to dainty or luxurious sensual enjoyments, esp. to the luxuries of the table. Syn. -- Voluptuary; sensualist.
cardinal: Of fundamental importance; preëminet; superior; chief; principal. The cardinal intersections of the zodiac. Sir T. Browne. Impudence is now a cardinal virtue. Drayton. But cardinal sins, and hollow hearts, I fear ye. Shak. Cardinal numbers, the numbers one, two, three, etc., in distinction from first, second, third, etc., which are called ordinal numbers. -- Cardinal points (a) (Geol.) The four principal points of the compass, or intersections of the horizon with the meridian and the prime vertical circle, north, south east, and west. (b) (Astrol.) The rising and setting of the sun, the zenith and nadir. -- Cardinal signs (Astron.) Aries, Lidra, Cancer, and Capricorn. -- Cardinal teeth (Zoöl.), the central teeth of bivalve shell. See Bivalve. -- Cardinal veins (Anat.), the veins in vertebrate embryos, which run each side of the vertebral column and returm the blood to the heart. They remain through life in some fishes. -- Cardinal virtues, preëminent virtues; among the ancients, prudence, justice, temperance, and fortitude. -- Cardinal winds, winds which blow from the cardinal points due north, south, east, or west.  1. (R.C.Ch.) One of the ecclesiastical prince who constitute the pope's council, or the sacred college. The clerics of the supreme Chair are called Cardinals, as undoubtedly adhering more nearly to the hinge by which all things are moved. Pope Leo IX. Note: The cardinals are appointed by the pope. Since the time of Sixtus V., their number can never exceed seventy (six of episcopal rank, fifty priests, fourteen deacons), and the number of cardinal priests and deacons is seldom full. When the papel chair is vacant a pope is elected by the college of cardinals from among themselves. The cardinals take procedence of all dignitaries except the pope. The principal parts of a cardinal's costume are a red cassock, a rochet, a short purple mantle, and a red hat with a small crown and broad, brim, with cards and tessels of a special pattern hanging from it. 2. A woman's short cloak with a hood. Where's your cardinal! Make haste. Lloyd. 3. Mulled red wine. Hotten. Cardinal bird, or Cardinal grosbeak (Zoöl.), an American song bird (Cardinalis cardinalis, or C. Virginianus), of the family Fringillidæ, or finches having a bright red plumage, and a high, pointed crest on its head. The males have loud and musical notes resembling those of a fife. Other related species are also called cardinal birds. -- Cardinal flower (Bot.), an herbaceous plant (Lobelia cardinalis) bearing brilliant red flowers of much beauty. -- Cardinal red, color like that of a cardinal's cassock, hat, etc.; a bright red, darket than scarlet, and between scarlet and crimson.
truncate: To cut off; to lop; to maim.  Appearing as if cut off at the tip; as, a truncate leaf or feather.
vilify: 1. To make vile; to debase; to degrade; to disgrace. [R.] When themselves they vilified To serve ungoverned appetite. Milton. 2. To degrade or debase by report; to defame; to traduce; to calumniate. I. Taylor. Many passions dispose us to depress and vilify the merit of one rising in the esteem of mankind. Addison. 3. To treat as vile; to despise. [Obs.] I do vilify your censure. Beau. & Fl.
placate: Same as Placard, 4 & 5.  To appease; to pacify; to concilate. "Therefore is he always propitiated and placated." Cudworth.
vexation: 1. The act of vexing, or the state of being vexed; agitation; disquiet; trouble; irritation. Passions too violent . . . afford us nothing but vexation and pain. Sir W. Temple. Those who saw him after a defeat looked in vain for any trace of vexation. Macaulay. 2. The cause of trouble or disquiet; affliction. Your children were vexation to your youth. Shak. 3. A harassing by process of law; a vexing or troubling, as by a malicious suit. Bacon. Syn. -- Chagrin; agitation; mortification; uneasiness; trouble; grief; sorrow; distress. See Chagrin.
salient: 1. Moving by leaps or springs; leaping; bounding; jumping. "Frogs and salient animals." Sir T. Browne. 2. Shooting out up; springing; projecting. He had in himself a salient, living spring of generous and manly action. Burke. 3. Hence, figuratively, forcing itself on the attention; prominent; conspicuous; noticeable. He [Grenville] had neither salient traits, nor general comprehensiveness of mind. Bancroft. 4. (Math. & Fort.)  Projectiong outwardly; as, a salient angle; -- opposed to reëntering. See Illust. of Bastion. 5. (Her.)  Represented in a leaping position; as, a lion salient. Salient angle. See Salient, a., 4. -- Salient polygon (Geom.), a polygon all of whose angles are salient. -- Salient polyhedron (Geom.), a polyhedron all of whose solid angles are salient.  A salient angle or part; a projection.
ford: 1. A place in a river, or other water, where it may passed by man or beast on foot, by wading. He swam the Esk river where ford there was none. Sir W. Scott. 2. A stream; a current. With water of the ford Or of the clouds. Spenser. Permit my ghost to pass the Stygford. Dryden.  To pass or cross, as a river or other water, by wading; to wade through. His last section, which is no deep one, remains only to be forted. Milton.
supplant: 1. To trip up. [Obs.] "Supplanted, down he fell." Milton. 2. To remove or displace by stratagem; to displace and take the place of; to supersede; as, a rival supplants another in the favor of a mistress or a prince. Suspecting that the courtier had supplanted the friend. Bp. Fell. 3. To overthrow, undermine, or force away, in order to get a substitute in place of. You never will supplant the received ideas of God. Landor. Syn. -- To remove; displace; overpower; undermine; overthrow; supersede.
polemical: Polemic; controversial; disputatious. -- Po*lem"ic*al*ly, adv. Polemical and impertinent disputations. Jer. Taylor.
sagacious: 1. Of quick sense perceptions; keen-scented; skilled in following a trail. Sagacious of his quarry from so far. Milton. 2. Hence, of quick intellectual perceptions; of keen penetration and judgment; discerning and judicious; knowing; far-sighted; shrewd; sage; wise; as, a sagacious man; a sagacious remark. Instinct . . . makes them, many times, sagacious above our apprehension. Dr. H. More. Only sagacious heads light on these observations, and reduce them into general propositions. Locke. Syn. -- See Shrewd. -- Sa*ga"cious*ly, adv. -- Sa-ga"cious*ness, n.
satire: 1. A composition, generally poetical, holding up vice or folly to reprobation; a keen or severe exposure of what in public or private morals deserves rebuke; an invective poem; as, the Satires of Juvenal. 2. Keeness and severity of remark; caustic exposure to reprobation; trenchant wit; sarcasm. Syn. -- Lampoon; sarcasm; irony; ridicule; pasquinade; burlesque; wit; humor.
prerogative: 1. An exclusive or peculiar privilege; prior and indefeasible right; fundamental and essential possession; -- used generally of an official and hereditary right which may be asserted without question, and for the exercise of which there is no responsibility or accountability as to the fact and the manner of its exercise. The two faculties that are the prerogative of man -- the powers of abstraction and imagination. I. Taylor. An unconstitutional exercise of his prerogative. Macaulay. 2. Precedence; preëminence; first rank. [Obs.] Then give me leave to have prerogative. Shak. Note: The term came into general use in the conflicts between the Crown and Parliaments of Great Britain, especially in the time of the Stuarts. Prerogative Court (Eng. Law), a court which formerly had authority in the matter of wills and administrations, where the deceased left bona notabilia, or effects of the value of five pounds, in two or more different dioceses. Blackstone. -- Prerogative office, the office in which wills proved in the Prerogative Court were registered. Syn. -- Privilege; right. See Privilege.
irascible: Prone to anger; easily provoked or inflamed to anger; choleric; irritable; as, an irascible man; an irascible temper or mood. -- I*ras"ci*ble*ness, n. -- I*ras"ci*bly, adv.
byzantine: A gold coin, so called from being coined at Byzantium. See Bezant.  Of or pertaining to Byzantium. -- n.  A native or inhabitant of Byzantium, now Constantinople; sometimes, applied to an inhabitant of the modern city of Constantinople. [ Written also Bizantine.] Byzantine church, the Eastern or Greek church, as distinguished from the Western or Roman or Latin church.See under Greek. -- Byzantine empire, the Eastern Roman or Greek empire from A.D. 364 or A.D. 395 to the capture of Constantinople by the Turks, A.D. 1453. -- Byzantine historians, historians and writers (Zonaras, Procopius, etc.) who lived in the Byzantine empire. P. Cyc. Byzantine style (Arch.), a style of architecture developed in the Byzantine empire. Note: Its leading forms are the round arch, the dome, the pillar, the circle, and the cross. The capitals of the pillars are the endless variety, and full of invention. The mosque of St. Sophia, Constantinople, and the church of St. Mark, Venice, are prominent examples of Byzantine architecture.
officious: 1. Pertaining to, or being in accordance with, duty. [R.] If there were any lie in the case, it could be no more than as officious and venial one. Note on Gen. xxvii. (Douay version). 2. Disposed to serve; kind; obliging. [Archaic] Yet not to earth are those bright luminaries Officious. Milton. They were tolerably well bred, very officious, humane, and hospitable. Burke. 3. Importunately interposing services; intermeddling in affairs in which one has no concern; meddlesome. You are too officious In her behalf that scorns your services. Shak. Syn. -- Impertinent; meddling. See Impertinent. -- Of*fi"cious*ly, adv. -- Of*fi"cious*ness, n.
eulogy: A speech or writing in commendation of the character or services of a person; as, a fitting eulogy to worth. Eulogies turn into elegies. Spenser. Syn. -- Encomium; praise; panegyric; applause. -- Eulogy, Eulogium, Encomium, Panegyric. The idea of praise is common to all these words. The word encomium is used of both persons and things which are the result of human action, and denotes warm praise. Eulogium and eulogy apply only to persons and are more studied and of greater length. A panegyric was originally a set speech in a full assembly of the people, and hence denotes a more formal eulogy, couched in terms of warm and continuous praise, especially as to personal character. We may bestow encomiums on any work of art, on production of genius, without reference to the performer; we bestow eulogies, or pronounce a eulogium, upon some individual distinguished for his merit public services; we pronounce a panegyric before an assembly gathered for the occasion.
contumacious: 1. Exhibiting contumacy; contemning authority; obstinate; perverse; stubborn; disobedient. There is another very, efficacious method for subding the most obstinate, contumacious sinner. Hammond. 2. (Law)  Willfully disobedient to the summous or prders of a court. Blackstone. Syn. -- Stubborn; obstinate; obdurate; disobedient; perverse; unyielding; headstrong. -- Con`tu*ma"cious*ly, adv. -- Con`tu*ma"cious*ness, n.
kinetic: Moving or causing motion; motory; active, as opposed to latent. Kinetic energy. See Energy, n. 4.
stymie: The position of two balls on the putting green such that, being more than six inches apart, one ball lies directly between the other and the hole at which the latter must be played; also, the act of bringing the balls into this position.  To bring into the position of, or impede by, a stymie.
urbane: Courteous in manners; polite; refined; elegant.
burnish: To cause to shine; to make smooth and bright; to polish; specifically, to polish by rubbing with something hard and smooth; as, to burnish brass or paper. The frame of burnished steel, that east a glare From far, and seemed to thaw the freezing air. Dryden. Now the village windows blaze, Burnished by the setting sun. Cunningham. Burnishing machine, a machine for smoothing and polishing by compression, as in making paper collars.  To shine forth; to brighten; to become smooth and glossy, as from swelling or filling out; hence, to grow large. A slender poet must have time to grow, And spread and burnish as his brothers do. Dryden. My thoughts began to burnish, sprout, and swell. Herbert.  The effect of burnishing; gloss; brightness; luster. Crashaw.
prolix: 1. Extending to a great length; unnecessarily long; minute in narration or argument; excessively particular in detail; -- rarely used except with reference to discourse written or spoken; as, a prolix oration; a prolix poem; a prolix sermon. With wig prolix, down flowing to his waist. Cowper. 2. Indulging in protracted discourse; tedious; wearisome; -- applied to a speaker or writer. Syn. -- Long; diffuse; prolonged; protracted; tedious; tiresome; wearisome. -- Prolix, Diffuse. A prolix writer delights in circumlocution, extended detail, and trifling particulars. A diffuse writer is fond of amplifying, and abounds in epithets, figures, and illustrations. Diffuseness often arises from an exuberance of imagination; prolixity is generally connected with a want of it.
mince: 1. To cut into very small pieces; to chop fine; to hash; as, to mince meat. Bacon. 2. To suppress or weaken the force of; to extenuate; to palliate; to tell by degrees, instead of directly and frankly; to clip, as words or expressions; to utter half and keep back half of. I know no ways to mince it in love, but directly to say -- "I love you." Shak. Siren, now mince the sin, And mollify damnation with a phrase. Dryden. If, to mince his meaning, I had either omitted some part of what he said, or taken from the strength of his expression, I certainly had wronged him. Dryden. 3. To affect; to make a parade of. [R.] Shak.  1. To walk with short steps; to walk in a prim, affected manner. The daughters of Zion are haughty, and walk with stretched forth necks and wanton eyes,... mincing as they go. Is. iii. 16. I 'll... turn two mincing steps Into a manly stride. Shak. 2. To act or talk with affected nicety; to affect delicacy in manner.  A short, precise step; an affected manner.
vacillate: 1. To move one way and the other; to reel or stagger; to waver. [A spheroid] is always liable to shift and vacillatefrom one axis to another. Paley. 2. To fluctuate in mind or opinion; to be unsteady or inconstant; to waver. Syn. -- See Fluctuate.
intimate: 1. Innermost; inward; internal; deep-seated; hearty. "I knew from intimate impulse." Milton. 2. Near; close; direct; thorough; complete. He was honored with an intimate and immediate admission. South. 3. Close in friendship or acquaintance; familiar; confidential; as, an intimate friend. Syn. -- Familiar; near; friendly; confidential.  An intimate friend or associate; a confidant. Gov. of the Tongue.  1. To announce; to declare; to publish; to communicate; to make known. [Obs.] He, incontinent, did proclaim and intimate open war. E. Hall. So both conspiring 'gan to intimate Each other's grief. Spenser. 2. To suggest obscurely or indirectly; to refer to remotely; to give slight notice of; to hint; as, he intimated his intention of resigning his office. The names of simple ideas and substances, with the abstract ideas in the mind, intimate some real existence, from which was derived their original pattern. Locke.
dulcet: 1. Sweet to the taste; luscious. [Obs.] She tempers dulcet creams. Milton. 2. Sweet to the ear; melodious; harmonious. Their dainty lays and dulcet melody. Spenser.
list: A line inclosing or forming the extremity of a piece of ground, or field of combat; hence, in the plural (lists), the ground or field inclosed for a race or combat. Chaucer. In measured lists to toss the weighty lance. Pope. To enter the lists, to accept a challenge, or engage in contest.  To inclose for combat; as, to list a field.  To hearken; to attend; to listen. [Obs. except in poetry.] Stand close, and list to him. Shak.  To listen or hearken to. Then weigh what loss your honor may sustain, If with too credent ear you list his songs. Shak.  1. To desire or choose; to please. The wind bloweth where it listeth. John iii. 8. Them that add to the Word of God what them listeth. Hooker. Let other men think of your devices as they list. Whitgift. 2. (Naut.)  To lean; to incline; as, the ship lists to port.  1. Inclination; desire. [Obs.] Chaucer. 2. (Naut.)  An inclination to one side; as, the ship has a list to starboard.  1. A strip forming the woven border or selvedge of cloth, particularly of broadcloth, and serving to strengthen it; hence, a strip of cloth; a fillet. " Gartered with a red and blue list. " Shak. 2. A limit or boundary; a border. The very list, the very utmost bound, Of all our fortunes. Shak. 3. The lobe of the ear; the ear itself. [Obs.] Chaucer. 4. A stripe. [Obs.] Sir T. Browne. 5. A roll or catalogue, that is row or line; a record of names; as, a list of names, books, articles; a list of ratable estate. He was the ablest emperor of all the list. Bacon. 6. (Arch.)  A little square molding; a fillet; -- called also listel. 7. (Carp.)  A narrow strip of wood, esp. sapwood, cut from the edge of a plank or board. 8. (Rope Making)  A piece of woolen cloth with which the yarns are grasped by a workman. 9. (Tin-plate Manuf.) (a) The first thin coat of tin. (b) A wirelike rim of tin left on an edge of the plate after it is coated. Civil list (Great Britain & U.S.), the civil officers of government, as judges, ambassadors, secretaries, etc. Hence, the revenues or appropriations of public money for the support of the civil officers. More recently, the civil list, in England, embraces only the expenses of the reigning monarch's household. Free list. (a) A list of articles admitted to a country free of duty. (b) A list of persons admitted to any entertainment, as a theater or opera, without payment, or to whom a periodical, or the like, is furnished without cost. Syn. -- Roll; catalogue; register; inventory; schedule. -- List, Boll, Catalogue, Register, Inventory, Schedule. Alist is properly a simple series of names, etc., in a brief form, such as might naturally be entered in a narrow strip of paper. A roll was originally a list containing the names of persons belonging to a public body (as Parliament, etc.), which was rolled up and laid aside among its archives. A catalogue is a list of persons or things arranged in order, and usually containing some description of the same, more or less extended. A register is designed for record or preservation. An inventory is a list of articles, found on hand in a store of goods, or in the estate of a deceased person, or under similar circumstances. A schedule is a formal list or inventory prepared for legal or business purposes.  1. To sew together, as strips of cloth, so as to make a show of colors, or form a border. Sir H. Wotton. 2. To cover with list, or with strips of cloth; to put list on; as, to list a door; to stripe as if with list. The tree that stood white-listed through the gloom. Tennyson. 3. To enroll; to place or register in a list. Listed among the upper serving men. Milton. 4. To engage, as a soldier; to enlist. I will list you for my soldier. Sir W. Scott. 5. (Carp.)  To cut away a narrow strip, as of sapwood, from the edge of; as, to list a board. To list a stock (Stock Exchange), to put it in the list of stocks called at the meeting of the board.  To engage in public service by enrolling one's name; to enlist.
glib: 1. Smooth; slippery; as, ice is glib. [Obs.] 2. Speaking or spoken smoothly and with flippant rapidity; fluent; voluble; as, a glib tongue; a glib speech. I want that glib and oily art, To speak and purpose not. Shak. Syn. -- Slippery; smooth; fluent; voluble; flippant.  To make glib. [Obs.] Bp. Hall.  A thick lock of hair, hanging over the eyes. [Obs.] The Irish have, from the Scythians, mantles and long glibs, which is a thick curied bush of hair hanging down over their eyes, and monstrously disguising them. Spenser. Their wild costume of the glib and mantle. Southey.  To castrate; to geld; to emasculate. [Obs.] Shak.
martial: 1. Of, pertaining to, or suited for, war; military; as, martial music; a martial appearance. "Martial equipage." Milton. 2. Practiced in, or inclined to, war; warlike; brave. But peaceful kings, o'er martial people set, Each other's poise and counterbalance are. Dryden. 3. Belonging to war, or to an army and navy; -- opposed to civil; as, martial law; a court-martial. 4. Pertaining to, or resembling, the god, or the planet, Mars. Sir T. Browne. 5. (Old Chem. & Old Med.)  Pertaining to, or containing, iron; chalybeate; as, martial preparations. [Archaic] Martial flowers (Med.), a reddish crystalline salt of iron; the ammonio-chloride of iron. [Obs.] -- Martial law, the law administered by the military power of a government when it has superseded the civil authority in time of war, or when the civil authorities are unable to enforce the laws. It is distinguished from military law, the latter being the code of rules for the regulation of the army and navy alone, either in peace or in war. Syn. -- Martial, Warlike. Martial refers more to war in action, its array, its attendants, etc.; as, martial music, a martial appearance, a martial array, courts-martial, etc. Warlike describes the feeling or temper which leads to war, and the adjuncts of war; as, a warlike nation, warlike indication, etc. The two words are often used without discrimination.
sparse: 1. Thinly scattered; set or planted here and there; not being dense or close together; as, a sparse population. Carlyle. 2. (Bot.)  Placed irregularly and distantly; scattered; -- applied to branches, leaves, peduncles, and the like.  To scatter; to disperse. [Obs.] Spenser.
steep: Bright; glittering; fiery. [Obs.] His eyen steep, and rolling in his head. Chaucer.  To soak in a liquid; to macerate; to extract the essence of by soaking; as, to soften seed by steeping it in water. Often used figuratively. Let fancy still my sense in Lethe steep. Shak. In refreshing dew to steep The little, trembling flowers. Wordsworth. The learned of the nation were steeped in Latin. Earle.  To undergo the process of soaking in a liquid; as, the tea is steeping. [Colloq.]  1. Something steeped, or used in steeping; a fertilizing liquid to hasten the germination of seeds. 2. A rennet bag. [Prov. Eng.]  1. Making a large angle with the plane of the horizon; ascending or descending rapidly with respect to a horizontal line or a level; precipitous; as, a steep hill or mountain; a steep roof; a steep ascent; a steep declivity; a steep barometric gradient. 2. Difficult of access; not easy reached; lofty; elevated; high. [Obs.] Chapman. 3. Excessive; as, a steep price. [Slang]  A precipitous place, hill, mountain, rock, or ascent; any elevated object sloping with a large angle to the plane of the horizon; a precipice. Dryden. We had on each side naked rocks and mountains broken into a thousand irregular steeps and precipices. Addison. Bare steeps, where desolation stalks. Wordsworth.
auspicious: 1. Having omens or tokens of a favorable issue; giving promise of success, prosperity, or happiness; predicting good; as, an auspicious beginning. Auspicious union of order and freedom. Macaulay. 2. Prosperous; fortunate; as, auspicious years. "Auspicious chief." Dryden. 3. Favoring; favorable; propitious; -- applied to persons or things. "Thy auspicious mistress." Shak. "Auspicious gales." Pope. Syn. -- See Propitious. -- Aus*pi"cious*ly, adv. -- Aus*pi"cious*ness, n.
enervate: To deprive of nerve, force, strength, or courage; to render feeble or impotent; to make effeminate; to impair the moral powers of. A man . . . enervated by licentiousness. Macaulay. And rhyme began t' enervate poetry. Dryden. Syn. -- To weaken; enfeeble; unnerve; debilitate.  Weakened; weak; without strength of force. Pope.
perfidy: The act of violating faith or allegiance; violation of a promise or vow, or of trust reposed; faithlessness; teachery. The ambition and perfidy of tyrants. Macaulay. His perfidy to this sacred engagement. DeQuincey.
emollient: Softening; making supple; acting as an emollient. "Emollient applications." Arbuthnot.  An external something or soothing application to allay irritation, soreness, etc.
laconic: 1. Expressing much in few words, after the manner of the Laconians or Spartans; brief and pithy; brusque; epigrammatic. In this sense laconic is the usual form. I grow laconic even beyond laconicism; for sometimes I return only yes, or no, to questionary or petitionary epistles of half a yard long. Pope. His sense was strong and his style laconic. Welwood. 2. Laconian; characteristic of, or like, the Spartans; hence, stern or severe; cruel; unflinching. His head had now felt the razor, his back the rod; all that laconical discipline pleased him well. Bp. Hall. Syn. -- Short; brief; concise; succinct; sententious; pointed; pithy. -- Laconic, Concise. Concise means without irrelevant or superfluous matter; it is the opposite of diffuse. Laconic means concise with the additional quality of pithiness, sometimes of brusqueness.  Laconism. [Obs.] Addison.
complaisance: Disposition to please or oblige; obliging compliance with the wishes of others; a deportment indicative of a desire to please; courtesy; civility. These [ladies] . . . are by the just complaisance and gallantry of our nation the most powerful part of our people. Addison. They strive with their own hearts and keep them down, In complaisance to all the fools in town. Young. Syn. -- Civility; courtesy; urbanity; suavity; affability; good breeding.
din: Loud, confused, harsh noise; a loud, continuous, rattling or clanging sound; clamor; roar. Think you a little din can daunt mine ears Shak. He knew the battle's din afar. Sir W. Scott. The dust and din and steam of town. Tennyson.  1. To strike with confused or clanging sound; to stun with loud and continued noise; to harass with clamor; as, to din the ears with cries. 2. To utter with a din; to repeat noisily; to ding. This hath been often dinned in my ears. Swift. To din into, to fix in the mind of another by frequent and noisy repetitions. Sir W. Scott.  To sound with a din; a ding. The gay viol dinning in the dale. A. Seward.
plangent: Beating; dashing, as a wave. [R.] "The plangent wave." H. Taylor.
quiescence: The state or quality of being quiescent. "Quiescence, bodily and mental." H. Spencer. Deeds will be done; -- while be boasts his quiescence. R. Browning.
quagmire: Soft, wet, miry land, which shakes or yields under the feet. "A spot surrounded by quagmires, which rendered it difficult of access." Palfrey. Syn. -- Morass; marsh; bog; swamp; fen; slough.
errant: 1. Wandering; deviating from an appointed course, or from a direct path; roving. Seven planets or errant stars in the lower orbs of heaven. Sir T. Browne. 2. Notorious; notoriously bad; downright; arrant. Would make me an errant fool. B. Jonson. 3. (Eng. Law)  Journeying; itinerant; -- formerly applied to judges who went on circuit and to bailiffs at large. Mozley & W.  One who wanders about. [Obs.] Fuller.
garner: A granary; a building or place where grain is stored for preservation.  To gather for preservation; to store, as in a granary; to treasure. Shak.
spurious: 1. Not proceeding from the true source, or from the source pretended; not genuine; false; adulterate. 2. Not legitimate; bastard; as, spurious issue. "Her spurious firstborn." Milton. Spurious primary, or Spurious quill (Zoöl.), the first, or outer, primary quill when rudimentary or much reduced in size, as in certain singing birds. -- Spurious wing (Zoöl.), the bastard wing, or alula. Syn. -- Counterfeit; false; adulterate; supposititious; fictitious; bastard. -- Spu"ri*ous*ly, adv. -- Spu"ri*ous*ness, n.
august: Of a quality inspiring mingled admiration and reverence; having an aspect of solemn dignity or grandeur; sublime; majestic; having exalted birth, character, state, or authority. "Forms august." Pope. "August in visage." Dryden. "To shed that august blood." Macaulay. So beautiful and so august a spectacle. Burke. To mingle with a body so august. Byron. Syn. -- Grand; magnificent; majestic; solemn; awful; noble; stately; dignified; imposing.  The eighth month of the year, containing thirty-one days. Note: The old Roman name was Sextilis, the sixth month from March, the month in which the primitive Romans, as well as Jews, began the year. The name was changed to August in honor of Augustus Cæsar, the first emperor of Rome, on account of his victories, and his entering on his first consulate in that month.
mitigate: 1. To make less severe, intense, harsh, rigorous, painful, etc.; to soften; to meliorate; to alleviate; to diminish; to lessen; as, to mitigate heat or cold; to mitigate grief. 2. To make mild and accessible; to mollify; -- applied to persons. [Obs.] This opinion ... mitigated kings into companions. Burke. Syn. -- To alleviate; assuage; allay. See Alleviate.
ignominious: 1. Marked with ignominy; in curring public disgrace; dishonorable; shameful. Then first with fear surprised and sense of pain, Fled ignominious. Milton. 2. Deserving ignominy; despicable. One single, obscure, ignominious projector. Swift. 3. Humiliating; degrading; as, an ignominious judgment or sentence. Macaulay.
axiomatic: Of or pertaining to an axiom; having the nature of an axiom; self-evident; characterized by axioms. "Axiomatical truth." Johnson. The stores of axiomatic wisdom. I. Taylor.
pundit: A learned man; a teacher; esp., a Brahman versed in the Sanskrit language, and in the science, laws, and religion of the Hindoos; in Cashmere, any clerk or native official. [Written also pandit.] [India]
regale: A prerogative of royalty. [R.] Johnson.  To enertaas, to regale the taste, the eye, or the ear.  To feast; t  A sumptuous repast; a banquet. Johnson. Cowper. Two baked custards were produced as additions to the regale. E. E. Hale.
austere: 1. Sour and astringent; rough to the state; having acerbity; as, an austere crab apple; austere wine. 2. Severe in modes of judging, or living, or acting; rigid; rigorous; stern; as, an austere man, look, life. From whom the austere Etrurian virtue rose. Dryden. 3. Unadorned; unembellished; severely simple. Syn. -- Harsh; sour; rough; rigid; stern; severe; rigorous; strict.
lachrymose: Generating or shedding tears; given to shedding tears; suffused with tears; tearful. You should have seen his lachrymose visnomy. Lamb. -- Lach"ry*mose`ly, adv.
iconoclastic: Of or pertaining to the iconoclasts, or to image breaking. Milman.
castigation: 1. Corrective punishment; chastisement; reproof; pungent criticism. The keenest castigation of her slanderers. W. Irving. 2. Emendation; correction. [Obs.]
descry: 1. To spy out or discover by the eye, as objects distant or obscure; to espy; to recognize; to discern; to discover. And the house of Joseph sent to descry Bethel. Judg. i. 23. Edmund, I think, is gone . . . to descry The strength o' the enemy. Shak. And now their way to earth they had descried. Milton. 2. To discover; to disclose; to reveal. [R.] His purple robe he had thrown aside, lest it should descry him. Milton. Syn. -- To see; behold; espy; discover; discern.  , Discovery or view, as of an army seen at a distance. [Obs.] Near, and on speedy foot; the main descry Stands on the hourly thought. Shak.
contentious: 1. Fond of contention; given to angry debate; provoking dispute or contention; quarrelsome. Despotic and contentious temper. Macaulay. 2. Relating to contention or strife; involving or characterized by contention. Spenser. More cheerfull; though not less contentious, regions. Brougham. 3. (Law)  Contested; litigated; litigious; having power to decide controversy. Contentious jurisdiction (Eng. Eccl. Law), jurisdiction over matters in controversy between parties, in contradistinction to voluntary jurisdiction, or that exercised upon matters not opposed or controverted. Syn. -- Quarrelsome; pugnacious; dissentious; wrangling; litigious; perverse; peevish. - Con*ten"tious*ly, adv. -- Con*ten"tious*ness, n.
mundane: Of or pertaining to the world; worldly; earthly; terrestrial; as, the mundane sphere. -- Mun"dane*ly, adv. The defilement of mundane passions. I. Taylor.
expatiate: 1. To range at large, or without restraint. Bids his free soul expatiate in the skies. Pope. 2. To enlarge in discourse or writing; to be copious in argument or discussion; to descant. He expatiated on the inconveniences of trade. Addison.  To expand; to spread; to extend; to diffuse; to broaden. Afford art an ample field in which to expatiate itself. Dryden.
cogent: 1. Compelling, in a physical sense; powerful. [Obs.] The cogent force of nature. Prior. 2. Having the power to compel conviction or move the will; constraining; conclusive; forcible; powerful; not easily reasisted. No better nor more cogent reason. Dr. H. More. Proofs of the most cogent description. Tyndall. The tongue whose strains were cogent as commands, Revered at home, and felt in foreign lands. Cowper. Syn. -- Forcible; powerful; potent; urgent; strong; persuasive; convincing; conclusive; influential.
bellicose: Inclined to war or contention; warlike; pugnacious. Arnold was, in fact, in a bellicose vein. W. Irving.
laud: 1. High commendation; praise; honor; exaltation; glory. "Laud be to God." Shak. So do well and thou shalt have laud of the same. Tyndals. 2. A part of divine worship, consisting chiefly of praise; -- usually in the pl. Note: In the Roman Catholic Church, the prayers used at daybreak, between those of matins and prime, are called lauds. 3. Music or singing in honor of any one.  To praise in words alone, or with words and singing; to celebrate; to extol. With all the company of heaven, we laud and magnify thy glorious name. Book of Common Prayer.
castigate: 1. To punish by stripes; to chastise by blows; to chasten; also, to chastise verbally; to reprove; to criticise severely. 2. To emend; to correct. [Obs.]
discursive: 1. Passing from one thing to another; ranging over a wide field; roving; digressive; desultory. "Discursive notices." De Quincey. The power he [Shakespeare] delights to show is not intense, but discursive. Hazlitt. A man rather tacit than discursive. Carlyle. 2. Reasoning; proceeding from one ground to another, as in reasoning; argumentative. Reason is her being, Discursive or intuitive. Milton. -- Dis*cur"sive*ly, adv. -- Dis*cur"sive*ness, n.
beatify: 1. To pronounce or regard as happy, or supremely blessed, or as conferring happiness. The common conceits and phrases that beatify wealth. Barrow. 2. To make happy; to bless with the completion of celestial enjoyment. "Beatified spirits." Dryden. 3. (R. C. Ch.)  To ascertain and declare, by a public process and decree, that a deceased person is one of "the blessed" and is to be reverenced as such, though not canonized.
hedonism: 1. The doctrine of the Hedonic sect. 2. The ethical theory which finds the explanation and authority of duty in its tendency to give pleasure.
odious: 1. Hateful; deserving or receiving hatred; as, an odious name, system, vice. "All wickedness will be most odious." Sprat. He rendered himself odious to the Parliament. Clarendon. 2. Causing or provoking hatred, repugnance, or disgust; offensive; disagreeable; repulsive; as, an odious sight; an odious smell. Milton. The odious side of that polity. Macaulay. Syn. -- Hateful; detestable; abominable; disgusting; loathsome; invidious; repulsive; forbidding; unpopular. -- O"di*ous`ly. adv. -- O"di*ous*ness, n.
nugatory: 1. Trifling; vain; futile; insignificant. 2. Of no force; inoperative; ineffectual. If all are pardoned, and pardoned as a mere act of clemency, the very substance of government is made nugatory. I. Taylor.
predilection: A previous liking; a prepossession of mind in favor of something; predisposition to choose or like; partiality. Burke.
trenchant: 1. Fitted to trench or cut; gutting; sharp. " Trenchant was the blade." Chaucer. 2. Fig.: Keen; biting; severe; as, trenchant wit.
archaic: Of or characterized by antiquity or archaism; antiquated; obsolescent.
assay: 1. Trial; attempt; essay. [Obs.] Chaucer. I am withal persuaded that it may prove much more easy in the assay than it now seems at distance. Milton. 2. Examination and determination; test; as, an assay of bread or wine. [Obs.] This can not be, by no assay of reason. Shak. 3. Trial by danger or by affliction; adventure; risk; hardship; state of being tried. [Obs.] Through many hard assays which did betide. Spenser. 4. Tested purity or value. [Obs.] With gold and pearl of rich assay. Spenser. 5. (Metallurgy)  The act or process of ascertaining the proportion of a particular metal in an ore or alloy; especially, the determination of the proportion of gold or silver in bullion or coin. 6. The alloy or metal to be assayed. Ure. Assay and essay are radically the same word; but modern usage has appropriated assay chiefly to experiments in metallurgy, and essay to intellectual and bodily efforts. See Essay.] Note: Assay is used adjectively or as the first part of a compound; as, assay balance, assay furnace. Assay master, an officer who assays or tests gold or silver coin or bullion. -- Assay ton, a weight of 29.1662/3 grams.  1. To try; to attempt; to apply. [Obs. or Archaic] To-night let us assay our plot. Shak. Soft words to his fierce passion she assayed. Milton. 2. To affect. [Obs.] When the heart is ill assayed. Spenser. 3. To try tasting, as food or drink. [Obs.] 4. To subject, as an ore, alloy, or other metallic compound, to chemical or metallurgical examination, in order to determine the amount of a particular metal contained in it, or to ascertain its composition.  To attempt, try, or endeavor. [Archaic. In this sense essay is now commonly used.] She thrice assayed to speak. Dryden.
egress: 1. The act of going out or leaving, or the power to leave; departure. Embarred from all egress and regress. Holland. Gates of burning adamant, Barred over us, prohibit all egress. Milton. 2. (Astron.)  The passing off from the sun's disk of an inferior planet, in a transit.  To go out; to depart; to leave.
obstreperous: Attended by, or making, a loud and tumultuous noise; clamorous; noisy; vociferous. "The obstreperous city." Wordsworth. "Obstreperous approbation." Addison. Beating the air with their obstreperous beaks. B. Jonson. -- Ob*strep"er*ous*ly, adv. -- Ob*strep"er*ous*ness, n.
neologism: 1. The introduction of new words, or the use of old words in a new sense. Mrs. Browning. 2. A new word, phrase, or expression. 3. A new doctrine; specifically, rationalism.
specious: 1. Presenting a pleasing appearance; pleasing in form or look; showy. Some [serpents] specious and beautiful to the eye. Bp. Richardson. The rest, far greater part, Will deem in outward rites and specious forms Religion satisfied. Milton. 2. Apparently right; superficially fair, just, or correct, but not so in reality; appearing well at first view; plausible; as, specious reasoning; a specious argument. Misled for a moment by the specious names of religion, liberty, and property. Macaulay. In consequence of their greater command of specious expression. J. Morley. Syn. -- Plausible; showy; ostensible; colorable; feasible. See Plausible. -- Spe"xious*ly, adv. -- Spe"cious*ness, n.
tenacious: 1. Holding fast, or inclined to hold fast; inclined to retain what is in possession; as, men tenacious of their just rights. 2. Apt to retain; retentive; as, a tenacious memory. 3. Having parts apt to adhere to each other; cohesive; tough; as, steel is a tenacious metal; tar is more tenacious than oil. Sir I. Newton. 4. Apt to adhere to another substance; glutinous; viscous; sticking; adhesive. "Female feet, too weak to struggle with tenacious clay." Cowper. 5. Niggardly; closefisted; miserly. Ainsworth. 6. Holding stoutly to one's opinion or purpose; obstinate; stubborn. -- Te*na"cious*ly, adv. -- Te*na"cious*ness, n.
admonish: 1. To warn or notify of a fault; to reprove gently or kindly, but seriously; to exhort. "Admonish him as a brother." 2 Thess. iii. 15. 2. To counsel against wrong practices; to cation or advise; to warn against danger or an offense; -- followed by of, against, or a subordinate clause. Admonishing one another in psalms and hymns. Col. iii. 16. I warned thee, I admonished thee, foretold The danger, and the lurking enemy. Milton. 3. To instruct or direct; to inform; to notify. Moses was admonished of God, when he was about to make the tabernacle. Heb. viii. 5.
discordant: 1. Disagreeing; incongruous; being at variance; clashing; opposing; not harmonious. The discordant elements out of which the emperor had compounded his realm did not coalesce. Motley. 2. Etym: [See Discord, n., 2.] (Mus.)  Dissonant; not in harmony or musical concord; harsh; jarring; as, discordant notes or sounds. For still their music seemed to start Discordant echoes in each heart. Longfellow. 3. (Geol.)  Said of strata which lack conformity in direction of bedding, either as in unconformability, or as caused by a fault. Syn. -- Disagreeing; incongruous; contradictory; repugnant; opposite; contrary; inconsistent; dissonant; harsh; jarring; irreconcilable. -- Dis*cord"ant*ly, adv. -- Dis*cord"ant*ness, n. [R.]
essay: 1. An effort made, or exertion of body or mind, for the performance of anything; a trial; attempt; as, to make an essay to benefit a friend. "The essay at organization." M. Arnold. 2. (Lit.)  A composition treating of any particular subject; -- usually shorter and less methodical than a formal, finished treatise; as, an essay on the life and writings of Homer; an essay on fossils, or on commerce. 3. An assay. See Assay, n. [Obs.] Syn. -- Attempt; trial; endeavor; effort; tract; treatise; dissertation; disquisition.  1. To exert one's power or faculties upon; to make an effort to perform; to attempt; to endeavor; to make experiment or trial of; to try. What marvel if I thus essay to sing Byron. Essaying nothing she can not perform. Emerson. A danger lest the young enthusiast . . . should essay the impossible. J. C. Shairp. 2. To test the value and purity of (metals); to assay. See Assay. [Obs.] Locke.
guile: Craft; deceitful cunning; artifice; duplicity; wile; deceit; treachery. Behold an Israelite indeed, in whom is no guile. John i. 47. To wage by force or guile eternal war. Milton.  To disguise or conceal; to deceive or delude. [Obs.] Spenser.
endemic: Peculiar to a district or particular locality, or class of persons; as, an endemic disease. Note: An endemic disease is one which is constantly present to a greater or less degree in any place, as distinguished from an epidemic disease, which prevails widely at some one time, or periodically, and from a sporadic disease, of which a few instances occur now and then.  An endemic disease. Fear, which is an endemic latent in every human heart, sometimes rises into an epidemic. J. B. Heard.
extirpate: To pluck up by the stem or root; to root out; to eradicate, literally or figuratively; to destroy wholly; as, to extirpate weeds; to extirpate a tumor; to extirpate a sect; to extirpate error or heresy. Syn. -- To eradicate; root out; destroy; exterminate; annihilate; extinguish.
immutable: Not mutable; not capable or susceptible of change; unchangeable; unalterable. That by two immutable things, in which it was impossible for God to lie, we might have a strong consolation. Heb. vi. 18. Immutable, immortal, infinite, Eternal King. Milton. -- Im*mu"ta*ble*ness, n. -- Im*mu"ta*bly, adv.
alchemy: 1. An imaginary art which aimed to transmute the baser metals into gold, to find the panacea, or universal remedy for diseases, etc. It led the way to modern chemistry. 2. A mixed metal composed mainly of brass, formerly used for various utensils; hence, a trumpet. [Obs.] Put to their mouths the sounding alchemy. Milton. 3. Miraculous power of transmuting something common into something precious. Kissing with golden face the meadows green, Gilding pale streams with heavenly alchemy. Shak.
imperious: 1. Commanding; ascendant; imperial; lordly; majestic. [Obs.] "A vast and imperious mind." Tilloison. Therefore, great lords, be, as your titles witness, Imperious. Shak. 2. Haughly; arrogant; overbearing; as, an imperious tyrant; an imperious manner. This imperious man will work us all From princes into pages. Shak. His bold, contemptuous, and imperious spirit soon made him conspicuous. Macaulay. 3. Imperative; urgent; compelling. Imperious need, which can not be withstood. Dryden. Syn. -- Dictatorial; haughty; domineering; overbearing; lordly; tyrannical; despotic; arrogant; imperative; authoritative; commanding; pressing. -- Imperious, Lordly, Domineering. One who is imperious exercises his authority in a manner highly offensive for its spirit and tone; one who is lordly assumes a lofty air in order to display his importance; one who is domineering gives orders in a way to make other feel their inferiority.
craven: Cowardly; fainthearted; spiritless. "His craven heart." Shak. The poor craven bridegroom said never a word. Sir. W. Scott. In craven fear of the sarcasm of Dorset. Macualay.  A recreant; a coward; a weak-hearted, spiritless fellow. See Recreant, n. King Henry. Is it fit this soldier keep his oath Fluellen.He is a craven and a villain else. Shak. Syn. -- Coward; poltroon; dastard.  To make recreant, weak, spiritless, or cowardly. [Obs.] There is a prohibition so divine, That cravens my weak hand. Shak.
harangue: A speech addressed to a large public assembly; a popular oration; a loud address a multitude; in a bad sense, a noisy or pompous speech; declamation; ranting. Gray-headed men and grave, with warriors mixed, Assemble, and harangues are heard. Milton. Syn. -- Harangue, Speech, Oration. Speech is generic; an oration is an elaborate and rhetorical speech; an harangue is a vehement appeal to the passions, or a noisy, disputatious address. A general makes an harangue to his troops on the eve of a battle; a demagogue harangues the populace on the subject of their wrongs.  To make an harangue; to declaim.  To address by an harangue.
flout: To mock or insult; to treat with contempt. Phillida flouts me. Walton. Three gaudy standarts lout the pale blue sky. Byron.  To practice mocking; to behave with contempt; to sneer; to fleer; -- often with at. Fleer and gibe, and laugh and flout. Swift.  A mock; an insult. Who put your beauty to this flout and scorn. Tennyson.
tout: 1. To act as a tout. See 2d Tout. [Cant. Eng.] 2. To ply or seek for customers. [Prov. Eng.]  One who secretly watches race horses which are in course of training, to get information about their capabilities, for use in betting. [Cant. Eng.]  To toot a horn.  The anus. [Obs.] Chaucer.
denigrate: 1. To blacken thoroughly; to make very black. Boyle. 2. Fig.: To blacken or sully; to defame. [R.] To denigrate the memory of Voltaire. Morley.
pellucid: Transparent; clear; limpid; translucent; not opaque. "Pellucid crystal." Dr. H. More. "Pellucid streams." Wordsworth.
edifying: Instructing; improving; as, an edifying conversation. -- Ed"i*fy`ing*ly, adv. -- Ed"i*fy`ing*ness, n.
ascetic: Extremely rigid in self-denial and devotions; austere; severe. The stern ascetic rigor of the Temple discipline. Sir W. Scott.  In the early church, one who devoted himself to a solitary and contemplative life, characterized by devotion, extreme self-denial, and self-mortification; a hermit; a recluse; hence, one who practices extreme rigor and self-denial in religious things. I am far from commending those ascetics that take up their quarters in deserts. Norris. Ascetic theology, the science which treats of the practice of the theological and moral virtues, and the counsels of perfection. Am. Cyc.
milk: 1. (Physiol.)  A white fluid secreted by the mammary glands of female mammals for the nourishment of their young, consisting of minute globules of fat suspended in a solution of casein, albumin, milk sugar, and inorganic salts. "White as morne milk." Chaucer. 2. (Bot.)  A kind of juice or sap, usually white in color, found in certain plants; latex. See Latex. 3. An emulsion made by bruising seeds; as, the milk of almonds, produced by pounding almonds with sugar and water. 4. (Zoöl.)  The ripe, undischarged spat of an oyster. Condensed milk. See under Condense, v. t. -- Milk crust (Med.), vesicular eczema occurring on the face and scalp of nursing infants. See Eczema. -- Milk fever. (a) (Med.) A fever which accompanies or precedes the first lactation. It is usually transitory. (b) (Vet. Surg.) A form puerperal peritonitis in cattle; also, a variety of meningitis occurring in cows after calving. -- Milk glass, glass having a milky appearance. -- Milk knot (Med.), a hard lump forming in the breast of a nursing woman, due to obstruction to the flow of milk and congestion of the mammary glands. -- Milk leg (Med.), a swollen condition of the leg, usually in puerperal women, caused by an inflammation of veins, and characterized by a white appearance occasioned by an accumulation of serum and sometimes of pus in the cellular tissue. -- Milk meats, food made from milk, as butter and cheese. [Obs.] Bailey. -- Milk mirror. Same as Escutcheon, 2. -- Milk molar (Anat.), one of the deciduous molar teeth which are shed and replaced by the premolars. -- Milk of lime (Chem.), a watery emulsion of calcium hydrate, produced by macerating quicklime in water. -- Milk parsley (Bot.), an umbelliferous plant (Peucedanum palustre) of Europe and Asia, having a milky juice. -- Milk pea (Bot.), a genus (Galactia) of leguminous and, usually, twining plants. -- Milk sickness (Med.), a peculiar malignant disease, occurring in some parts of the Western United States, and affecting certain kinds of farm stock (esp. cows), and persons who make use of the meat or dairy products of infected cattle. Its chief symptoms in man are uncontrollable vomiting, obstinate constipation, pain, and muscular tremors. Its origin in cattle has been variously ascribed to the presence of certain plants in their food, and to polluted drinking water. -- Milk snake (Zoöl.), a harmless American snake (Ophibolus triangulus, or O. eximius). It is variously marked with white, gray, and red. Called also milk adder, chicken snake, house snake, etc. -- Milk sugar. (Physiol. Chem.) See Lactose, and Sugar of milk (below). -- Milk thistle (Bot.), an esculent European thistle (Silybum marianum), having the veins of its leaves of a milky whiteness. -- Milk thrush. (Med.) See Thrush. -- Milk tooth (Anat.), one of the temporary first set of teeth in young mammals; in man there are twenty. -- Milk tree (Bot.), a tree yielding a milky juice, as the cow tree of South America (Brosimum Galactodendron), and the Euphorbia balsamifera of the Canaries, the milk of both of which is wholesome food. -- Milk vessel (Bot.), a special cell in the inner bark of a plant, or a series of cells, in which the milky juice is contained. See Latex. -- Rock milk. See Agaric mineral, under Agaric. -- Sugar of milk. The sugar characteristic of milk; a hard white crystalline slightly sweet substance obtained by evaporation of the whey of milk. It is used in pellets and powder as a vehicle for homeopathic medicines, and as an article of diet. See Lactose.  1. To draw or press milk from the breasts or udder of, by the hand or mouth; to withdraw the milk of. "Milking the kine." Gay. I have given suck, and know How tender 't is to love the babe that milks me. Shak. 2. To draw from the breasts or udder; to extract, as milk; as, to milk wholesome milk from healthy cows. 3. To draw anything from, as if by milking; to compel to yield profit or advantage; to plunder. Tyndale. They [the lawyers] milk an unfortunate estate as regularly as a dairyman does his stock. London Spectator. To milk the street, to squeeze the smaller operators in stocks and extract a profit from them, by alternately raising and depressing prices within a short range; -- said of the large dealers. [Cant] -- To milk a telegram, to use for one's own advantage the contents of a telegram belonging to another person. [Cant]  To draw or to yield milk.
succinct: 1. Girded or tucked up; bound; drawn tightly together. His habit fit for speed succinct. Milton. 2. Compressed into a narrow compass; brief; concise. Let all your precepts be succinct and clear. Roscommon. The shortest and most succinct model that ever grasped all the needs and necessities of mankind. South. Syn. -- Short; brief; concise; summary; compendious; laconic; terse. -- Suc*cinct"ly, adv. -- Suc*cinct"ness, n.
overweening: Unduly confident; arrogant; presumptuous; conceited. -- O`ver*ween"ingly, adv. Milton. -- O`ver*ween"ing*ness, n. Here's an overweening rogue. Shak.  Conceit; arrogance. Milton.
aspersion: 1. A sprinkling, as with water or dust, in a literal sense. Behold an immersion, not and aspersion. Jer. Taylor. 2. The spreading of calumniations reports or charges which tarnish reputation, like the bespattering of a body with foul water; calumny. Every candid critic would be ashamed to cast wholesale aspersions on the entire body of professional teachers. Grote. Who would by base aspersions blot thy virtue. Dryden.
pervade: 1. To pass or flow through, as an aperture, pore, or interstice; to permeate. That labyrinth is easily pervaded. Blackstone. 2. To pass or spread through the whole extent of; to be diffused throughout. A spirit of cabal, intrigue, and proselytism pervaded all their thoughts, words, and actions. Burke.
capricious: Governed or characterized by caprice; apt to change suddenly; freakish; whimsical; changeable. "Capricious poet." Shak. "Capricious humor." Hugh Miller. A capricious partiality to the Romish practices. Hallam. Syn. -- Freakish; whimsical; fanciful; fickle; crotchety; fitful; wayward; changeable; unsteady; uncertain; inconstant; arbitrary. -- Ca*pri"cious*ly, adv. -- Ca*pri"cious*ness, n.
convention: 1. The act of coming together; the state of being together; union; coalition. The conventions or associations of several particles of matter into bodies of any certain denomination. Boyle. 2. General agreement or concurrence; arbitrary custom; usage; conventionality. There are thousands now Such women, but convention beats them down. Tennyson. 3. A meeting or an assembly of persons, esp. of delegates or representatives, to accomplish some specific object, -- civil, social, political, or ecclesiastical. He set himself to the making of good laws in a grand convention of his nobles. Sir R. Baker. A convention of delegates from all the States, to meet in Philadelphia, for the sole and express purpose of reserving the federal system, and correcting its defects. W. Irving. 4. (Eng. Hist)  An extraordinary assembly of the parkiament or estates of the realm, held without the king's writ, -- as the assembly which restored Charles II. to the throne, and that which declared the throne to be abdicated by James II. Our gratitude is due . . . to the Long Parliament, to the Convention, and to William of Orange. Macaulay. 5. An agreement or contract less formal than, or preliminary to, a traety; an informal compact, as between commanders of armies in respect to suspension of hostilities, or between states; also, a formal agreement between governments or sovereign powers; as, a postal convetion between two governments. This convention, I think from my soul, is nothing but a stipulation for national ignominy; a truce without a suspension of hostilities. Ld. Chatham. The convention with the State of georgia has been ratified by their Legislature. T. Jefferson.
